Volume 12

#581 - The Wind Fire Changes


However, what Zongli Wu cannot see, under the Extreme Ice Battle God Armor mask, on the face of Huo Yuhao, reveals, is actually the smiling face. A very satisfied smile.

Huo Yuhao is smiling, at present this situation, just started cultivates Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus the time with him how resembles! Just, he initially wanted the bad risk in the practice are too many and are too many.

Although this tornado violent is strong, but shook compared with oneself first Soul Nucleus with initially him, what was also considered as?

But by disciplining of this tornado violent, he in disciplining continually promotes by the ice storm that Tang Sect secret art Controlling Crane Capturing Dragon forms, makes him sense in that tornado violent to be the deep meaning of wind unceasingly.

This was not the Soul Ability category thing, but is an own comprehension, is the self-created Soul Ability category.

Although Beast God Di Tian never gives Huo Yuhao to narrate, but through the several fights, Huo Yuhao had discovered gradually that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus takes to itself the biggest advantage is anything.

That is: Perception!

This perception, came from the understanding to the world highest good, but is not the inborn perception.

The world divides the Yin-Yang, the Yin-Yang Dual Soul Nucleus formation, letting Huo Yuhao can see before many, thing that cannot see. For example space strength, for example the strength of element, many subtle points.

Therefore, when he in the fight, the thing that many others cannot feel, he can actually feel. Thus unceasing promotion own sensation.

At this time he sensation, is the strength of this wind. The mystery of wind element.

These wind elements were controlled forcefully, but, is very obvious, Zongli Wu, is his Beast Spirit Bone Dragon king, relies on Soul Power to control, the Bone Dragon king is Beast Spirit, has not controlled Dragon Clan of mystery of wind truly, although he has the ability of stimulation of movement wind. But will not have the true meaning of genuine wind. Otherwise, he is not the Bone Dragon king, but was silver dragon king.

But Huo Yuhao are actually feeling, goes to the change of feeling getting a chill element through Ice Element. The feeling gets a chill light and lively.

When like this good opportunity not to have, normally, on him where looks for these many wind elements?

As for the tornado striking power, Huo Yuhao a little wants to smile. This Zongli Wu eventually Soul Master, but is not Soul Engineer. If nine levels of Soul Engineer attacks him, absolutely will not use such scattered way.

How Huo Yuhao Extreme Ice Battle God Armor sees is nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, although the tornado violent is strong, but the strength is scattered, wants to break the defenses of this top nine levels of Soul Guidance Device is extremely difficult. Let alone, the Extreme Ice Battle God Armor leading role of Huo Yuhao is amplification and defense, own Extreme Ice Divine Crystal material quality defensive power strong. This wind is not Ma Xiaotao such Absolute Strength, broken against difficult, therefore, Huo Yuhao seems on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor the ray twinkle, that confuses Zongli Wu, his actual consumption is not absolutely big.

Zongli Wu eventually is a wily old fox, is less than a half minute, he thought that some are not right. Because he discovered that his tornado color has the change.

The green tornado, mixed with blue color gradually. This blue color is not his wind element!

What Huo Yuhao is Martial Soul? Lord Martial Soul is Spirit Eyes. The Spiritual Detection time is covering the audience, discovered that here Zongli Wu aura has the change, he has made dealing immediately first.

In the hand air current of condensation has promoted very suddenly, outrageously and tornado violent collides together. Immediately, strange appeared.

Behind Huo Yuhao, gold sun blue moon halo sparkle, the Ice Dragon volume and outside Wind Dragon volume when he releases collide together in instant, each other fused unexpectedly mutually.

The giant tornado in airborne slightly has stopped, along with it being defeated and dispersed, changes into the little dragon volumes toward to fly in all directions. But that huge wind element group, had broken away from the control of Zongli Wu immediately, dissipates toward all around.

Zongli Wu has the type sadly feeling that wants to spit blood, Huo Yuhao this move, looked like from him has stripped strength of massive element instantaneously. Moreover, Huo Yuhao itself as if has not received any injury.

Zongli Wu has realized own issue, although he does not know Huo Yuhao Dual Soul Nucleus, but also felt that some were not right.

In the under foot Bone Dragon Wangkou sends out low and deep roaring. The giant head raises, has spouted one group of green bright sphere toward Huo Yuhao.

This group of green bright sphere volumes are not big, when the head size, puffs out, because somewhat differs so much as to be beyond comparison with the volume of Bone Dragon king, gives people a uncoordinated feeling.

In the Zongli Wu hand Staff aims at that green bright sphere, a body Soul Ring ray rhythm, halos fall on that green bright sphere, bright sphere color immediately became profound.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection falls on this bright sphere, immediately had a scare.

Although he does not know that this move is any name, but, he has the trembling feeling of the heart. When this feeling, looks like his first time searches to observe the breaking cannon shell feeling to be similar to Spiritual Detection. In that small bright sphere, must contain how terrifying wind element, can so! Perhaps that might, compared with breaking cannon has not known that wanted formidable many times.

The sky-blue sword light drops from the clouds together, accurate cutting falls above bright sphere. Emperor's Sword and Peerless Extreme Ice.

When going smoothly everywhere Absolute Ice was just contacting that green bright sphere disappeared unexpectedly instantaneously.

Tore into shreds? Was Ice Element torn into shreds? But so the condensation wild wind element, can Zongli Wu also control? Has drawn support from the silver dragon king strength fellow worthily!

bright sphere arrived at the Huo Yuhao near shortly, Space Power has had more than enough, in front of that wild wind element, the surrounding space was confused completely, Huo Yuhao even had more than enough including Teleportation.

Perhaps this gadget, Extreme Ice Battle God Armor cannot block.

Then, good!

Huo Yuhao right fist recycling, a fist rumbles!

The Zongli Wu corners of the mouth place, sneers to reappear.

This green bright sphere, named, wind. In wind system strength that he can use and control most formidable strikes. Wind element extreme concentration. The might that this strikes, he had seen with one's own eyes, levels a mountain.

Merely by the strength of fist? Doesn't use Soul Ability?

However, his self-satisfacation has continued the flash, the next quarter, green bright sphere, disappears!

“Is this impossible?”Zongli Wu is almost stamps one's foot said.

Even if after is a large explosion, Huo Yuhao calm shoulders, he so will not be surprised. But, that green bright sphere, disappeared unexpectedly, this was makes him not accept in any event.

Then wild wind element! How saying that disappeared disappears?

Huo Yuhao will certainly not tell him answer. Time that his fist rumbles, in fact draws support, is Space Power.

The surrounding space truly was the disorder, but, he actually continuously in silently was reciting the incantation. Door of the small space opens on the fist, this leaf is the front door of undead Demi-plane channel, the stress, does not induct that wind instantaneously.

Can have big destructive effect as for it in undead Demi-plane, Huo Yuhao this little while did not have the count-down, will not fall in any case with the Ma Xiaotao similar position.

However, this, Huo Yuhao does not feel better. Inducts forcefully, he needs the stability of control space. If not has comprehended to Space Power, this, he also was really a moment ago not necessarily able to succeed.

The wind vanishes, the space naturally returned to normal. The body of Huo Yuhao also flickered to vanish below.

The gloomy sky suddenly becomes cold, the snowflake dances in the air!

Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain.

Was cloudy the face, the Zongli Wu mood has been stabilizing quickly. The air actually instantaneously becomes manic. The green wind vanished, displaces, is blazing, flame fire.

The sky turned into the red instantaneously, the temperature of just reducing has jacked unexpectedly. The bolide from the sky wreaks havoc, undifferentiated bombardment.

Is this strength of silver dragon king the control to element? After the wind, is the fire!

Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain and flame meteor shower front impact. In the sky, red and blooms blue the magnificent brilliance.

Zongli Wu through the meteor shower that the Beast Spirit Bone Dragon king releases is not Absolute Fire, but wins in the huge quantity, with his formidable Soul Power support, this meteor shower almost seizes every opportunity, moreover is having the terror explosive force. Huo Yuhao Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain unexpectedly oppressed is unable to take shape completely.

Around the Zongli Wu body, releases flame rays unceasingly outward. Keep Huo Yuhao from approaching.

The strength of flame, is more fearful than the beforehand wind, a more explosive strength.

The skeleton of Bone Dragon king turned into the flame color completely, the giant wings flaps, just likes huge fire dragon.

By the fire to subdue|grams ice, is without doubt good to choose. Especially in Huo Yuhao has consumed in the huge situation.

Zongli Wu is in progress according to his tactic completely, the goal must consume dead Huo Yuhao. An opportunity does not give him.

If everybody puts together the skill, perhaps Huo Yuhao also has the sudden opportunity. But what spells is Soul Power, looked at the strength and background. This undifferentiated attack, whatever Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection is formidable, is impossible to avoid. To Zongli Wu this cultivating is, achieves any attack slit has not been not difficult.

Therefore, Huo Yuhao appeared the personal appearance in sky quickly. Body surrounding Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain is still having an effect, each bolide shells, by Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain snowflake decomposition and to shatter.

Huo Yuhao as if oppressed somewhat has suppressed, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor appeared some burned black.

Zongli Wu consistently stands in the head of Bone Dragon king, the complexion sinks to congeal, cannot see too many expression changes. But the situation from battlefield everyone could see that he had the superiority.

This forms of combat are very shameless, fight in which several persons take turns fighting one person so as to wear the opponent out, but also hits the consumption. But, will Evil Soul Master care about the appraisals of shameless these two characters?

The Huo Yuhao sigh spreads over the audience, he as if did not have the means.

Although Zongli Wu is shameless, but this without doubt is also a move of open intrigue. Is the frontage hardly spells. Moreover, his meteor shower can also control the direction. Special concentrated fire Huo Yuhao, forcing him to resist.

Like this continues, finally can be imagined.

Is this hot strength? Manic and fierce. Huo Yuhao during sigh, is feeling the change of outside fire element with smile on the face.

In the legend, silver dragon king can control all elements the strengths, including: Water, fire, earth, wind, Light, darkness and space. As well as various variations elements. For example: Thunder, ice wait / etc..

Zongli Wu this Bone Dragon King Zhishi withstood some silver dragon king gracious favors, is impossible to control these elements completely, but hopes that it can control to be many some are good.

When Huo Yuhao feels the Zongli Wu plan by the fire to subdue|grams ice, almost smiles to make noise.

He has, but Absolute Ice! Moreover this Extreme Ice Battle God Armor main body builds with Extreme Ice Divine Crystal. Extreme Ice Divine Crystal, does not know that many ten thousand years can breed little. Inborn has the huge restraint function to all fire attribute. The wind was not good, the present bolide is not better. Does not know that actually this Zongli Wu how thinks, attacks with this way unexpectedly.

However, experiences the fire element charm to be also good.

What a pity, Huo Yuhao is the Ice Attribute owner, regardless of his perception strong, to realizing from experience of fire element is also not entirely as desired. This is the issue in attribute, has nothing to do with the perception.

Persistent bolide attack is invalid, in the Zongli Wu hand Staff wields once more, under the body the Bone Dragon King Juda head raises, a blue fireball directly soars Huo Yuhao ** however leaves.

Like the beforehand wind, the might of this blue fireball without doubt is also extremely terrifying.

Its fate gentle breeze is also same. Huo Yuhao can only to undead Demi-plane say that was sorry.

Sky suddenly strange peaceful.

The fight of both sides looks like has been at one type balanced and is the condition of probe. The surface seems, seemed Huo Yuhao suffers a loss. May in fact, Zongli Wu consumption Soul Power should many that he is more. At least Huo Yuhao thinks so. Although he is also consuming these days, may rely on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, his consumption was smaller.

“Huo Yuhao.”The Zongli Wu cloudy and cold sound reverberates in the air.

Huo Yuhao tranquil looks at Zongli Wu, “what did Sir Cult Master have to say?”

Zongli Wu has smiled suddenly, as if smiles very happily, “you thought that you are very intelligent? Relied on nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, the consumption has little been dealing with my attack?”

“Um?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Zongli Wu, “what do you want to say?”

Zongli Wu said with a smile: “I must tell you am, you made a mistake. All that I made a moment ago, in fact, are gathering the strength!”

“Gathers the strength?”Huo Yuhao somewhat is perplexed.

Zongli Wu said: “Told you not to have anything, was in any case quick we are the whole family.”His sound only then Huo Yuhao can hear.

4000 character big chapters asked the monthly ticket.

Bought our Douluo Continent hardbound hard shell to reprint the first volume of book friends, saw beyond Tang Sect and Tang San? This is only then this set of hardcover has. This set of hardcover has made my a lot of efforts, altogether 14 books, will promote one after another. Each will have beyond independent, all before is, has not issued. I am Douluo reprint to write specially. Will promote one after another. Purchases from our shop, can buy the signature version. Has a look quickly, naughty, treasure, shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find our shops.

We have the Tang Sect card sign that the entire net starts exclusive, plays the Tang Sect world book friends to have a look, certainly will feel very kind.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-581





Volume 12

#582 - Who Has Planned Who?


“My this Bone Dragon king, itself after is not the real dragon, cannot adjust the adverse impact that the element change brings through the Dragon Clan formidable body. Therefore, when displays any element ability, requires the time to adjust. Let the body adapt. Even if I have swallowed that many formidable Soul Beast souls to it, needs this repugnant warming up link as before. Only then after warming up, it can display the biggest battle efficiency. It inherited the silver dragon king attribute, although only then winds and fire two types. However, the controls of these two types of elements, actually approached Absolute. Therefore......, Then you must face, is, wreaking havoc of wind and fire.”

The voice falls, Zongli Wu body surrounding sudden ray Sheng, the Bone Dragon king under body turned into the black greatly. But the sky, actually turned into the azure red bi-color.

The bunch bolide appears in the midair again, but, this time, they are the blue color.

The bunch green wind also appears, the wind helps the fire intensity! Next flickers, blue bolides, just like leaving the chest cavity shell are ordinary, directly soars the Huo Yuhao bombardment to go.

Xuan imposing manner, making surrounding area in the air within hundred li (0.5km) be full of the burnt flavor, the terrifying oppression strength, making the person not gasp for breath.

The aura that the mood very stable Old Xuan discoloration, Zongli Wu has released finally at this time, has been enough to contend with him!

Such attack, even if is Limit Douluo him, must concentrate carefully treats fully, even must display Martial Soul avatar to be good. This Zongli Wu strength, has gone far beyond Old Xuan sentences in advance.

Zongli Wu itself obviously is also not Limit Douluo, but, cultivates for at least also over 97 levels, what is more fearful, he is relying on this special Beast Spirit, stiffly the battle efficiency will be increased to be able with the degree that Limit Douluo resists. Worthily is the eminent character in Evil Soul Master. In the future, if he can achievement Limit Douluo, its strength and battle efficiency, will certainly exceed Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui.

Facing including Limit Douluo must feel that like this frightened attack, how Huo Yuhao does deal?

Ju Zi(orange) has stood from own seat, the double fist grips tightly, double pupil stubbornly is looking steadily at the upper air, she naturally not because Zongli Wu likely must win to stand up, he is worried about that during the wind fire occurred simultaneously the man.

Such attack, can he resist really?

Light ray twinkle, on the Huo Yuhao face reveals a ice-cold chill in the air, came! This is the Zongli Wu true strength. Also then, should make him have a look, my strength.

A light ice blue color ray blooms from Huo Yuhao outward, this ice blue color ray shoots up to the sky suddenly, in the sky, the dry and hot aura was washed the majority in the flash unexpectedly. The terrifying Soul Power fluctuation made that airborne plunge the Huo Yuhao wind and fire slightly has stopped unexpectedly.

The Zhan blue light beam diameter exceeds ten meters, has broken in the upper air, a higher sky will lighten completely, behind Huo Yuhao, the blue moonlight ray puts greatly, his Extreme Ice Battle God Armor is also so, the intense blue halo from the sky reverberates, terrifying Absolute Ice is going toward his body condensation at an exceptional pace.

In the beforehand fight, Zongli Wu has not used throughout fully, did Huo Yuhao never use fully? Now, their fights just started.

A handle short blade edge, appearance of being quietly, in Huo Yuhao during grasps. Saw that this handle short blade edge appears, the pupil of Zongli Wu has contracted slightly, this impressively is one of the Huo Yuhao gambling stakes, Divine Tool that in his mouth said.

Regarding this handle short blade edge, the hearts of Zongli Wu too many coveting, this has not filled the weapon of Absolute Ice aura, even if gives him, does not come in handy. Naturally, nobody will think that treasure are many, if can fall in the hand, naturally is also the big good deed.

He wants to have a look actually very much, this handle short blade edge when resisting own wind bolide can play what kind of role.

Huo Yuhao told him with the motion quickly. Right hand short blade edge before the body cuts, the movement is not quick, but is very elegant. Blue blade glow the electricity shoots immediately, blade glow continuously ** leaves about ten meters.

That blue meteors arrived at the Huo Yuhao near, when that blade glow falls, the blue bolide disappeared instantaneously, even links mist and dust not to stay behind.

The Huo Yuhao movement starts to speed up, is in the midair, treadons Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, whole person elegant looks like gust. But on him that blue light beam actually throughout moves along with his motion. In that blue light beam, the found time air current cannot become the strength that restricts him to move. His movement like the lightning, each blade cuts quickly, the piece of bolide along with it disappearing, that strange quick incomparable bolide, unexpectedly somewhat will unable to follow his speed. Overall striking power clearly be much more formidable than Soul Power that Huo Yuhao releases, but, contacts with him truly, actually throughout only then few parts.

Huo Yuhao looks like in the chef solves the cow to be ordinary, unceasing in the short blade edge with oneself hand solves the fire meteor, but these bolides how to attack and outflank, regarding, even is the concentrated fire, throughout is actually not able to hit on him.

If Zongli Wu has controlled the situation, Huo Yuhao has controlled snow and ice formidable Gods in this situation.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath and Morning Dew Knife! In his hands finally bloomed the true brilliance, that formidable blade glow, making any flame not have the strength of half minute resistance before it. Is relying on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor and Morning Dew Knife amplification, lets Huo Yuhao, in this can threaten during the attack of Limit Douluo top obviously stiffly!

Has he retained in the beforehand fight unexpectedly?

Yan Shaozhe dumbfounded looks at airborne Huo Yuhao, he now is clear, after the powerhouse, why Huo Yuhao defeats four Transcendent Douluo ranks one after another already dares to face Zongli Wu. His strength, has surpassed similarly also own judgment! Transcendent Douluo? Absolute Martial Soul Transcendent Douluo? Perhaps not only is also so simple. The equipment is no doubt important, but similarly, does not have absolutely the formidable strength, can the strong equipment play the major role?

Huo Yuhao only thought that at this time Morning Dew Knife became extending of oneself body, oneself each simplest movement, can make Morning Dew Knife accurate sways the blade glow of that chilly fan.

Blade glow everywhere one visit, in the air dry Ice Element will appear unexpectedly naturally, on the knife, has dim mist throughout.

This is Morning Dew Knife, mounted has iced stone of Xue Nu god Morning Dew Knife. This is true Divine Tool! Although Huo Yuhao knows, when he said Morning Dew Knife is Divine Tool, Zongli Wu or Ju Zi(orange), have not believed. Because, this belongs to Soul Master world, most formidable weapon, should be Soul Guidance Device is right. Divine Tool? What is Divine Tool? In their eyes, nine levels of Soul Guidance Device were Divine Tool. But this handle Morning Dew Knife, actually obviously is not Soul Guidance Device.

But, this belongs to another world strength!

The light smile appears on the face of Huo Yuhao, he does not need others to believe itself, so long as he with the strength showed that was enough.

The attack of wind bolide has continued several minutes, when the last meteor disappears under Morning Dew Knife, all in sky as if became normal. That Bone Dragon king restored the black.

Zongli Wu looks that airborne grasps the short sword to face own Huo Yuhao fearlessly, his nod of gently, said: “I somewhat believe finally that you said this handle blade was the Divine Tool truth. Without it, you cannot block my attack.”

Huo Yuhao had not denied, nod of gently, “if you did not live compared with me for over a hundred years, does not have the qualifications to stand in my front.”

Zongli Wu satirized him to draw support from the external force, was he is also satirizing Zongli Wu to live spatially for hundred years?

Zongli Wu coldly snorted, in the hand Staff holds up once more, the Bone Dragon king under body has lifted the head. The giant wings shakes slowly. But Zongli Wu own body, at an exceptional pace is increasing. Behind him continuously float light shadow is gradually only with his body superposition. Seventh Soul Ring, red seventh Soul Ring, ray twinkle.

Is this Huo Yuhao first time sees clearly Soul Ability that Zongli Wu must display, Martial Soul avatar?

His shouldn't Soul Ability be the amplification kind? Then, his Martial Soul avatar is what affects? And that does Bone Dragon fuse by oneself completely together?

Huo Yuhao is not quite clear, but he was actually not worried that this fight, is to the biggest test. Meanwhile, is best tempering, the enemy is more formidable, is also best to his tempering effect.

The worry of Yan Shaozhe does not exist Huo Yuhao here actually, he has not thought will be killed by Zongli Wu, this was one had the self-confidence of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus powerhouse.

Zongli Wu body continuously amplification to about ten meters high time, stopped, his whole person has covered in a darkness completely.

With Titled Douluo Martial Soul avatar the kilometer altitude of hundred meters and compared with, ten meters high Martial Soul avatar seems is frequently nothing, even the broad imposing manner does not have continually. However, after Zongli Wu Martial Soul avatar completes, the Huo Yuhao complexion, first time after surface armor, changes.

In the Zongli Wu hand long Staff with the change of his body is also increasing, after he completes ten meters change the bodies, his Staff has also evolved to complete, that is a handle sickle, a handle giant sickle, the knife edge has ten meters, giant sickle grasps in the height ten meters Zongli Wu hand, seems some are uncoordinated.

However, after he completes changes body, an indescribable terrifying pressure from all directions extrudes to Huo Yuhao, he only thought that invisible strength as if must pull out from the body his soul.

---

I in prestige - platform sent our Tang Sect card sign to introduce and picture in detail, everybody was interested to go to the platform to have a look. The new friend can transmit: The Tang Sect card sign, will have the automatic reply.

Joins our prestige - platform is very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number, searches Tang three few, has the authentication was our families. Everybody can watch out, our micro stations, officially got online over the two days, inside has various functions, hopes that everybody likes. It is estimated that tomorrow will be similar.

Also welcome everybody to come our washing, the valuable shop: Dazzles world Tang Sect, selects and purchases our Tang Sect signature book and Tang Sect card sign. The following peripheral product one after another will also be released.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-582-part-1





Volume 12

#582 - Who Has Planned Who?


This feeling is absolutely fearful. He also finally indistinctly understands that Zongli Wu Martial Soul was anything.

His Martial Soul, is not pure amplification and auxiliary so is absolutely simple. Itself, has the formidable battle efficiency similarly.

This battle efficiency, through the fusion of soul and flesh and blood, in addition variation, sublimation of Martial Soul.

Evolved into like initially Xu Sanshi Martial Soul Black Tortoise Shield, this Zongli Wu Martial Soul should also in he cultivates for in the unceasing promotion is evolving unceasingly product. Its true name, should be called, Grim Reaper Devil Puppet?

Yes, Grim Reaper Devil Puppet.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui Martial Soul, is Blood Soul Devil Puppet, is existed very formidable, but Zongli Wu Martial Soul, but must surpass his mother.

Grim Reaper Douluo? From the present situation, Zongli Wu should be true Grim Reaper Douluo is right. His Martial Soul avatar, is god of death avatar! That Beast Spirit Bone Dragon King Zhenzheng status, should be, god of death mount!

This is complete condition Zongli Wu, no wonder he before resist he attacks time and time again, has not revealed the mood that anything is irritable, because of beginning to end, him still in has retained!

Huo Yuhao has not displayed Martial Soul avatar, Snow Emperor and Ice Emperor all in the deep sleep, Eye of Asura does not suit the close combat, but to them at present this situation, the close combat is the only choice, nobody can evade.

“Roar”Bone Dragon King Yangtian roared, the giant body shot up to the sky instantaneously, the terrifying wings flapped, obstructs the cloud to block out the sun. Is having the god of death on top of the head, directly soars Huo Yuhao to flush away.

The speed that it that huge body, flies unexpectedly is that astonishing, seems only a twinkle, huge Grim Reaper's Scythe, arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

Six wind hot whirlpools, appears in all directions, limits way that Huo Yuhao all can fend. Terrifying oppression strength, as if must instantaneously tear into shreds his whole person.

In the Huo Yuhao double pupil, the ray puts greatly, on the forehead, Eye of Destiny already opened. Purple gold colored light glow attacks together outrageously above that Bone Dragon king.

Quiet green Fire of Soul immediately fierce beat, six wind hot whirlpools also because of losing control, but is defeated and dispersed instantaneously, and erupts the wild air current.

Similarly is in the air current, itself controls Zongli Wu of strength of wind fire to come under the influence naturally to be smaller, Grim Reaper's Scythe in his hand even links a tremor not to have, arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

“Bites!”Ice and Snow Goddess Breath has supported Grim Reaper's Scythe. But body instantaneous flying upside down of Huo Yuhao, the whole body is actually filling black air currents. The black air currents of these terrors are permeate to his within the body unexpectedly directly, to his forehead permeating, as if must corrode his soul to be ordinary.

Zongli Wu slightly rocked in the Bone Dragon king top of the head, in hand on Grim Reaper's Scythe were many a blue misty gloss. Under strong black aerodynamic impact that on him releases, these blue color are melting at an exceptional pace.

This is the strength, the god of death strength.

The Huo Yuhao body is flying upside down backward, in eye the ray has actually filled frantically, yes, he wants is the oppression strength of this level! Even if Old Xuan does not have the means to have such oppression strength to him, because of Old Xuan to him, does not have the murderous intention.

Within the body Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus is revolving at an exceptional pace, that collides to produce the whirlpool Soul Power chain link unceasingly, the running rate at least is usual over three times, within the body Soul Power gushes out unceasingly outward.

Dual Soul Nucleus is he dares to resist the Zongli Wu genuine card in a hand, because of existence of this Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, making his resilience go far beyond ordinary Soul Master. Therefore, his consumption absolutely does not seem that big like the surface.

However, the Zongli Wu battle efficiency also similarly surpassed him to sentence in advance, Grim Reaper's Scythe, good handle Grim Reaper's Scythe! This handle Grim Reaper's Scythe seemed his first Soul Ability Staff transforms to come from before, but has covered Huo Yuhao of audience actually to be able by Spiritual Detection to feel clearly, this Grim Reaper's Scythe clearly was Zongli Wu eighth Soul Ability.

Seventh Soul Ability god of death avatar, eighth Soul Ability, Grim Reaper's Scythe, makes him in addition so formidable. Can not drop the wind perhaps facing Limit Douluo.

That collided a moment ago, even if Absolute Ice on Morning Dew Knife, cannot seal up the death air/Qi that on Grim Reaper's Scythe contained completely. The death air/Qi of these terrors, are corroding the body of Huo Yuhao at an exceptional pace. Extreme Ice Battle God Armor can filter part, but the part infiltrated as before. That type is similar to the maggot of tarsal bone, moreover permeating ability that seizes every opportunity, anybody meets, can creepy feeling.

But Huo Yuhao cannot. After that death aura drilled into his body, must wreak havoc crazily is swallowing his vitality. These death aura through swallowing vitality unceasingly expands itself, till Huo Yuhao relationship of form and spirit to completely extinguish, this is the strength of god of death!

What a pity, after these death aura entered Huo Yuhao within the body, greeted them, was small whirlpools, was containing Spiritual Power and Absolute Ice whirlpool. The strengths of these swirls are unable to melt the god of death aura directly, but, can actually adsorb them. Then through Huo Yuhao own control, discharges outside the body.

On Morning Dew Knife, were many black, if examined in extremely near distance that will discover, that is a small black whirlpool, above seems containing the extremely terrifying strength.

“Admits defeat. You possibly are not my match, I do not want to destroy you. By your talent, in the future, decides to become my Holy Spirit Cult successor.”Saying of Zongli Wu coldly, but look seemed has actually been full of the bemoaning the state of the universe flavor.

From collided, Huo Yuhao that a moment ago he can feel although is relying on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device and that Divine Tool blade and contends, but in fact, his true strength has not arrived at Transcendent Douluo absolutely. But own cultivating is, is actually 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo really! In this case, the disparity between both sides is the insurmountable gap. By Beast Spirit, oneself can level the disparity between Martial Soul.

Huo Yuhao stubborn shaking the head, “won me to say again!”At the same time was saying, in his hand Morning Dew Knife has held up once more, the look also suddenly becomes stagnates. The strength of surroundings violent wind fire is attacking his body unceasingly, ripples a piece by piece halo on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor.

Hasn't he come under the influence of god of death aura? Zongli Wu somewhat surprisedly visits him, and impossible not to have been affected. Should be suppressed.

Huge Bone Dragon roared again, wings flapped, flushed away toward Huo Yuhao. Huo Yuhao gave his Soul Assault to injure to it a moment ago is not small, but its soul is in itself and a Zongli Wu body, the injury of therefore, receiving was eventually limited.

The big dragon just flew, Zongli Wu has gotten rid, huge Grim Reaper's Scythe wields once more, the terrifying black great blade edge from the sky flashes through together, the huge black blade edge shade almost breaks the space, arrived in front of Huo Yuhao instantaneously.

Huo Yuhao only with enough time keeps off Morning Dew Knife before the body, next one flickers, the whole person was cut to fly, this time, he even continually displays the Soul Assault opportunity not to have.

The body from the sky flies upside down, on him has black light fog in the twinkle and corrosion.

Bone Dragon King accelerates suddenly, almost appears in the Huo Yuhao point of descent instantaneously, giant Dragon's Tail flung horizontally, directly soars Huo Yuhao to pull out to strike around the middle.

The body of Huo Yuhao, seems like hit the violent that the baseball pulls out generally strikes to shoot. Extreme Ice Battle God Armor has made the sound of tooth acid.

What is more terrifying, although his body pulled out flew, but around the body also has the massive wind hot whirlpools to wreak havoc, is tearing his body.

Zongli Wu has not left Bone Dragon king top of the head throughout, in the hand Grim Reaper's Scythe cuts once more, the space splits, black light shadow dodges not to have.

The distant place, the Huo Yuhao body was struck on the road which must be taken that flies, the black form together is quietly rips open the space to appear in the midair.

It looks like Zongli Wu doppelganger is ordinary, in the hand the sickle sweeps away, cutting maliciously to the body of Huo Yuhao.

The person who below observes has turned very quiet at this time, looks at this.

Ended, perhaps Huo Yuhao these really ended.

“Bites!”In the middle does not allow to send, Huo Yuhao reversed the personal appearance suddenly, in the hand Morning Dew Knife pulls up at the inconceivable angle, has blocked fatally this struck. However, his body again was actually struck to fly, in the Extreme Ice Battle God Armor surface has covered entirely the black air current. Saw that the whole person looked like must be swallowed.

He does not have to attempt to fight again, but turns around runs, airborne flies toward the distant place.

“To run? With enough time?”Zongli Wu sneers, under foot Bone Dragon King He his regard is interlinked, a giant wings racket, is almost similar to Teleportation is suddenly common, the twinkling appears beyond the kilometer, directly soars Huo Yuhao to pursue.

The fight carried on this time, as if all have been away from finished are not far. Falls into this degree of leeward, in the confrontation of Titled Douluo rank powerhouse, almost lost the possibility of make a comeback.

That several attacks, Huo Yuhao was injured a moment ago without a doubt, since he has been incapable of resisting the strength of that god of death to look.

He escapes now, but must suppress these god of death as far as possible the strengths. But, then? The attack of Zongli Wu will also continue to follow!

Pursues one to run away, what making Zongli Wu somewhat accidental was, Huo Yuhao Extreme Ice Battle God Armor actually can also use, moreover always does not allow to send in the middle erupted the speed instantaneously, pulled open with him the distance, moreover from the sky circled.

This degree of speed erupts, is also enormous to the Soul Power consumption, does this boy, actually want to do?

Following on the heels that Zongli Wu sneers, now he is not anxious, the sky changed gloomy. From airborne shone in Huo Yuhao blue color light beam, at this time vanished quietly. Without this supplies, seems, he should unable to insist too for a long time.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-582-part-2





Volume 12

#582 - Who Has Planned Who?


In this time, suddenly, is wiping the strange Bai Se (White Color) ray to be quietly has shot.

Zongli Wu one startled, subconscious is Grim Reaper's Scythe cuts. But actually falls on the vacancy, then the strength of formidable god of death, was passed through by that Bai Se (White Color) ray unexpectedly, falling that the white light is quietly on the Bone Dragon king.

This Bone Dragon king had been practiced Life Source Beast Spirit by Zongli Wu, each other regard is interlinked. Although that white light falls on the Bone Dragon king has not had any injury to it, but intense restless instantaneously appears in the Zongli Wu heart.

Also at this time, front continuously in running away Huo Yuhao has turned around 0.1 strange strengths to bloom from him suddenly outward.

Attached to the black air current on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, is changes into small eddy currents to disperse to four unexpectedly, then welcomed in the Zongli Wu direction.

In that black whirlpool, already, not only the strength of god of death, but also is mixing with the ice and mind.

Zongli Wu does not dare to neglect, under foot Bone Dragon king spits the breath blowout broadly, this melted the strengths of these small eddy currents, the speed that but it flies therefore was also affected.

In this time, Zongli Wu was hearing Huo Yuhao cold snort|hum.

He notes at this time, after these black air currents compel Huo Yuhao, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor the profound blue color vanished, displaces, is clear grey colored.

Appearance that huge phantom is quietly behind Huo Yuhao, this phantom is very unusual, unexpectedly is a great turtle. All over the body golden yellow great turtle.

" Hey, the counter-attack, started! " Shrek City, somebody hey low saying with a smile.

golden light dodges, instantaneous connection on Huo Yuhao and Zongli Wu. Under all person shocking gazes, they instantaneously has exchanged the position.

Zongli Wu appears in airborne that formerly Huo Yuhao was, but Huo Yuhao appears above the Bone Dragon king top of the head that him has stood.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, turned into both hands to gather grasps, since the knife point downward 0.1 Bai Se (White Color) rays brave from the Huo Yuhao whole body suddenly. White light Sheng, emerges in Morning Dew Knife instantaneously greatly suddenly.

The Bone Dragon king of under foot has gone all out to struggle at this time panic-stricken, is, Huo Yuhao both feet. Actually likely mounted on it has resembled.

Meanwhile, a golden halo sends out from the Huo Yuhao top of the head, just completely covers the entire Bone Dragon King Juda head.

" Soul Shaking Burst! "

Silent thundering resounds in Bone Dragon King Danao, the huge wound made its quiet green Fire of Soul China-foreign brave from skull all slits unceasingly.

The round trip that Zongli Wu of distant place goes all out catches up, but also stuffy snort|hum, huge god of death avatar reduced several points.

Is impossible, Fire of Soul of Bone Dragon king is quite formidable, this Soul Burst clearly did not have beforehand Soul Assault to be formidable! How it can receive heavy wound instantaneously.

Was that spoken parts light a moment ago?

Yes, is that spoken parts light. Three Eyed Golden Lion leaves Huo Yuhao one of the two big divine skill, Soul Expropiation. Falls zero the mind defensive power instantaneously.

Sharp Morning Dew Knife, maliciously pricked in the skull of Bone Dragon king at this time.

Bone Dragon King Yangtian called out pitifully. In an instant, took the crack on skull for the beginning, the faint trace Bai Se (White Color) ray continuously has covered toward its forehead instantaneously.

Its Fire of Soul bitter experience to this Bai Se (White Color) ray. Immediately was the snow and ice sprinkles the hot oil to be ordinary likely, suddenly ablation. The entire Bone Dragon King Pangda body also instantaneously became unbending.

Power of Purification!

Before Huo Yuhao, so is why passive, has been coming under attack, his corners of the mouth place currently also has the blood to flow. For wins the time to oneself, recited the incantation.

Why lets the god of death the strength clothes on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, must conceal the Necromancer ability that oneself release.

This fight. Already not only the competion of strength, is the collision on intelligence.

Actually was who to plan who?

The body that Zongli Wu clashes rapidly stops in the midair suddenly, the pitiful yell of sad and shrill sounds of people from the sky does not reverberate, that god of death huge body withers rapidly, quick changed the human form, blood in gulps emitted from the Zongli Wu mouth unceasingly.

Beast Spirit is no doubt formidable. But is interlinked with his mind, even can be said as part of his body. Huo Yuhao was extinguishing unexpectedly instantaneously has killed his Beast Spirit, without a doubt, was instantaneous heavy wound he.

This is Zongli Wu has not thought. He is not clear, by the great strength of Bone Dragon king. Why strikes including Huo Yuhao cannot resist.

Undead Creature is Undead Creature, regardless of Bone Dragon king strong, inescapable Undead Creature category.

But Huo Yuhao, is actually now on Douluo Continent, only, Necromancer!

Power of Purification, is any Undead Creature difficult adversary, formidable Undead Creature is no exception, let alone, the soul fluctuates, Soul Burst before. Sharp Divine Tool Ice and Snow Goddess Breath. This all, is makes a conductor and medium to Power of Purification.

In this case, the strength of this Bone Dragon king is no doubt formidable, possibly can't withstand?

Huo Yuhao has been waiting for the opportunity, from feels the match suppression to promote itself at first, releases the potential. To afterward show the enemy to weakly, as well as the instantaneous eruption of this most critical moment, all during his computation.

The Zongli Wu biggest problem is, he has forgotten, Huo Yuhao in fact, is control system Battle Soul Master!

Bai Se (White Color) Power of Purification rapid toward the Bone Dragon King Pangda body spread in the past, it completely lost the soul, the strength of all elements, no longer listened to him to control at this time.

[!] Zongli Wu stagnates in the airborne body, looks that the Huo Yuhao look has filled cloudy and cold and evil. Like this loses, he is not willingly, he is not really willingly! He looks certainly, cultivating of Huo Yuhao for and is inferior to him. Has used he not clear strength, can therefore turn defeat into victory.

But, he has not actually thought that reason that Evil Soul Master when facing ordinary Soul Master has the superiority, in fact not also for this reason?

When the Zongli Wu hand Staff holds up once more, really had some shivering. The terrifying aura spreads once more, his imposing manner as if had not been affected by heavy wound by oneself.

Huo Yuhao has also relaxed, the dark blue ray reappears above Extreme Ice Battle God Armor.

On Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, blade glittering, the dazzling halo from the sky reverberates. The Absolute chill in the air releases outward.

" Huo Yuhao, you won. " Zongli Wu nodded to Huo Yuhao, ", but, starting from this moment, you are our Holy Spirit Cult life and death archenemy. In the near future. We will kill you not at any cost, but is not the priests and disciples subdues you. On you have one type to make me feel the frightened strength. In any event, we will not make you Limit Douluo. Because, means our Holy Spirit Cult end on that day. Today you won. But the next time, you perish inevitably. "

The voice falls, on Zongli Wu blooms suddenly the dazzling glare, he changes into one group of black meteors to be common, runs away toward the distant place. Even has not returned to the Sun-Moon Empire army.

He lost, according to the written pledge to fulfill a military order, he must be handled by the military law. Therefore, he can only choose to leave now.

The Holy Spirit Cult subordinate, at this time is also vacant. They even are not quite until now clear. Why Cult Master such inexplicable losing. This was really too inconceivable.

Sun-Moon Empire, solemnly silent, but Shrek, has been stopping a moment later, the cheers resound through the horizon instantaneously.

Fifth. This is fifth fights!

Huo Yuhao is relying on strength of the unexpectedly, struck to kill the Holy Spirit Cult two powerhouses successively, seized one person, but also defeated them. Must know that this is the powerhouse of Transcendent Douluo level, one, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master!

Regardless of following competion Huo Yuhao whether can also win. What without a doubt is, today has made his war become famous.

Starting from this moment, his name, formally entered Douluo Continent the forest of powerhouse.

The huge Bone Dragon king body crashes, falls broken the smashing in the ground.

Huo Yuhao also together drops from the clouds with it, falls on not far away. on one knee knees down, in gulps is panting for breath.

This war, he wins how difficult? The attack of Grim Reaper's Scythe, has had not the small wound to him eventually. In order to create finally opportunity of this turning defeat into victory, to conceal the Necromancer ability. He must bear patiently. The price of bearing patiently, is the huge consumption and injury.

On Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, the ray is glittering lightly, Huo Yuhao slowly standing body.

Because is away from the armor, nobody can see clearly his present appearance, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, the ray did not even weaken anything compared with before.

Flavor that the Sun-Moon Empire army, somewhat keeps silent greatly.

One after another five fights, all are Transcendent Douluo, is Evil Soul Master Transcendent Douluo, has lost unexpectedly to him. Even if Limit Douluo wants to achieve such success not to be easy? However, he actually such achieved.

Stands in Ju Zi(orange) behind nine levels of Soul Engineer, in the eye revealed the color of fear.

No one wants such dead in the battlefield. Dies in the Huo Yuhao hand.

Although clearly knows that present Huo Yuhao is the consumption is huge, but, at this time, nobody proposed unexpectedly one must go to battle.

Holy Spirit Cult has defeated, the surplus Holy Spirit Cult powerhouses return to remove quietly, under the leadership of Feng Ling, arrives in front of Ju Zi(orange), after bowing salutes, anything had not said that has arrived at behind the team.

Zongli Wu ran, he is not willing to withstand military law handling, but, what without a doubt is, Ju Zi(orange) in this army, will not have other sounds to question again. Without Army Supervisor, War-God Empress is this army true control.

……

The 24 th volume of our peerless Tang Sect simplified form has published, in our washing, the valuable shop sells, I just went to the shop to sign yesterday 500 books, first come, first served. Selects and purchases quickly. Buys one also to throw in our Tang Sect card sign to propagandize the playbill as well as value four Yuan card signs. Comes quickly.

The first volume of Douluo Continent first second edition, I also supplemented have signed 500 books, everybody can also continue to select and purchase, has a look outside our exclusive, Tang Sect, Tang San. Waits for second outside, I want to write Xiao Wu before meeting Tang San, story in Star Dou Forest.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-582-part-3





Volume 12

#583 - Knife Skill Of God


The Ju Zi(orange) goal has been achieved, in this time heart even has the joyful feeling. With the hand of Huo Yuhao, massacres these Evil Soul Master, expels Zongli Wu, this has made her plan successfully complete. As for does not attack Shrek City, retreats in light of this, what was also considered as? Domestic strength keeps away foreign aggression, this truth, Ju Zi(orange) is clear.

However, the joyful mood has actually maintained very short time, many worry also appear. Because, Huo Yuhao, was too strong!

Understanding of Ju Zi(orange) Huo Yuhao, has gone far beyond his side these nine levels of Soul Engineer, at this time, showed such strength, was not any good deed.

Although Ju Zi(orange) knows, since has destroyed the massive Sun-Moon Empire upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device person is Huo Yuhao, but that is he achieves after all in secret. Most Sun-Moon Empire people and high levels do not know that has such existence of person.

However, this time is different, Huo Yuhao has routed the Holy Spirit Cult five big powerhouses by strength of the unexpectedly one after another, includes Cult Master Zongli Wu, under this is a focus of public attention, without a doubt, he a war became famous. Meanwhile, he also inevitably becomes the object who Sun-Moon Empire most important will strike to kill in the future.

This kind of young and promising Soul Master powerhouse, will certainly be the mainstay of Shrek Academy in the future, even is the entire Soul Master eminent character, but he is doing with Sun-Moon Empire right, does not solve him, Xu Tianran will sleep on pins and needles surely. Meanwhile, Holy Spirit Cult certainly with all might and main will also cope with him.

The heart of Ju Zi(orange) is a little chaotic, great strength of Huo Yuhao, even has very tremendous influence to her plan, but, since the mentality transformed, these she instead haggles over are not quite many, but feared that Huo Yuhao has an accident.

Huo Yuhao standing body, his respite as before is slowly rapid, but in the eye pupil, does not have the half minute to be weak, instead bright.

With Zongli Wu this war, displayed their wisdom and bravery, defeats a superior enemy, compels to draw back this Holy Spirit Cult Lord. This war, the effect on Huo Yuhao is enormous, Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus of his within the body is operating at an exceptional pace, the huge consumption similarly at an exceptional pace is also restoring.

Reason that Titled Douluo is formidable, because of having Soul Nucleus, but reason that Limit Douluo stands in the world peak, is because has Dual Soul Nucleus!

In this oppression strength huge fight, Huo Yuhao experience even more Dual Soul Nucleus has taken to own advantage. Present he, but also is not very mature, but must draw support from Extreme Ice Battle God Armor as well as the Morning Dew Knife strength, reluctantly can contend with the powerhouse of Zongli Wu that level. But, he deeply believed that with the help of Dual Soul Nucleus, oneself breaks through Limit Douluo not to have any difficulty.

“Next.”The Huo Yuhao ice-cold sound resounds through the audience.

Believes in all people that he should delay the time as far as possible, to oneself restore the free time time. He presented the challenge to the Sun-Moon Empire aspect unexpectedly.

This selects ten fights, suffers defeat and flees after Zongli Wu, the flavor started somewhat to change.

From nobody believes at first Huo Yuhao can complete this war, started to have the frightened mood to the present Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses heart. Huo Yuhao showed to all people with the strength that he may complete.

Without impeding of Holy Spirit Cult, all Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer went to Ju Zi(orange) the vision.

Ju Zi(orange) has also recovered at this time, before her calls out in alarm as if not to note, at least nobody understands true meaning.

“Does which consecrate to be willing it to defeat?”The Ju Zi(orange) sinking sound asked.

At this time, side her, several nine levels of Soul Engineer, has the Soul Engineer Corp regimental commander, there are from consecration of Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family Worship Hall. Only then these nine levels of Soul Engineer, have to get rid to cope with the qualifications of Huo Yuhao.

However, these Soul Engineer, without any exception, cultivates without one for can be the Transcendent Douluo level, they want to contend with Huo Yuhao, can rely on, only then own Soul Guidance Device.

The fight they all looked a moment ago in the eye, who can have confidence? Moreover, this is the war of life and death. Facing such one including the match who the Holy Spirit Cult main this grade of powerhouses defeat, in their hearts hesitates.

Enough several seconds, nobody spoke, the Ju Zi(orange) complexion gradually became ugly, the surroundings cultivated for low Soul Engineer, particularly various Soul Engineer Corp members, on the face revealed the ashamed color. One's own side actually do not have a powerhouse to dare to enter the stage the challenge, this is the what kind insult! Since the Sun-Moon Empire army has swept away all obstacles, does not have toward is disadvantageous, when has met such awkward situation?

“Marshal, I am willing to go to battle!”A clear and bright sound resounded, came from has stood Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer. He is only ordinary Soul Engineer, provides from his Soul Guidance Device can see, most is five levels of Soul Engineer. However, in his sound fervent, does not have the timidness of half minute.

This shouts, the command presents all nine levels of Soul Engineer complexions changes, gloomy is bringing several points of shame.

And Soul Engineer face muscle twitched, then walked, the anger shouted to clear the way: “Overreaches oneself, what thing you are, there is qualifications to go to battle on behalf of the army? Get lost, otherwise, handles according to military law!”

The person that walks, jet black Humanoid Soul Guidance Device covers the whole body, the back also carries two handle long blades, the whole body is lending the greatly strengthened sharp aura.

Sees him to come out, that young Soul Engineer wanted to say anything, but lowered the head eventually under his swift and fierce imposing manner oppression.

This wears black Humanoid Soul Guidance Device Soul Engineer to turn around, bows to say to Ju Zi(orange): “Marshal, please allow me to represent the empire to go to battle!”

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, said: “Good, Commander Liao all careful.”

“Marshal Xie.”

Soul Engineer that this walks, naturally will not be voluntarily, but, he will not have the means not to stand. Because he is Terror Claw Commander Soul Engineer Corp, Liao Mengkai.

Some own subordinate guts proposed that must go to battle for the country, if he withdraws again, later also how commander this Soul Engineer Corp? Therefore, although in his heart does not have any assurance, has stood eventually.

In Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp, most formidable without doubt is Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, again, is Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and this Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp.

And, the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp most formidable place lies in their background, as well as material reserves. But Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp since War-God Empress Ju Zi(orange) has taken over control, the overall strength promotion is also quick. What Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp most excels is speed, the thousand li(500 km) long-range raid is their specialties. Then, this Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp? In Hand of the National Protector complete five Soul Engineer Corp, they are the absolute different races.

Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp like their names, they most excels, is attacking a fortified position.

Dark Gold Terror Claws Bear is honored as tackles strongest Soul Beast, close combat ability same level Soul Beast is nearly invincible. But this Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp is also so, they some necessary linkage Soul Guidance Device, itself all members most excel, is the close combats. In other words, this is one in fact Soul Engineer Corp comprised of close combat Soul Engineer.

The long-distance attack took up the mainstream of Soul Engineer fight most times, but, close combat Soul Engineer battle efficiency, in fact closest Huo Yuhao initial tentative plan. Is Soul Master and union of Soul Engineer ability.

Comes the amplification Martial Soul battle efficiency by Soul Guidance Device, thus achieves strong the striking power in certain distance. This is close combat Soul Engineer pursues.

Like Sword Mad Ji Juechen, in fact is close combat Soul Engineer. Huo Yuhao now in some sense, similarly is close combat Soul Engineer.

The close combat cultivates Absolute, its battle efficiency, even must surpass the long-distance attack. Meanwhile, the survival capability in battlefield is also much stronger.

Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp frequently was arranged as the strength use of attacking a fortified position. Member's quality is also extremely high. Fierce does not fear.

Similarly Liao Mengkai is this Soul Engineer Corp regimental commander, the close combat is also he excels. The strength is greatly strengthened.

Since decides to fight, Liao Mengkai again does not have the half minute to hesitate, the tip of the toe in the ground, the body has been similar to arrow Yaichi leapt up, the person in the airborne acceleration, directly soars Huo Yuhao to hit.

Actually Huo Yuhao consumes to have many in the beforehand fight, this point no one knows, but can actually affirm that is not relaxed. Then, must give the time that he reduces restores as far as possible, has the victory to be possible. Although the Titled Douluo resilience is strong, but also has the limit. Moreover, Soul Power restores relatively easily, the energy of consumption restored not to be simple.

At the same time that Liao Mengkai clashes, on body black Humanoid Soul Guidance Device burst out the dark golden ray immediately, both hands has gripped the hilt of back handle long blade respectively, forward area. Two handles are five chi (0.33 m) sword grasp in the hand.

His pair of sword, all over the body jet black like black ink, does not reflect any gloss, but has to plant to swallow all feelings. Even if the sharp aura the distance is very far, can feel. Place visited, air by incision two slender traces easily.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection first fell on him.

This person of good exuberant vitality!

Huo Yuhao somewhat surprised looks at Liao Mengkai, the vitality that on this Soul Engineer sends out could not miss many compared with him. Wants powerful many compared with it general Titled Douluo.

Although the vitality cannot decide battle efficiency, but, has the powerhouse of strength of formidable vitality, and endurance of fight will be continually greatly strengthened in the strength that in the actual combat can show.

However, how?

Signs the hand cramp of name tag, yesterday in we dazzled in the world Tang Sect shop to lie one in the afternoon, has signed the small 1000 books, had the Douluo Continent first second edition, has the peerless Tang Sect simplified form that we were newest 23,24, peerless Tang Sect cartoon. Died of exhaustion me. Because I pass for two days to travel on official business for several days, therefore first multi- bamboo slips, first come, first served.

Right, wants to know that our card sign details, everybody in our prestige - platform transmits: Tang Sect card sign.

Finally, particularly grateful these in our shop shopping book friends' blessing, you made the blessing that the customer service conveyed they tell me, the cares thank you, I will try hard to take care, was good to give everybody a better symbol. Remembers many to us the high praise. We already five hearts!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-583-part-1





Volume 12

#583 - Knife Skill Of God


Huo Yuhao float in airborne, static waiting arrival of Liao Mengkai. This person has not released Martial Soul! This is the Huo Yuhao accurate judgment.

Even if Soul Engineer, generally first will also release Martial Soul in fight, is used for amplification to be also good, auxiliary, compared with not release effect good many. Like him, relies on Soul Power to stimulate to movement Soul Guidance Device purely, Huo Yuhao has seen one, that is Ji Juechen.

But, he actually obviously can judge, the route and Ji Juechen that this person of walking are different. If same, he will not have Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, but was only the sword is enough.

Jet black such as blade glow of black ink instantaneously in overhead crossing, changes into the overlapping cross to cut together, directly soars the Huo Yuhao bombardment, but . The sharp sharp knife blade from the sky gives people a feeling of destroying the hardest defenses.

In the Huo Yuhao hand Morning Dew Knife selects to, on the Morning Dew Knife knife edge, bursts out to ice the blue blade glow immediately together, happen to cuts in the core position that overlapping cross cuts.

Jet black blade glow has from the sky stopped, turned into Bai Se (White Color) unexpectedly, is similar to the mist is ordinary, from the sky dissipated.

The Liao Mengkai heart sinks.

Before below, looks at Huo Yuhao successively and five big Evil Soul Master powerhouse confrontations is a matter, faced his time truly, was a different matter.

From Huo Yuhao, Liao Mengkai has not felt any oppression strength, as if this person does not have any imposing manner inherent.

But, is this, his pressure is also bigger. He has seen with one's own eyes this person to defeat five big Transcendent Douluo Evil Soul Master successively! This thought looks like a mountain general suppression in his heart. Let his fighting intent weaken.

After the first exploratory collision ended the next flash, Liao Mengkai arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

A pair of long blade, one after the other, simultaneously cuts to Huo Yuhao.

Soul Engineer little uses Martial Soul avatar, because such will affect the display of Soul Guidance Device might. But like him, does not release Martial Soul is actually few.

Sharp blade glow as before by Morning Dew Knife easy blocking. Meanwhile, the Huo Yuhao left hand lifts, the dark blue sword glow, before arrived at the Liao Mengkai body, together.

Emperor's Sword, Peerless Extreme Ice!

The piercing chill in the air only then a Liao Mengkai person can feel that comprehended Huo Yuhao of true meaning of ice, already can achieve by own Absolute Ice is congealed not to put.

The Liao Mengkai personal appearance dodges, the whole person suddenly became illusory several points.

“!”A light sound, Peerless Extreme Ice the black form will freeze the ice sculpture together, crashes downward. However, in addition the black form actually arrived at side Huo Yuhao together, the sharp blade glow erupts one group of glares suddenly, directly soars Huo Yuhao to take away as many things as possible.

The Huo Yuhao personal appearance dodges, vanishes in same place, Teleportation.

That black form also instantaneously disappeared unexpectedly . Moreover, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection is unable to discuss that looks up its exact location.

“Well?”This is......

In the Huo Yuhao heart is startled.

From beginning to end, Liao Mengkai has not started his Martial Soul, then, this Teleportation ability, should entrust with by Soul Guidance Device. Is this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device ability Teleportation? No, not only is also so simple, this fellow looked like in airborne completely disappeared, but did not appear like Teleportation in another place suddenly. This means that his Humanoid Soul Guidance Device had nearly was mastering the Space Power ability. This may be extraordinary!

During the Huo Yuhao thinking, form does not have the omen is appearing behind him together suddenly, black blade glow instantaneously near body.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection has covered the audience, the reaction rate is also wonderful quick incomparable, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor bursts out a dark blue halo instantaneously. That jet black blade glow one close, immediately as if fell into the viscous mire, has stopped instantaneously . Moreover the extremely cold aura also in an instant counter-attacks to him.

The Absolute Ice influence is everywhere, although Huo Yuhao its contains not to put, has not displayed Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain again, so long as begins, this Absolute Ice prestige can arrive on the match.

Does not have hesitation of least bit, black ray to dodge, Liao Mengkai vanished. Let Huo Yuhao a blade that puts on quietly from the armpit fall on the vacancy, has not moved any entity.

Cannot hit, far escaping thousand li(500 km). This is the assassin general forms of combat.

Huo Yuhao is intelligent, he almost understood instantaneously Liao Mengkai must make anything, he was the same with the idea of former Zongli Wu, must hit the consumption with. Must consume own energy and Soul Power with this way.

Good to plan!

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth place reveals one to sneer. Do I cope with Zongli Wu to be strenuous, cope with your one to cultivate to less than 95 levels of Soul Engineer be strenuous? You have Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, I have similarly. Moreover, something, you do not have.

In the Huo Yuhao hand Morning Dew Knife holds up slowly, has lifted the top of the head, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, the dark blue ray has restrained inward suddenly, the blue light blooms suddenly outward.

Liao Mengkai that just in his side came to once again after feeling this Absolute chill in the air, almost did not have hesitant any immediately escapes into the space.

In the Huo Yuhao hand Morning Dew Knife cuts instantaneously, in that flash, nobody sees clearly his movement, his whole person looks like dark blue bright sphere is common, instantaneously outward blooming innumerable rays.

Immediately, is centered on his body, in a diameter kilometer range, is filling the dazzling blade glow. Ices blue ray easy incision space.

This radically is the undifferentiated attack . Moreover, even if before is, when facing Zongli Wu, Huo Yuhao has not displayed such attack.

What knife skill is this?

Luckily Ji Juechen not here, otherwise, that Sword Mad certainly after this war ended cannot help challenging to Huo Yuhao. Even if loses does not matter. Time that Huo Yuhao this knife skill wielded a moment ago, entire sky for it discoloration. In the sky, presented the magnificent design, that seems an ice blue big dragon from the sky wreaks havoc, each scale is clear.

This and this are the knife skill can achieve?

The Tang Sect people are also bewildered, they do not know when similarly Huo Yuhao had such knife skill.

This was not the Douluo Continent knife skill! It came from, Gods!

Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique!

This is first of Huo Yuhao in the battlefield time uses this move of knife skill, in the instance of displaying, he only thought Soul Power of own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus implication is similar to by Morning Dew Knife heavy drinker absorbing water general crazily swallows instantaneously.

The black form is almost the wrestling from airborne is departing. In the swing hand that Liao Mengkai goes all out the double blade, protects the body.

May be this, on him as in successive 13 blades.

Nine levels of Soul Guidance Protective Cover, to shatter!

Paragon Protecting Cover, to shatter!

On Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, were more ice blue rays. The piercing chill in the air, almost permeated in his bone instantaneously.

Although his Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is also nine levels, but in front of the terror Morning Dew Knife blade glow, the effect of defense by far is not good like the imagination.

Internal Core Formation already by irrelevant to shatter that the terror blade glow tears, if not in him also one similarly is nine levels in armor, perhaps at this time he turned into an ice sculpture.

Too fearful, this was really too fearful. Actually this is what knife skill! Unexpectedly can in tear into shreds the entire sky within diameter kilometer range instantaneously. Such knife skill, he has actually borne patiently to use now, some of his actually how many cards in a hand?

Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses, in heart all scared.

What a pity, they do not know that Huo Yuhao was also regretting now.

Although this blade shocks the audience, the price of but paying was also too big, his within the body Soul Power collapses, Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus this formidable resilience could not catch up with the consumption of this blade.

The entire sky was torn to turn into a dragon xing picture to continue for a half minute completely to vanish! The sky turned into the Absolute Ice sea. Is this what kind waste?

“Dies!”Roars to erupt from the Liao Mengkai mouth suddenly, two handles jet black such as the long blade of black ink has been similar to shoots toward the Huo Yuhao electricity at top speed generally. But Liao Mengkai, then crashes just like the freely falling body generally downward.

In anybody opinion, throws flies own weapon, goal one, that gives own running away manufacture time.

Although nine levels of Soul Engineer battle efficiencies not necessarily compare favorably with nine levels of top Soul Master, but, their survival capabilities are certainly stronger than Soul Master.

If at least a moment ago traded one to cultivate with Liao Mengkai similarly is, even cultivate compared with him for higher Soul Master in front of Huo Yuhao Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique, definitely had been cut the fragment, but he was also living.

Jet black blade glow, one after the other, is separated by three chi (0.33 m), almost arrived in front of Huo Yuhao instantaneously.

The Huo Yuhao look, actually suddenly becomes dignified. Unprecedented dignity.

On Morning Dew Knife selected, selects to fly the first handle black sword. He makes the movement that all people could not understand. His body one side, actually with own left shoulder, withstood the attack of that second handle long blade slightly.

“Pū!”The long blade hurls the body to enter, penetrated his shoulder instantaneously, Extreme Ice Battle God Armor such defensive power, unexpectedly cannot block this handle long blade.

Flows out without the blood, the body of Huo Yuhao actually shook shaking, then crashes toward the ground.

The Tang Wutong complexion big change, on the strategic place in the past, was actually lifted the right hand by Huo Yuhao, to her compared with the hand signal that do not come.

“Pū and pū!”Two.

Liao Mengkai and Huo Yuhao fall to the ground successively.

When Liao Mengkai falls to the ground, body staggered, takes a seat to fall down. Huo Yuhao actually steadily falls to the ground, but the shoulder is inserting a handle black long blade, is very towering to the person, the strange feeling.

……

Erupts fourth day continuously, pleaded everybody monthly ticket and recommendation vote support.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-583-part-2





Volume 12

#583 - Knife Skill Of God


“Ha Ha! You were hit by me.”Liao Mengkai self-satisfied laughs to make noise. Even if Holy Spirit Cult Lord Zongli Wu unable to injure to at present this young people, oneself actually achieved.

Huo Yuhao nodded to him, said: “Has not thought that will meet your this type person who pursues Absolute. If not I have been staring at you, when feels you to release Martial Soul, perhaps, I will be more miserable at this time. You can actually lock my vitality with your vitality combustion for the price. If I have not guessed that wrong, your Martial Soul, should be a blade.”

Liao Mengkai nodded, in the look even revealed the color of admiration, “good, my Martial Soul was a blade. Said accurately that should be, Blade Soul! My Blade Soul, does not have the real shape, is different from many Tool Martial Soul. However, it can actually integrate in any metal, and metal completely fusion is one. When I just started to practice, it is very small and weak. But along with the promotion of my strength, I discovered that originally its wondrous use is infinite.”

The Huo Yuhao connection said: “Therefore, your this struck a moment ago, seems like brings up the rear to oneself, may in fact, in two handle blades, the first handle throw normally, but in the second handle, actually integrates in which Martial Soul, and takes the combustion vitality to lock me as the price. It seems like that you certainly have usually eaten the thing of big making up, strengthens own vitality.”

“Yes. I displayed a moment ago, is my ninth Soul Ability, the blade soul is overwhelmed! You died. My blade soul enters your within the body, even if your brave soldier breaks the wrist, takes the shoulder to be pierced by the price is blocked my this blade to be also useless. My demon magic knife is nine levels of Soul Guidance Device. Another handle is eight levels. Is overwhelmed nine levels of Soul Guidance Device that by the blade soul stimulates to movement, destroys the hardest defenses. Even if were in Limit Douluo the move, definitely will be attacked in within the body by the blade soul, the meridians completely broke to perish. Originally, you have the opportunity not to be locked the vitality by me, what a pity, you should consume in the beforehand several fights greatly. Therefore after releasing that big move, although looked for me, but your own consumption was also too big, this cannot shunt my locking.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “I acknowledged that I underestimated you. This is the price of having a low opinion of the enemy. However, extremely do not look at your blade soul high. Although it can make me be injured, but wants to kill me, is not easy.”

At the same time was saying, the Huo Yuhao right hand grips the demon magic knife hilt, unexpectedly that little is a handle five chi (0.33 m) black sword draws out from the shoulder outward.

The distant place, Tang Wutong has closed the eye not to dare to look, her double fist grips tight, really what she wished one could the blade was one! But, Huo Yuhao does not make her pass, these time selects ten, belongs to his fight, is the fight of man.

Looks that Huo Yuhao really also has the ample force to draw a sword, the Liao Mengkai look is somewhat absent-minded, “this is impossible, will you have the strength? Your all shouldn't Soul Power be used to suppress my blade soul? Why do you have the strength to pull out blade?”

Combustion vitality, even takes the Martial Soul compensation as the fountainhead, started staking everything on a single throw of the dice struck, attacks successfully, was, effect as if not like judgment good of that. Does he possibly draw out this handle long blade?

Liao Mengkai dares to go to battle today, actually also has another reason, that is greedy. To Ice and Snow Goddess Breath, greedy of Morning Dew Knife.

Is one has the powerhouse of blade soul, he deeply believed that even if are not Absolute Ice Martial Soul, can certainly control that handle magic knife. Once that handle magic knife succeeds in obtaining, in addition own blade soul, soon, certainly can help itself break through to Transcendent Douluo that level.

Must know that Transcendent Douluo cultivates is, is becomes ten levels of Soul Engineer foundations! That is he has been long-awaited.

Five chi (0.33 m) long blade, flows out without a drop of blood, slowly drew out from within the body by Huo Yuhao. On the Huo Yuhao face has armor to cover, no one can see his expression. But from his stable movement, as if the pain is not that huge.

Finally, the entire handle demon magic knife had been pulled out by Huo Yuhao completely, his body rocked slightly, grasps that nine levels of Soul Guidance Device demon magic knife in the hand.

The characteristics of this demon magic knife have one, is sharp!

This Liao Mengkai pursues Absolute in the fight extremely, his weapon is so, absolute sharpness. Even if sharpness that Extreme Ice Battle God Armor cannot block. Under the stimulation of movement of blade soul, a moment ago that flash, the striking power that the demon magic knife burst out, can describe with Divine Tool. If not the Huo Yuhao discovery is not right, when it is the ordinary attack, pierced is the heart.

“How you and do you achieve?”Liao Mengkai dull looks at Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao instead grasps being bewitched magic knife, lifts own cheek with the palm side, reveals somewhat palely, but actually as before tranquil calm face.

“I keep you to the present, must make you see, your attack, is useless to me. Does not have any possibly to kill me. Now, you can!”

“Shows mercy!”Ju Zi(orange) of distant place gives a loud shout.

What a pity, this is the battlefield!

“Bang”in fierce bellow, Liao Mengkai body exploded irrelevant to shatter, before the point of death, in his look also filled has not dared to believe.

For that strikes finally, he has burnt his vitality, even does not give a thought to own defense, pours into all Soul Power, and conceals the Soul Ring ray with Soul Guidance Device, sent out that fatally has struck. But, why hasn't the enemy died?

Stakes everything on a single throw of the dice means to give up defending, in fact, under Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique of Morning Dew Knife stimulation of movement, his all passive defensive abilities all had also been torn into shreds.

Absolute Ice enters the body, landing time, Liao Mengkai received heavy wound, within the body meridians most freezes. In this case, Ice Explosion Technique finally is fatal strikes.

Has turned around slowly, facing the direction of Sun-Moon Empire army, Huo Yuhao leans on with five chi (0.33 m) demon magic knife on the ground, is supporting own body.

Suddenly, he stuffy snort|hum, two blood from the pores of the feet almost simultaneously from his left shoulder lasing, when this blood lasing in airborne, forms an appearance of handle sword unexpectedly. Moreover crazy plunging Huo Yuhao.

golden light bursts out from Huo Yuhao forehead place, covers in which that scarlet Blade Soul, in the silent engine'knock', extinguishes in invisible.

The blood stops, but has left the traces of some blood stains on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor. But Huo Yuhao stands there as before, looks like anything has not occurred.

“Next!”

The blood, has not made him appear weak, instead seemed has increased for several points ferociously severe, a pale face indifferent expression, has not looked like the real demon god arrives general.

Six, this is sixth. Six fight three dead, injuries suffered by both sides, to be captured. Relies on the strong strength, Huo Yuhao has been winning streak absolutely six.

If the failure of beforehand Holy Spirit Cult was unable to touch Ju Zi(orange) truly, then, this Terror Claw Commander Soul Engineer Corp dying in battle of Liao Mengkai, let her heart intermittent colic. This is nine levels of Soul Engineer! Moreover is Commander Soul Engineer Corp. Such talented person, dozens years can train one. The absolute ten thousand li (0.5km) select one, each is the Sun-Moon Empire most valuable strategic resource.

Ju Zi(orange) somewhat understands that now Huo Yuhao proposed selected ten goals is anything. His goal, not only need force itself to repulse the enemy. Meanwhile, is whets own strength at the same time, weakens the Sun-Moon Empire strength.

Holy Spirit Cult is not Ju Zi(orange) can control, but also belongs to Sun-Moon Empire here strength similarly! In the face of the attack of Huo Yuhao, Holy Spirit Cult loses seriously. But then, lost was Soul Engineer. Nine levels of Soul Engineer, Sun-Moon Empire, although has, but is also limited! In addition in recent years new promote, not over 20. May successively by Huo Yuhao their to get rid of, already more than one.

Another reason that Ju Zi(orange) loves dearly, naturally is the wound of Huo Yuhao shoulder.

This time Huo Yuhao, the breath somewhat is slightly rapid, his injury is truly heavy. A Liao Mengkai blade, before is him, has no way to sentence in advance. So strong staking everything on a single throw of the dice, he is also first meeting.

The attack of Liao Mengkai, is the sharpness of Absolute. All develop in that direction. Absolute sharp Soul Guidance Device under Blade Soul and amplification of blade soul, has been the extremely terrifying degree.

When Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection feels, he knows that he is impossible to resist that blade completely. He in has deadlocked the meridians of oneself left shoulder with Absolute Ice instantaneously, has blocked that blade.

Extreme Ice Battle God Armor played the defense role, the blade soul was filtered at least had 50%. After the blade soul enters the body, wreaks havoc crazily. Just like such of Liao Mengkai expectation, wants to twist broken all of Huo Yuhao within the body.

Luckily, Huo Yuhao is having Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus. Under moistening of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, the Huo Yuhao body intensity even can compared with initial Golden Eyed Black Dragon King Di Tian. That sharp strength cannot the earliest possible time tear into shreds his body. In this case, his whirlpool Soul Power played the enormous role.

Locks that Blade Soul by whirlpool Soul Power, then through unceasing revolving and oppression, forces Blade Soul in certain position, does not make it invade the main body important organ.

Reason that Huo Yuhao falls to the ground, was that time truly somewhat cannot control the body.

To finally, him has compelled outside the body the blade soul through Soul Power finally, entire process in fact thrillingly extremely. If before he has not completed Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus cultivates, this is fatal heavy wound. He must die directly.

However, the blessing in disguise knows Non- luck. Receives heavy wound at the same time, let a Huo Yuhao about step feeling the function of oneself Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, when as well as control all sorts of wondrous uses.

Consumption of Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique, heavy wound of body. Finally made Huo Yuhao somewhat weak. Within the body Soul Power surplus also less than 20%, body function also by heavily wound. However, standing of his coldly there, Sun-Moon Empire here powerhouses was blown.

Huo Yuhao in going all out stimulation of movement own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, restores Soul Power whole-heartedly. He naturally must continue to challenge, he also has formidable Spiritual Power,......

--

The Tang Sect card sign receipts on all fronts, welcome everybody to dazzle world Tang Sect Duoduo to select and purchase in us. Buys book also Song Ka, the fine cartridge, the big playbill can select and purchase.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-583-part-3





Volume 12

#584 - The Tang Three, Small Dances, Read The Ice Friendly


The low and deep incantation recited to resound in the Huo Yuhao mouth, under Imitation Soul Ability and function of Spiritual Disturbance domain, nobody can hear or is detected that he such was doing.

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, she has not definitely been able to take responsibility on her position. The Huo Yuhao powerful, she of oppression has the feeling of not gasping for breath.

What to do? Then can be what to do good? Always brilliant she, at this time in heart unexpectedly is vacant. She is not willing to look at Huo Yuhao dead, but, if at present these completely unfair selects ten to be defeated to come to an end by the army finally, will be unprecedented regarding the morale of troops attack of entire Sun-Moon army. All effort that she made before even may put to the running water.

“I come!”The sinking sound drinks in the sound lowly, before has stood in Ju Zi(orange) Old Su walked in big strides.

Ju Zi(orange) opened mouth, wants to stop by calling out him, but has not called the exit / to speak finally. At this time, she cannot shake military morale.

Old Su moves toward the location center slowly, he walks at the same time, the body starts each article Soul Guidance Device quietly to appear, in the clear metal clangour, is covering his body each, ultimately forms completely personal Humanoid Soul Guidance Device.

Huo Yuhao visits him, the pupil contracts slightly.

This fights from today, Sun-Moon Empire truly was knew the Humanoid Soul Guidance Device core science and technology. Moreover, they also really had certain method to use.

The research of Xuan Ziwen showed that wants to control Humanoid Soul Guidance Device to agree with oneself completely, that needs formidable Spiritual Power to achieve the accurate control. But this Spiritual Power level needs to be, Titled Douluo level.

Is formidable Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, controls on need more formidable Spiritual Power, such can have at one's command.

These nine levels of Soul Engineer have their Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao does not feel strange, what he is quite strange, why Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer can also use. Certainly used any special method.

“You are very strong! To so the age achieve such achievement. Has saying that you are I have seen in Soul Master, most has the talent. What a pity, our is his Lord. Your great strength, is meaning you threat to our Sun-Moon Empire. The old men will not hesitate at all costs, ruins you.”The Old Su sinking sound said.

Huo Yuhao tranquil visits him, said: “Come.”

Dodges the jet black front door not to have the emergence of omen suddenly in him behind, in a low and deep roaring sound, the huge body drilled from that jet black front door. Corpse Ice Bear King, Second White!

Fought seventh, Huo Yuhao could not bear invite the reinforcements finally.

Huo Yuhao jumps, but moves sideways, arrived at the shoulder of Second White, sits cross-legged to sit there, the whole person looked like has stucked.

Second White face upwards to roar, immediately in big strides overran toward Old Su.

The Old Su corners of the mouth place reveals one to disdain, he is not close combat Soul Engineer, but most excels at the long-distance attack. Although Second White the personal appearance is huge, moreover aura is quite powerful. However, in his eyes, this is an unwieldy target.

On the Humanoid Soul Guidance Device both sides shoulders, presented a red cone-shape artillery respectively. The volume seems not big. Two red beams, project toward Second White instantaneously.

To nine levels of Soul Engineer this levels, the Soul Guidance Device might, did not discuss at the size.

The Second White build is huge, even if not aim, is very easy to hit.

However, surprising appeared, two beams soon will fall shortly, on it, Second White that dashed about wildly is sideways suddenly, movement extremely keen, even has also made a movement of tip of the toe place. Unexpectedly that from one side shunt the attacks of two beams.

“Um?”In the Old Su eye reveals surprised, but after his attack locking, sends out, is this escapes?

Spiritual Disturbance domain and Spiritual Detection and Sharing.

This is the answer!

Answer that Huo Yuhao gives!

Was Old Su this scruple instance, Second White arrived at the near, a pair of giant fist, directly soared the Old Su thump to strike under. Xuan imposing manner, fist has not arrived, the earth started the downward collapse.

Under foot two Daoist believers light ** however leaves, the Old Su personal appearance explodes instantaneously draws back, tries to avoid this to strike.

Second White lowers roars, the big mouth opens, Bai Se (White Color) spits the breath to spurt crazily, directly soars Old Su to take away as many things as possible.

Old Su Humanoid Soul Guidance Device chest place gigantic rod-like crystal suddenly ** leaves a glare, the light beam runs out instantaneously, drills has spat the breath, falling maliciously on Second White.

Even if there is Spiritual Detection and Sharing to be auxiliary, the body of Second White was extremely also huge, he withstood with the solid chest this has struck.

On Old Su this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device has provided the strong speed to him, while sending out attack, draws support from the recoil to escape instantaneously, avoided that to spit the breath, and has spread out.

However, what making him shock, Second White of oneself artillery, is only the body shook shaking unexpectedly, flushed toward him in this.

Is this possible? That is eight levels of Soul Guidance Device Gold Melting Cannon.

Even if nine levels of Soul Engineer, all Soul Guidance Device are impossible is nine levels, when one because of nine levels of Soul Guidance Device manufacture difficulties, another reason is the use consumes too in a big way.

Like milk bottle that type of thing, regarding high level Soul Engineer, the function wanted slightly were many, was impossible to supplement the consumption promptly, what was most reliable was own Soul Nucleus. Therefore, on formidable Soul Engineer, Soul Guidance Device of various ranks match one is very reasonable.

Although Gold Melting Cannon is only eight levels of Soul Guidance Device, but takes melting the iron melt [gold/metal] as the characteristics, is single body attack, the attack prestige can be greatly strengthened.

May on that great bear, actually stay behind a piece of burned black trace, as if cannot cause any damage.

Ice Bear King Second White and Xiao Bai (Little White) have not the small difference. Xiao Bai (Little White) was formidable snow and ice control, Second White itself inherited the body of Xiao Bai (Little White), but actually cannot inherit the strength of Xiao Bai (Little White) formidable snow and ice control, can say, the strength of this snow and ice controls remaining very small part. But Second White also has its superiority, that is its formidable body and spirit. Its body in undead Demi-plane becomes undead, comes under the undead aura influence, has had the variation. The tenacious degree, is entire undead Demi-plane, otherwise, it cannot become entire undead Demi-plane most powerhouse.

Therefore, this eight levels of Soul Guidance Device want to injure Second White, was quite difficult. Let alone, Gold Melting Cannon is fire attribute, just by the Ice Attribute restraint of Second White.

The Second White left leg layer on layer stamps in the ground, the giant bellow spreads outward, stands up from failure general just like Earth Dragon. The earth trembles, has conducted inside and outside dozens, Sun-Moon Empire army, even had the under foot not steady condition.

With the aid of the terror reacting force, the Second White huge body shoots up to the sky, from the sky brings together unexpectedly, then goes toward the direction hit of Old Su in the way of super revolving. Xuan imposing manner, Ice Meteor that crashes from the upper air is ordinary just like one. This was the Xiao Bai (Little White) only inheritance has also given the Second White ability. But in the Absolute Ice prestige can on, have a disparity with Xiao Bai (Little White), but impact actually still have it.

Old Su after short being startled, quickly returned to normal, facing Second White such offensive, he did not fear. Speed? One most excel is speed. Moreover, on him nine levels of Humanoid Soul Guidance Device have to relieve the strong capability of locking, in other words, Second White absolutely does not have the means to lock his position.

The personal appearance dodges, when Old Su almost does not allow to send in the middle, made way the attack of Second White, in the meantime, on his shoulder were also many jet black such as nine levels of Soul Guidance Cannon of black ink. Eight levels is not good comes nine levels, hot department is not good, that trades a line.

Regarding nine levels of Soul Engineer, the striking power is always not the issue.

However, locks the Second White position in Old Su, instant, suddenly, a sense of crisis that beyond description on the shoulder nine levels of Soul Guidance Cannon can finish close sufficiently appears in his spiritual sea instantaneously. This is from cultivates in Titled Douluo for the feeling of instinct.

Old Su believes to own premonition extremely, because this premonition does not know that many time has saved his life. He is almost without hesitation stopped the shoulder Soul Guidance Device sufficient energy, the rave the nose oven, Soul Guidance Thruster full, tries to fend.

The quiet blue ray in airborne dodges not to have, the body of Old Su rapidly nose oven in airborne slightly stiff, big blood fog from him ** however leaves.

If carefully looked that can discover, his nine levels of Soul Guidance Protective Cover and Paragon Protecting Cover, even is on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, presented a penetration eyelet. The eyelet is not big, but actually sufficiently fatal. Because, it appears in the Old Su forehead position.

“Bang”the Second White huge body falls to the ground loudly. The form appears together slowly on his shoulder. Huo Yuhao.

Just, this time Huo Yuhao has stood in the Second White shoulder, but formerly such did not sit above meditate.

The quiet blue ray draws an arc from distant place together, during returns him to grasp.

The Old Su corpse drops from the clouds, falling maliciously on the ground, but he any had not responded.

Had finished, the seventh fight, such had ended, another nine levels of Soul Engineer, died.

As for the reason of falling from the sky, actually even nobody knows.

The body of Huo Yuhao shook shaking, supports the big end of Second White, reluctantly coming to a stop personal appearance. Then he sat on the shoulder of Second White, this time, he has not urged the Sun-Moon Empire aspect, but was static sitting cross-legged sits there.

A complexion paleness of Ju Zi(orange).

From beginning to end, that huge Ice Bear is a bait, bait that attracts the Old Su attention! Starts truly, is Huo Yuhao.

……

Our micro, station, has gotten online officially, in our prestige - under platform, clicks on micro, station, can enter. Serializes the button exclusive, I just had issued beyond our Douluo Continent exclusive there: Tang Sect and Tang San first part, everybody can look. To look at the full text, can wash in us, valuable shop: Dazzles world Tang Sect, purchases our Douluo Continent hardbound second edition first volume.

Has a look quickly.

In the future, I also in our prestige - exclusive of platform serializes on, serializes outside our Douluo Continent the God Realm legend. However, perhaps this wanted next year.

Pays attention to our prestige - platform, is very simple. Prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - below public number - searches Tang three few, has first of authentication.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-584-part-1





Volume 12

#584 - The Tang Three, Small Dances, Read The Ice Friendly


When the Ice Bear King incarnation is Ice Meteor, Ju Zi(orange) felt that some are not right, because while changing into meteor, Huo Yuhao on its shoulder vanished. But Old Su completely was actually attracted by the corpse Ice Bear King Second White huge body and Xuan imposing manner, has neglected most fatal somebody.

That is together gloomily blue the colored light glow sends out, almost instantaneously appears before the Old Su body, moreover path that the complete computation clear he has fended. That sentences the attack completely in advance!

The forehead of Old Su was passed through, under such injury, can he possibly live?

Ju Zi(orange) pain has closed eyes, her battle efficiency under reduced once again. Two nine levels of Soul Engineer!

Seventh, this is seventh. If, he can achieve complete ten success of fight, means that oneself side can also have three nine levels of Soul Engineer to fall from the sky?

It is not good, cannot again this. Rather makes the army morale drop sharply, cannot continue again.

Ju Zi(orange) deeply clearly has become at this moment aware, from the beginning, oneself on working as of Huo Yuhao. Who always most excels at the open intrigue, Huo Yuhao open intrigue.

Huo Yuhao clearly takes oneself to carry on this challenge as the bait, but, oneself have actually forgotten, the Shrek Academy person, most excels is the one-to-one fight!

Without linkage Defensive Soul Guidance Device, did not have linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device, one-to-one, Soul Engineer and Soul Master of contest same rank, does not have the too big superiority. But this point, because these years overwhelming superiority of Soul Engineer Corp when facing Soul Master, making all people somewhat neglect, in these people, included itself.

Ju Zi(orange) has closed double pupil ashamed, sighed, said: “We admit defeat.”

“No, Marshal, we have not lost. We are willing to challenge to him.”Old Su died, the eyes of numerous position nine levels of Soul Engineer were red. Because Old Su is the personal connection is usually extremely good in them. At this time two fellow soldier died in battle shortly successively, timid in their heart had been covered gradually angrily.

“I said that we admit defeat! This is the order.”Ju Zi(orange) opens the double pupil suddenly, shouted angrily to make noise, “I cannot look that you brought death in vain. From the beginning, we made a mistake. We should not carry on any single Tiao with the Shrek Academy person. We were swindled. Lost, must recognize. All responsibility for an offense, my shoulder undertakes. Passes on me to order, the army sets out, retreats.”

At the same time was saying, Ju Zi(orange) has turned around, in big strides goes in the direction of Sun-Moon Empire army. Her sound also through amplifying Soul Guidance Device spreads by far.

“Huo Yuhao, this time, we admitted defeat. However, among us the fight, just started, the hope next time, you have like this good luck. The Sun-Moon Empire subordinate, removes!”

Sun-Moon Empire numerous powerhouses, Soul Engineer Corp retreat slowly. When blood energy of innermost feelings ascension returns to normal gradually, these Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses also secretly relaxed. Did not need to challenge that terrifying fellow finally.

Although seems, his consumption was close to the limit, but, has that giant corpse Ice Bear King, has not known he who when can erupt, such fight, nobody is willing to continue. Nobody reason goes all out with him again.

The life of person, has one time after all!

The light ray glitters around the Huo Yuhao body, he is absorbing Ice Element in air to supplement oneself rapidly.

Today, he can insist now, relies on is the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus formidable resilience.

The Ju Zi(orange) sound he listens is very clear, in his heart even somewhat sighed, in fact, he really also has the card in a hand. If not the reasons of numerous card in a hand, he is impossible to propose that selects ten this not too realistic forms of combat.

storing ring of Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp that regimental commander, in Huo Yuhao. There said goodbye did not have, to decide to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball specially many, but also many nine levels.

If compelled really anxiously, in own security did not have under the premise of guarantee, Huo Yuhao wanted not to attend to exposing itself to strike to kill the risk of Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp, uses these to install Soul Guidance Cannon to shoot surely.

These gadget, may be nine levels! Facing Sun-Moon Empire these Soul Engineer Corp, is sole nine levels of Soul Engineer, the effect will not be bad. At least, wins enough relaxation time not to have the too major problem to him.

Huo Yuhao also clear remembering, initially Teacher Xuan once was Second White has customized one ultra enormous surely installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball launcher. That gadget withstands any rank to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball multilaunching sufficiently surely.

Ju Zi(orange) truly is intelligent . Moreover, has the brave soldier to break the determination of wrist very much.

Exposes itself to strike to kill Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp regarding the present, is not anything. Holy Spirit Cult died in battle two Transcendent Douluo, Cult Master lost, oneself also saved the Xiaotao elder sister. In this case, the Holy Spirit Cult overall strength surely is the sharp drop, if Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family has not used, that also too waste.

Therefore, frames by planting stolen goods on them to be not quite important. More importantly, can kill some Sun-Moon Empire nine levels of Soul Engineer. If these nine levels of Soul Engineer die again. Then, restricts the strength of Shrek Academy top powerhouse large scale to weaken, to that time, hey!

Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp removed by far. Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, this place is unsafe, went back to say first again.

When he must jump down from the body of Ice Bear King Second White, suddenly, a strange feeling spreads over the whole body. That feeling, looked like oneself whole person is blocked the throat suddenly generally.

It is not good!

In the Huo Yuhao heart cries, going all out stimulation of movement own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, tries to work loose this feeling. However, some late, his present strength, compared with the peak, is really the phase difference too much and are too many.

Faint trace black air/Qi is quietly spreads from Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, behind Huo Yuhao, a black form appears quietly. A handle jet black such as short dagger of black ink, maliciously behind the position insertion of cervical vertebra toward Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao at this time, only thought that whole body was blocked. The whole person cannot the move slightest. To fend cannot achieve completely.

In this important time, suddenly, a swift and fierce severe howl resounds. The Purple gold colored light glow is almost is similar to Teleportation is together common, appeared on Huo Yuhao suddenly.

“Pū!”The black dagger pricked the body of Huo Yuhao as before, but, behind Huo Yuhao, actually slowly reappeared a form. The whole body is blooming Purple gold colored light glow Tang Wutong.

When Ju Zi(orange) announced repulsed the enemy, Tang Wutong is the first person who flushed from Shrek Academy. She most understands the Huo Yuhao strength, when she noticed that Huo Yuhao on the Ice Bear King shoulder rocks, she knows that this time is not an attire. Yuhao fought before consumes was too big, but also was injured.

Therefore, she must rush to side her man immediately, protects him, treats and cures him.

Form when that black air current gushes out appears behind Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong has been away from his less than hundred meters. In an instant, she is burning her Soul Power, in the way of Martial Soul Fusion technique, invests into Huo Yuhao behind.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong altogether four big Martial Soul Fusion techniques, final one, is Ice Frost Solo Dance, Raiment of Light.

This is a synthesis technique, can make their strengths fuse in together, bursts out more formidable battle efficiency.

When they display, each other strength will also pull closer the opposite party, Tang Wutong is in this manner, in addition Teleportation, making oneself attach on Huo Yuhao. When that short dagger punctures, she is also prompt and Huo Yuhao separates. With own body, withstood this has struck.

In the stuffy pshaw, on Tang Wutong bursts out formidable aura beyond description suddenly, Purple gold colored light makes her as if behind a Huo Yuhao purple Sun, the intense Light aura makes these black air currents surge immediately crazily, but attacks actually has no way to arrive to Huo Yuhao on again.

Huo Yuhao can move finally, when he has turned around, when sees from the Tang Wutong right chest place prominent black sword blade edge, the whole person only thought that own brain as if must blast out.

The left hand finds out suddenly, hugs into to cherish Tang Wutong, Huo Yuhao rave, the right fist rumbles outrageously, rumbles in the airborne shadow toward that condensation.

Without a doubt, this shadow is the strength of god of death, came from the Grim Reaper Devil Puppet strength. Yes, Zongli Wu does not have to escape from beginning to end, his strength, already quietly attached on Huo Yuhao. Even if Spiritual Detection cannot detect.

Weakest, most relaxes to Huo Yuhao. The strength of this god of death suddenly erupts. The Zongli Wu goal, from the beginning is Huo Yuhao and corpse Ice Bear King Second White, this Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master, has had the subsequent party.

Appearance that light shadow is quietly together behind Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong looks is very clear, this light shadow is one has the man of golden long hair, he is with smile on the face, the double pupil is actually glittering the different rays, in an eye, is the black whirlpool. Another eye is actually the Bai Se (White Color) whirlpool, seems incomparable strange.

A special aura, appears on Huo Yuhao. That fist that he rumbles, is the golden ray, but arrives at the halfway, actually instantaneously transformed whirlpool light beam that for the black and white bi-color circles.

“Pū”in fist glow bang that black light shadow, black light shadow just started also tries to resist, but in an instant, the Huo Yuhao back golden hair light shadow sudden ray spreads. That black and white bi-color ray burst out one strange strength instantaneously.

Tang Wutong feels, is thick moved and sad intent. Then, that black light shadow, had been twisted the fragment, changes into the innumerable mist, disappears in the midair.

Three also three, asked the monthly ticket!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-584-part-2





Volume 12

#584 - The Tang Three, Small Dances, Read The Ice Friendly


Inside and outside ten. In shrubberies.

Zongli Wu stuffy snort|hum, in mouth the blood spurts crazily. Face whiten like paper. This time, he true receive heavy wound.

Beast Spirit no doubt fuses with him, but that is also not the complete fusion. Part of souls integrate. But he keeps on Huo Yuhao, is his Martial Soul avatar, even can be said as the Martial Soul main body, Grim Reaper Devil Puppet.

It looks like in Zongli Wu, weak Huo Yuhao mind relaxes, is the best getting rid opportunity. His Grim Reaper Devil Puppet does not seem that simple like the surface, although was compelled by Huo Yuhao, but in fact, actually as before can attach on Huo Yuhao. This attachment, takes dead souls as the premise.

Simply speaking, is, Huo Yuhao has killed a person, on him will be disturbed on some dead air/Qi, this type of dead air/Qi will not exist too for a long time, the time is long, voluntarily will dissipate.

But Zongli Wu Grim Reaper Devil Puppet, can actually attach above this dead air/Qi. The dead air/Qi invisible does not have, even if Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power is strong, is unable to discover. But Zongli Wu can actually stick out suddenly by own Grim Reaper Devil Puppet offends somebody.

If the Huo Yuhao strength maintains under peak condition, this sneak attack naturally is for him useless. Is relying on formidable Soul Power, he can work loose directly, even counter-attacks.

But, what Grim Reaper Devil Puppet most excels is the sneak attack! Fights successively that many, the last attack relies on Demonic Engraving God Knife to add on the technique release of Tang Sect secret art Yama's Invitation, the vigor strongly under that strikes. If not so, where has is so easy to strike to kill nine levels of Soul Engineer, and shocks the audience?

This time Huo Yuhao was too weak, weakly to letting Zongli Wu saw the opportunity. This opportunity also truly is very good, therefore Zongli Wu has succeeded, his Grim Reaper Devil Puppet has sneak attacked Huo Yuhao successfully.

What a pity, he has forgotten, after this selects ten fights had ended, Huo Yuhao no longer is a person. He also has the partner, has friend. More importantly, lover.

Tang Wutong receives heavy wound with oneself body is the price, was Huo Yuhao withstands this has struck. Has given the Huo Yuhao cushion time. But in a fist that Huo Yuhao rumbles finally, finally made him about one step comprehend. Power of Emotion.

Hao-Dong Three Absolutes, after Tang Wutong returns to the Huo Yuhao side, lost the function.

But, in a moment ago, Huo Yuhao clearly felt that oneself must lose Tang Wutong, in that flash, in the past missing to Dong'er and pain, instantaneous ascension. Oneself planted mood seed takes root to germinate finally, that fist, it can be said that condensed the Hao-Dong Three Absolutes essence to be. Power of Emotion inspiring, the mood, mind, Soul Power as well as the thought of Huo Yuhao grief and indignation, all condenses above that fist. Then bang stiffly has broken to pieces Grim Reaper Devil Puppet.

Martial Soul was broken to pieces, Zongli Wu received heavy wound immediately, this wound even is irreversible. First made his Soul Power drop directly two-level. Moreover possibility that needs to recuperate for a long time.

After Huo Yuhao rumbles this fist, approached the oil lamp to be completely dry, but he actually as before tight is holding Tang Wutong.

Grim Reaper Devil Puppet died, that handle condenses the short dagger that becomes also to dissipate with the strength of god of death. But the intense death air/Qi as before crazily is actually attacking in Tang Wutong within the body.

The Purple gold colored light corona started becomes gloomy, on the elegant face of Tang Wutong is the scarlet completely sheds.

Huo Yuhao visits her, the tooth fastens to nip, whole body in fierce is shivering.

“Wutong and Wutong......”

Light golden ray from the Tang Wutong forehead bright. That makes the golden trident design that Huo Yuhao once somewhat resented appear. Looked like on the Tang Wutong forehead were also many vertical eye.

But the golden form that Huo Yuhao behind, formerly dissipated also appears.

“Rong Nianbing, your what meaning?”The ice-cold sound resounds, but this sound actually only then Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong can hear.

“Any meaning Ah? I have not looked for a successor to myself. I thought that Yuhao is very appropriate. The sincere feeling truehearted nature, is a good child. Moreover you looked that he started to comprehend to my Power of Emotion. This way. Soon, he can inherit the position of my Gods truly.”

“Rong Nianbing! Do you know that he is the person who I select?”The ice-cold sound resounds once more.

“Does not know! Although I have paid attention, sees you and his some occurring together. May see each time, is you are suffering him, to maltreat him. Also has not had anything to direct to him. You look at me, the seed of my Gods gave him. Sorry! Tang brother, you came late.”

“You”the ice-cold sound suddenly becomes angry.

Hears here, Huo Yuhao could not insist finally, an intense dizzy transmission, a brain paleness, but he actually as before tight was hugging Tang Wutong, fainted.

......

God Realm.

Around high mountain peak white clouds misty. The fairyism lingers, dark fragrant fluctuation.

On the summit is standing two people, has two people.

A man of blue long gown, after the brain, the blue long hair hangs loose, has hung the ground. In the hand grasps is sparkling the radiant ray golden trident.

In him opposite, is standing is also a man, but actually wears the Bai Se (White Color) chef clothing, but has not worn the chef's hat. Both hands surround in the front.

“Rong Nianbing, if today you do not give me a reasonable explanation, do not want to leave!”Makes the male voice blue low and deep was roaring.

Rong Nianbing shows a faint smile, “Tang San, like this. The good seedling not to be good to look, has bumped into, I cannot miss. Moreover, I misunderstood. I think that you are the specially repugnant that boy. I thought that he and your daughter is thick as thieves, has actually been stopped by you, is very pitiful. You should not satisfy his family background, therefore such to him. You looked that now is good, I pass to him the position of Gods, he and your daughter was a match. Said that I am also first-level Gods. Although with your this Law Enforcer also a little disparity, but also differs not many.”

“You”the Tang San look suddenly becomes bone-chilling cold, “Rong Nianbing, you dare saying that you don't know my goal? In front of the honorable people did not tell the lie, takes back the position of your Gods, this matter such considers as finished. Otherwise, do not blame me not being impolite.”

Rong Nianbing both hands change to hold the head, “line, do not install. Your what temperament haven't I known? You is a good-hearted person, will not violate the God Realm custom completely, I have not offended the God Realm article of law, you radically not to the reason that I begin. This matter this. You look for one again.”

Tang San cold sound track: “You said with ease, where do you make on me look again? You think that is individual can inherit the position of my Gods? These years, your fellows are one by one lazy, all pressure load bearings on me. Recently if were not God Realm is not steady, my monitoring to the Huo Yuhao has relaxed, how to make you go well?”

Rong Nianbing said: “Takes back the position of Gods is impossible, this child started to comprehend my Power of Emotion. At this time took back, will have the irreversible wound to him. We do not have the means to affect them to practice the development. Once this wound emergence, even if you, did not have the means to make him inherit the position of your Gods.”

“I acknowledged that this time matter I am do is not quite typical. Like this, before Yuhao grows truly, God Realm, I help you share. Until Yuhao can assume sole responsibility for an important task, I exit to loaf again. How?”

Tang San sighed, on the face revealed a forced smile, what “I pursued was free! Don't you know?”

Rong Nianbing ill-humored [say / way]: “Amn't I? Also was not good and evil these two shameless Godking runs. Moreover runs is so quick, thus caused God Realm not to be steady, otherwise you did not need to be so laborious.”

One hear of he mentioned that good and evil two big Godking, the face muscle of Tang San twitched.

“Rong Nianbing, this time matter, we have not ended. I cannot be what kind to you. However, do not forget, since you have robbed Huo Yuhao, from now on, I will again not regard him am my inheritance regard. But Wutong is my daughter. Wants with my daughter in the same place, is not easy.”Tang San wicked saying.

Rong Nianbing said in consternation: “Won't you be intense? Tang San, do not go too far.”

Tang San coldly snorted, “that looked at your performance. You completed your commitment to say first again. Had not seen my daughters for that did mix the boy injured? My daughter and I am the blood relationship am close, I can come slightly the working sentiment using the God Realm article of law reasonably. But you, actually anything did not do. Only if that boy inspires your mood Gods once more.”

Rong Nianbing brow tight wrinkle, “Yuhao this child is very pitiful, Tang San, you let off him. How gives me to select the face?”

The Tang San big sleeve wields, person fluttered, integrates in the fog to vanish does not see.

On the Rong Nianbing face reveals a helplessness, shook the head, the [say / way] that thought aloud: “Yuhao Yuhao, is not I do not help you. But does not have the means! Who made you like on others daughter? However, hey. Pulls a tooth from the Tang San tigers mouth, this feeling is really good yeah. Ha Ha!”

“San Ge. Such considers as finished? Rong Nianbing that fellow was too hateful!”

“Xiao Wu, you think really I will lose to him? If were not I have let loose to the blockade of Huo Yuhao aura, you think that Rong Nianbing can feel his existence?”

“Ah? are you intentionally? Why? You did not plan that makes Yuhao inherit your God Position?”

“Most suitable is best. Rong Nianbing God Position suits him compared with me. Moreover, perhaps in a short time, I cannot inherit God Position. God Realm not only is in itself not steady, perhaps some time ago, my far view celestial phenomenon, soon, will have a big change. Concrete is any present has not known. Two Godking are not, I must hold God Position to solve this matter. Our roaming through plans, must retard. Sorry.”

“Do not say, regardless of where, so long as with you in the same place, I were very happy.”

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-584-part-3





Volume 12

#585 - Flamings The Rubber! Fire Of Ma Xiaotao Acme


When Huo Yuhao sobers from the deep sleep, outside is the star light all over the sky.

The whole body has sour pain of not being able saying that but while being sore, as if also has the innumerable vigor to burst out outward.

With the recovery of mind, the vitality of his whole person also restores, within the body Soul Power starts to flow, but in regards slightly, he clear seeing, own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus very stably is revolving.

Moreover, compared with before, his Dual Soul Nucleus had the progress obviously.

When Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus just took shape, whirlpool Soul Power that produces, the size is not completely unified, changes along with his breath and Soul Power and Spiritual Power fluctuation.

But now appears changed, under two big Soul Nucleus strengths each other collide, whirlpool Soul Power unexpectedly big or medium are completely same, moreover before compares, even if biggest whirlpool Soul Power is inferior to the present. Moreover, that whirlpool is very stable, Soul Power condenses, [gold/metal] blue bi-color. Spiritual Power and Absolute Ice coexist.

Although mind and body somewhat are weary, but Soul Power in within the body actually restored in peak condition, and has the so obvious progress, does not need to ask that definitely cultivated for has promoted.

This is Absolute squeezes own potential, Dual Soul Nucleus fuses the formation gradually completely the advantage. This time selected ten challenges not to waste, has served the Huo Yuhao original purpose.

However, excited is only the flash, along with the recovery of memory, Huo Yuhao recalled the situation before oneself to lose consciousness immediately. Almost is the instantaneous body, has jumped down the bunk.

Wutong, Wutong how? She where?

Almost is only the thought moves, his Spiritual Power outward has covered. He discovered immediately that he is in Sea God Pavilion, but Tang Wutong, in the side not far room.

Three and do two steps. Huo Yuhao fast rushed to the Tang Wutong room.

In the Tang Wutong room, Xiao Xiao is sitting in the bedside, is taking care of him. Other people have not existed, see Huo Yuhao to come. Xiao Xiao hurried to give the hand signal of keeping silent to him.

The double fist of Huo Yuhao grips subconsciously tightly, formerly also the somewhat hazy condition completely sobered.

“Xiao Xiao, Wutong how?”Huo Yuhao asked in a low voice.

Xiao Xiao shaking the head of gently, stands up, draws him to walk outward.

Out arrives, Xiao Xiao look somewhat complex looks to Huo Yuhao, in their this generation of Shrek Seven Devils, sentimental road roughest was Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong this is right. Even if First Senior Brother. Now already with Little Ya in same place.

“Yuhao, you are calm.”Xiao Xiao understood Tang Wutong very much in the Huo Yuhao heart is what kind of status.

Huo Yuhao heart one tight, takes a deep breath, then sinking sound track: “Said that I am very calm. At least Wutong is also living.”

Xiao Xiao said: “The Wutong situation is not quite good, Old Zhuang looking. In her within the body, had the intense death aura to occupy, these death aura, were her own Soul Power are unable to melt, each other has pestered with her Soul Power and Spiritual Power in one. Has sealed up the consciousness of Wutong. Therefore she will fall into to lose consciousness. Now no one has the means to draw out that death aura, because of such words of doing, will possibly injure to Wutong itself. Only can rely on her willpower. When her own Soul Power and Spiritual Power can all repel the strength of these deaths, she can restore.”

Huo Yuhao sip tightened the lip, to lose consciousness, Wutong to lose consciousness.

Initially, Wang Dong'er was to lose consciousness, he returned to Wang Dong'er Clear Sky Sect, now, Wutong also to lose consciousness. Also can make same mistakes over again?

This time, if sends back her again. Huo Yuhao did not have the face to see Clear Sky Sect two sect master.

Xiao Xiao sighed, said: “You already to lose consciousness three days. Yuhao. Do not worry, Wutong will be certainly good.”

The Huo Yuhao sinking sound asked: “These three days, can the death aura of her within the body once reduce?”

Xiao Xiao has hesitated, is not cruel enough to deceive Huo Yuhao eventually, shaking the head of gently.

Closing eyes of Huo Yuhao pain, crashes in the room, falls down in the Tang Wutong bedside, closely grips her hand.

The hand of Tang Wutong is very cool, her elegant face is a paleness. It seems does not have the half minute scarlet. The life aura is weak pity.

The words that Soul Power slight searching enters Tang Wutong within the body, before Huo Yuhao understands Xiao Xiao, spoke immediately. Right, the Tang Wutong present condition, cannot save her with any method.

Soul Power of her within the body becomes the disorder, should be Purple gold color Soul Power, now were many grey-black colored, this grey-black colored integrates in Soul Power completely, even also integrated her bloodlines. Luckily, in internal organs of Tang Wutong, as if the special strengths, protected the key position, otherwise, these death aura even likely wanted her life.

Huo Yuhao quickly on the explicit judgment, by own strength, is at least impossible to revive Wutong. He the best method, is brings Wutong to return to Clear Sky Sect now.

Only then Clear Sky Sect that two sect master, most understood that cultivating of Wutong is the condition, has the possibility to cure her.

Goes to there again, oneself have not protected her once again, how can face that two sect master? Huo Yuhao does not know. But, he naturally must go. One were how unimportant, more importantly, Wutong can be good.

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao set firm resolve quickly.

He was not initially that Huo Yuhao, although in the heart filled was sad and pain, but he has stood strongly. Was excessively sad at this time, can only be the spiritless performance. He needs be strong.

“Xiao Xiao, troubles you to look after Wutong, I handle a matter first, then comes back to lead her to treat.”Huo Yuhao said to Xiao Xiao.

Xiao Xiao nodded, said: “You feel relieved. Old Xuan making an exception allows me to enter Sea God Pavilion to look after Wutong. This time you make great merit for Academy. To make anything, you do. Needs us to help, everybody, must cure Wutong whole-heartedly.”

“Um.”Huo Yuhao after she signals by nodding, stride went out of the room.

Outside door, Old Xuan, Yan Shaozhe and Xian Lin'er already static there.

“Old Xuan.”Saw Old Xuan, the Huo Yuhao sound somewhat shivered immediately, in heart sad intent to rush forth.

Old Xuan has patted his shoulder, said: “Yuhao, should not be sad, sorry, is we have not protected you and Wutong.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Old Xuan, can the Sun-Moon Empire army once retreat?”

Old Xuan nodded, said: “Retreated, evidently, is draws back into to belonging to Sky Soul Empire. Is unclear as for the following trend, they to reconnoitering blockade fierce of.”

Huo Yuhao said: “According to the agreement, at least she temporarily will again not attack Academy. Old Xuan, my something give you, there are these things, at least can assure the Academy security. Please as soon as possible let Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire elite returns to the country respectively, prepares momentarily to deal with the attack from Sun-Moon Empire army.”

“At present, the Sun-Moon Empire army this time is damaged is also heavy, has ruined a Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp military strength, died in battle several nine levels of Soul Engineer, Holy Spirit Cult also receives heavy wound. They also require the time to carry on recuperation inevitably.”

Old Xuan received storing ring that Huo Yuhao hands over, said: “What is this?”

Huo Yuhao said: “This is I nine levels that in the hand snatches from that Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, as well as some Soul Guidance Device material reserves. And nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to have 15 surely. If the simultaneous firing, can make all within over a thousand square kilometers be reduced to ashes. Has them, the Academy self-preservation does not have any issue.”

Old Xuan grows the tone, Huo Yuhao this time could be said as by strength of the has solved the major problem to Academy really! Had these to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, truly did not need Star Luo and elite of Dou Ling two countries continues to guard. Also can spare the strength to cope with the Sun-Moon Empire army.

Let alone, selects ten fights, although does not have to complete completely, but Yuhao wins streak seven, not only heavy wound the opposite party powerhouse, is makes the imposing manner of Sun-Moon Empire army be attacked unprecedentedly, temporarily was contained.

“Yuhao, what do you then have to plan? The Wutong situation......”the Yan Shaozhe words are somewhat low and deep.

Huo Yuhao said: “Dean Yan, I must treat the good Xiaotao elder sister first, then I bring Wutong to seek medical help. Now only then her family member, might be able to cure her. This time goes, I do not know when can come back. However, please forgive, for me, the Wutong life, is bigger than all.”

Xian Lin'er said: “Good child, you to make going that anything feels relieved. I the temper that likes your this daring to like daring to hate, you are Academy do were many enough.”

Old Xuan has patted the shoulder of Huo Yuhao once more, “Yuhao, this time, you is a war become famous. If possible, sooner comes back, Academy needs you.”

“Yes. So long as the Wutong situation stabilizes, I earlier will certainly come back.”

Spoke these words, Huo Yuhao said goodbye to Old Xuan and two Dean, left Sea God Pavilion, after having done obeisance Golden Tree once more, to the far place, recited the incantation. Opens Gate of the Dead.

Jet black front door opening, in gazing after of Old Xuan and under two Dean, Huo Yuhao integrates in that darkness to vanish quietly does not see.

Looks the front door that snaps, Yan Shaozhe sighs one lightly, said: “This child has grown up, in this case, obtains the clear relative importance as before. I when this age, is well below him.”

Xian Lin'er sneers, “particularly sentimental.”

The Yan Shaozhe corners of the mouth twitched, has not refuted anything, in Xian Lin'er that this aspect he may say never.

Old Xuan said: “Shaozhe, convenes three-country commander immediately, we meet to determine in view of the Sun-Moon Empire plan as soon as possible. This Sun-Moon Empire withdraws, to us, although can relax, but following dealing is certainly correct. Otherwise, that War-God Empress likely once more takes to us to shock.”( to be continued )

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-585-part-1





Volume 12

#585 - Flamings The Rubber! Fire Of Ma Xiaotao Acme


undead Demi-plane.

The ray dodges, Huo Yuhao walked from Gate of the Dead. Comes out, seeing that he is startled, the distant place, is a sea of fire.

The undead aura that the pitiful yell sound and sad and shrill roaring sound, surge crazily, is erupting in that sea of fire or the sea of fire.

Is the undead Demi-plane owner, Huo Yuhao can feel clearly that the undead aura in entire undead Demi-plane, weakened at least 1%. This must formidable destructive power be able to achieve!

A long and loud cry sends out from the Huo Yuhao mouth suddenly, the tip of the toe in the ground, he has soared. With the lift-off of body, the Absolute Ice aura rapid outward diffusion of surge, the temperature in sky reduces rapidly. The snowflake, soars and coils around regarding the body of Huo Yuhao.

From the upper air bird's eye view, the clarity that can look, not far away, in a surrounding area dozens li (0.5km) range, is a sea of fire. Luckily, initially Huo Yuhao, when receives undead Demi-plane Ma Xiaotao, choice was not initially nearby the Soul Engineer Corp camp, the commodity that otherwise, in undead Demi-plane stockpiles must commit to flames.

This time Ma Xiaotao, looks like person Ferocious Beasts is ordinary, is battering in the ground. The place visited, various Undead Creature are reduced to ashes in the pitiful yell all.

Although her Absolute Fire is impure, but, has the greatly strengthened destructive power. Here Undead Creature does not even fear the sacred aura, but actually very dreads to her Absolute Fire. Various Undead Creature facing her Absolute Fire, are very difficult the strength of resistance.

Luckily, competitive Ma Xiaotao has enraged several Ice Dragon in undead Demi-plane, under several Ice Dragon collaborate, reluctantly contained her crazy slaughtering.

Huo Yuhao has patted the forehead, Second White obviously not. At that time to lose consciousness in the past, cannot make corpse Ice Bear King Second White. Otherwise, has the Second White direction, Ma Xiaotao will not have such strong destructiveness.

The Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain release, the Huo Yuhao long howl spreads by far, he is here control, with the promotion of strength, already obtained the approvals of all Undead Creature.

In this undead Demi-plane, most formidable Undead Creature is Ice Dragon, naturally, Second White not in this row. These Ice Dragon actual battle efficiencies reluctantly are also equal to Titled Douluo. Three Ice Dragon collaborate, reluctantly contained Ma Xiaotao. Is scarred, hears the Huo Yuhao long howl, immediately sends out low and deep dragon roar, requests reinforcements to him.

Ma Xiaotao as if feels the Huo Yuhao aura, turned head to airborne to look that in the eye pupil of her pair of dark red sent out the intense crazy flavor immediately, the personal enemy met, particularly was jealous!

Before she was thrown by Huo Yuhao, restored, started to slaughter everywhere. Slaughtered already by the Holy Spirit Cult portray in her bone.

At this time sees Huo Yuhao, roars, the phoenix wings flaps, is similar to the meteor reverse is ordinary, directly soars airborne Huo Yuhao to overrun.

Huo Yuhao from the sky anchors, Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain launches instantaneously, the formidable snow and ice storm forms a giant whirlpool immediately, takes away as many things as possible to Ma Xiaotao.

Although on mind, Huo Yuhao somewhat is weary, but is relying on the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus formidable resiliency, his Soul Power actually already fully restored.

In this case, is Ma Xiaotao possibly his match?

Absolute Ice comprehensive suppression. Ma Xiaotao looks like in the moth that in Snowstorm struggles. She has been fighting before, consumption was very big, faces Huo Yuhao again, own Soul Power was affected by Absolute Ice, continually under consumption, finally Soul Power consumption completely. When she wants to detonate oneself Soul Nucleus finally crazily. Huo Yuhao rushes instantaneously, fetters firmly her with Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain.

Brings Ma Xiaotao to fall in the ground, looks at the body to be frozen stiff, she who the expression actually as before is full of the wild flavor, Huo Yuhao heaved a deep sigh.

“Elder sister, I am unfair to you. Is I cannot save you earlier, makes you turn into this appearance.”At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao stretches out the arms, supporting gently lives in Ma Xiaotao.

His within the body received the injury of that demon magic knife also already to heal and recover completely under the formidable vitality function, at this time within the body Soul Power surge, under his hug, the Absolute Ice prestige can immediately all-around permeated to Ma Xiaotao within the body, is suppressing her within the body evil fire.

Ma Xiaotao Soul Power under the function of Soul Nucleus, just started to restore, after Absolute Ice of this powerful emerges, her Soul Nucleus becomes slow.

Huo Yuhao holds her to sit cross-legged to sit down, then sits in the Ma Xiaotao opposite, attracts the double palm of Ma Xiaotao with the method of Controlling Crane Capturing Dragon, four palms relative. Is mixing Spiritual Power pure incomparable Absolute Ice Soul Power, searches into Ma Xiaotao within the body slowly.

Soul Power entered the Ma Xiaotao meridians, the heart of Huo Yuhao slightly twitched. The Ma Xiaotao situation and Tang Wutong are different, Tang Wutong was corroded by the death aura comprehensively, but Ma Xiaotao was disturbed by the evil aura. On the other hand, the Ma Xiaotao situation seems much better, but, the meridians, skeleton and the internal organs her within the body receive the evil aura etching time is very long, instead is more troublesome. Especially, her spiritual sea received the intense attack of evil aura.

However, present Huo Yuhao was not initially is the Ma Xiaotao treatment time. At that time, he in fact is at a loss, can only rely on own Absolute Ice Soul Power to suppress as far as possible. But is now different, his Spiritual Power initially did not know formidable many compared with it.

Under the precision control of Huo Yuhao, his Soul Power is suppressing the Ma Xiaotao evil fire forcefully, simultaneously starts to unravel, guides little evil aura of her within the body, these evil auras just started is very difficult to be guided successfully. But recited the incantation along with Huo Yuhao, Power of Purification slow after integrating in the Ma Xiaotao meridians. These evil auras became are obedient many. Or was purified directly.

Absolute Ice and formidable Spiritual Power, in addition Power of Purification. Doing three things at once. Is washing each part of Ma Xiaotao body slowly. The evil aura 11 will melt, but fire attribute Soul Power must retain.

The beforehand extreme consumption showed the enormous advantage at this time, did not have huge Soul Power, had been limited the resiliency by Huo Yuhao, this made Huo Yuhao be able in starting to aim at the body of this Ma Xiaotao to start.

Has used the free time of six double-hour, Huo Yuhao clean that the evil aura of her within the body melts. Then, was spiritual sea.

Only then also melts the evil aura in spiritual sea, Ma Xiaotao can true sobers.

This without doubt is an extremely difficult process. Complex of spiritual sea can be imagined, let alone both sides completely oppose.

After the careful thinking, Huo Yuhao decided finally that carries on with quite the way of risk. Because cannot delay. Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea is releasing the evil aura throughout outward, if cannot clean it thoroughly, before is very possible, all that makes put to the running water.

The thought moves slightly, Huo Yuhao Soul Expropiation fell on Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea.

Soul Expropiation can make anybody's mind defensive power reduce zero instantaneously. All mind defenses disintegrate completely.

After Soul Expropiation completes, Huo Yuhao has displayed rapidly Soul Shaking Burst.

Under his precision control, this Soul Shaking Burst might, only then in normal condition one-fifth. Through the fluctuation of Soul Shaking Burst, causes Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea big change. Also while this opportunity, Huo Yuhao coerced one slightly to roll Power of Purification to enter in own Spiritual Power Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea.

Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea, completely is dark red. If Huo Yuhao spiritual sea is golden sea, then, her spiritual sea is the dark red rock magma.

Power of Purification integrates one, immediately, rock magma ebullition. Flake dark red rock magma turned into the golden red. But also crazy counter-attacks to Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power.

Effective!

Huo Yuhao has made accurate judgment immediately, no longer retains, will be coercing Power of Purification releases completely. Immediately, the gentle Bai Se (White Color) ray has covered big piece of spiritual sea, has carried out the life-and-death fight with that evil aura.

Huo Yuhao while this opportunity, lifts right hand, a direction in the Ma Xiaotao between the eyebrows place, Power of Purification starts injection continuously to Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea.

Under the strength of protection Huo Yuhao their mind, these Power of Purification will not destroy to the brain of Ma Xiaotao absolutely. Moreover ingenuity that very he controls, starts from the Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea core position completely, such Power of Purification from central spread, not some important organs of premature moving around to Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea.

Time one minute one second passed, on the Ma Xiaotao face the ferocious expression starts to restrain gradually, the gloomy face also started one to be fair and ruddy. Evil aura every little bit was being melted.

The Huo Yuhao whole body is similar to the steamer general, the massive mist emit from him, transpiration in air.

This is also his sufficiently compares favorably with Limit Douluo formidable Spiritual Power, has changed another person, already collapsed.

He must supplement continually Soul Expropiation exerts on Ma Xiaotao, this can guarantee that own Power of Purification continues to pour into.

, Soul Power of Ma Xiaotao within the body is restoring under the Soul Nucleus function gradually. In her these Soul Power, has the evil aura to exist as before, but compared before, must desalinate were too many. But is sealed up by Huo Yuhao because of spiritual sea now, she does not have the means to carry on any motion. Is closing eyes, on elegant face the non- fashion reveals the color of pain.

Finally, the last evil aura in spiritual sea was melted by Power of Purification completely. Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, takes back the finger slowly, presses on her palm. Own Absolute Ice Soul Power swarms to enter. That ice-cold chill in the air made Ma Xiaotao hit to tremble immediately smartly spirit, opens eyes.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-585-part-2





Volume 12

#585 - Flamings The Rubber! Fire Of Ma Under Xiaotao Acme


Just the opening eyes pupil, Ma Xiaotao appeared somewhat confused, when but she saw front Huo Yuhao, started the soul gradually.

On the elegant face, reveals several points of pleasantly surprised color, wanted to say anything, but felt Huo Yuhao that to emerge more powerful Absolute Ice Soul Power immediately. Hurries to hold the Yuan normalizing, revolution Soul Power and Huo Yuhao coordination.

Her coordinates from the beginning, must become smooth many. In Huo Yuhao formidable Yin-Yang Supplement double mixes Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus Spiritual Power under frightens formidable. Terrifying Soul Power sweeps across, quick, clears off the evil aura of her within the body. Meanwhile was purified by Huo Yuhao, Ma Xiaotao massive Soul Power.

After all, many Soul Power have filled the impurity of evil aura, does not purify in light of this, will only continue to affect her.

The Huo Yuhao double palm takes back, grows tone.

Ma Xiaotao is also takes a deep breath, the relaxedness that the whole body could not say, but also somewhat was void. The strength drops large scale, not only did not have Absolute Fire, but, fell including Soul Power close one-third. Although the following restoration will be quick, but, she also knows that her Martial Soul itself has the issue, if cultivated to restore, within the body evil aura also likely therefore restored part, the issue eventually also. But was good because of this time mind restored normally.

In this time, on Huo Yuhao ray is dodging, were many a jade box.

The jade box opens, together the golden red presents in front of just like the honey general grease Ma Xiaotao, the light fragrance is mixing extremely rich pure fire element, immediately makes Ma Xiaotao look at the looking blank eyeball.

Huo Yuhao gathers in front of Ma Xiaotao, feeds in Flaming Mucilage in that jade box the Ma Xiaotao mouth directly little.

Ma Xiaotao has not spoken throughout, has not rejected, little swallowed these Flaming Mucilage, in the eye socket was actually gathering completely the tears.

“Elder sister, sorry, I came late. Let you receive these many painstakingly. This time, I helped certainly you permanently cure your problem. From now henceforth, you are true Absolute Fire Soul Master. Does not need to worry for the evil aura. This is Flaming Mucilage, is a fire is the Absolute Immortal Herb essence, breeds for at least ten thousand years to appear.”

Flaming Mucilage enters the abdomen, rich fire element ascends in within the body. Formerly weak feeling was almost is substituted by the full feeling instantaneously. The Ma Xiaotao whole body spills over moving rose. The rich fire element fluctuation starts to continue to increase.

At this time, Huo Yuhao could not help her. If his Absolute Ice entered at this time to Ma Xiaotao within the body again, then, can only plays the reaction. Then, how broken cocoon to become butterfly, that is Ma Xiaotao own practice process.

Regarding the Flaming Mucilage prestige energy, Huo Yuhao did not suspect. Initially for this bulk Flaming Mucilage, he almost pressed out to do Infernal Delicate Apricot. A 100,000 years of Soul Beast essence, helped Ma Xiaotao purify her Martial Soul sufficiently completely.

Ma Xiaotao entered the sitting in meditation condition quickly, Huo Yuhao also finally grows the tone. Finally cured the elder sister. This also one of the he maximum several wishes.

He does not have to leave in light of this, but sits in the Ma Xiaotao opposite, is running own Soul Power silently, was resuming formerly consumption. Also for Ma Xiaotao protector.

The absorption of Flaming Mucilage, is quicker than the imagination . A double-hour, Ma Xiaotao aura started to have the earth-shaking change.

Around her body, the temperature in air continues to rise, the ground under body turned into dark red. With the breath, light golden red ray floods in 20 meters in diameter range. Huo Yuhao that scalding hot aura, forces has to draw back is farther, to avoid being affected.

“Áng”the resonant phoenix cry sound resounds through the horizon. Sees only behind Ma Xiaotao, a pair of huge golden red phoenix wing opens suddenly.

Yes, this time is the golden red, but no longer is dark red, her own fire attribute aura also shoots up to the sky.

Ma Xiaotao makes an effort after flapping below the wings, bringing her tender body to break in the upper air. In an instant. In the sky seemed to be many a golden red Sun to be ordinary. The glare is shining the earth, causes innumerable Undead Creature to call out in grief.

Regarding Douluo Continent, the sunlight is the life important component, but in this undead Demi-plane, the so intense sunlight can only mean the destruction and death.

The Undead Creature majority in trembling knock down. Is waiting for arrival of this ruinous strength.

Luckily, all these are only temporary.

In the sky, the golden red ray restrains gradually, a Ma Xiaotao rush of blood to the head red long hair restored the gloss, each likely is the ruby wiredrawing becomes.

The tender body falls slowly, has arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao already stood up, visits her with smile on the face.

“Elder sister, welcome back.”Huo Yuhao smiles was saying.

Ma Xiaotao stretched out the arms, gives him one not to have the big hug of slit, the plentiful tender body was extruding the body of Huo Yuhao, making him somewhat suffocate, was somewhat awkward. But more is actually joyful and happy.

Gains ground, Ma Xiaotao in has kissed one that on his face made an effort, “younger brother, thanked.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, “was not the evening that I came. If can early, elder sister you not use by these many crimes.”

The face darken of Ma Xiaotao several points, “Holy Spirit Cult has owed me, sooner or later will make them also come back. Where is here? How these many Undead Creature? And looked that I killed one to say greatly again.”Saying, her was turning around to walk.

This state of mind restored, the irritable temper also restored similarly.

Huo Yuhao hurries to hold on her, narrated this undead Demi-plane origin simply, Ma Xiaotao then resentfully relinquishes.

“Elder sister, we exit. That side Academy, everybody also became impatient. Some of some of my also matters must process.”

Black Gate of the Dead opens, before Huo Yuhao brought Ma Xiaotao to return to Sea God Pavilion.

Sea God Pavilion is sending out light golden light as before, big Golden Tree, periphery familiar all. When Ma Xiaotao sees these, tears uncontrolled to rush forth, cannot help but knees down.

“Came back, I came back finally. Finally went home!”Ma Xiaotao cries loudly, this time she, only likely is a traveller far from home of going home, where has the appearance of least bit Titled Douluo powerhouse.

Since initially was seized now, had almost ten years, ten years such as dream! She always immerses during the evil aura and slaughters, unconscious. The midway was saved by Huo Yuhao after a period of time, she restrains forcefully, cannot maintain too for a long time. Afterward once again perished.

At this time, her Martial Soul sublimates finally, became true Absolute Fire Soul Master, the evil aura cannot become her puzzle, just like freshman.

Huo Yuhao kneels down side Ma Xiaotao, does not have to console her, these many years, she came under the enormous influence of evil aura after all, the mood in innermost feelings constrained was too fierce. Releases definitely very much to have the advantage to her.

Ma Xiaotao this cries, has continued of quarter, similarly some people have also left behind the tears, is not Huo Yuhao, but stands Shrek Academy Martial Soul Faculty Dean in front of Sea God Pavilion, Yan Shaozhe.

Finally when Ma Xiaotao cries was somewhat tired, gains ground sees Yan Shaozhe time, immediately is rending yells makes noise, “Teacher.”

An arrow step, she has jumped into the Yan Shaozhe bosom, weeps bitterly loudly.

She is Yan Shaozhe raises since childhood, priests and disciples affectionate. Yan Shaozhe do not have the child, has regarded the biological daughter to regard her, Ma Xiaotao has been missing these many years, he had not given up seeking. The boundless huge crowd, Ma Xiaotao was made by Holy Spirit Cult, how can unable to find!

At this time saw Ma Xiaotao not only came back, but also the state of mind has also replied normally, can Yan Shaozhe not the tears?

Ma Xiaotao this shocking weeping sound has also alarmed Ancient Elder, Ancient Elder walk successively from Sea God Pavilion.

Sees to restore normal Ma Xiaotao, on face reveals the gratified color all, finally came back . Moreover, was also Academy has added a strength. When Ma Xiaotao they may look with the strength that the Huo Yuhao fight shows in the eye. Although compares in Huo Yuhao also has disparity, but the whole, her talent still above Zhang Lexuan, had the standard of close Transcendent Douluo as before.

Before initially was seized, Ma Xiaotao is one of the Inner Court most outstanding students, now she returns finally, naturally is the big good deed.

When all people are excited, Huo Yuhao actually quietly enters Sea God Pavilion, arrives at the Tang Wutong room, static sat in her side.

“Xiao Xiao, do I want alone and Wutong later, Ok?”Huo Yuhao said in a soft voice.

Xiao Xiao nodded, turns around.

Looks that on the bed is lying down, face whiten Tang Wutong, on the Huo Yuhao face actually reveals a smile, gently reorganized the forehead both sides pink-blue color long hair for her, then light kiss on her fresh-faced tender face.

“I can do, has completed basically. Now the Sun-Moon Empire army retreats, the Xiaotao elder sister also came back, these two wishes had finished. Although also some matters can also need me, but, compared with them, you are most important. Our goes home, returns to your family, how regardless of two sect master to me, I must revive you. If you cannot live, then, where you go, where I go. In any case this whole life, whatever, I will not have separated with you, even if turns into a corpse.”

At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao fishes out a paper from bosom, above has written the character. Place nearby table on gently. Low and deep incantation sound gets up, Gate of the Dead opens quietly.

----------------------------------------------

Peerless Tang Sect final entire moon/month, third child recently really very diligently, is very laborious. Requested earnestly everybody Duoduo support, asked monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-585-part-3





Volume 12

#586 - Sacrificed For Her? On


This is Huo Yuhao first time uses Gate of the Dead in Sea God Pavilion, is really because, he is not willing to alarm other people again.?.. Such leaves, perhaps is the best choice. He does not even know whether he can also come back.

With the bed, sends in Tang Wutong undead Demi-plane, Huo Yuhao, leaves Sea God Pavilion quietly, had found in Ice Bear King Second White that in the Academy corner rests, returns to undead Demi-plane to protect Tang Wutong it. He is jumps, leaves Academy to go.

When Xiao Xiao arrives at the Tang Wutong room again, saw that has a white paper.

Quick, this white paper has delivered to front of Old Xuan.

“Old Xuan, First Senior Brother, division commanders and partners. I brought Wutong to walk. The Wutong situation is not very good, we are at a loss, I must lead her to seek medical help, regardless of pays what kind of price, I must cure her. She is in my life the most important constituent, if she is irretrievable, perhaps then, I again am unable tranquil going facing this world. Everybody takes care. Yuhao.”

The words are very light, but in that light words, Old Xuan and people, felt a deep weariness, came from the weariness of Huo Yuhao.

Yes! These many years, on his shoulder has been shouldering the thing were too many and are too many. Some Tang Wutong in the side, he at least have the mind pillar, but now Tang Chinese parasol tree by heavy wound, Huo Yuhao has been chosen departure deeply, no, said accurately he does not leave, but is goes is the Tang Wutong treatment. Tang Wutong can whether be good, will decide whether his heart can also change for the better. Ma Xiaotao standing silently side Old Xuan, the character that Huo Yuhao leaves behind she also looked, although she has not known that actually to have anything, but, this time she, in the look has actually filled firm and resolute.

Younger brother. Handles matter that you want to handle, your responsibility, the elder sister shouldered for you!

“Old Xuan, Yuhao like this left, he position in Sea God Pavilion, sits by me.”Ma Xiaotao said to Old Xuan.

Nobody will think Ma Xiaotao to seize power, when this entire Continent is precarious, the authority means the responsibility.

Old Xuan nod of silently. “Good.”

Ma Xiaotao looks to Old Xuan Xiao Xiao, said: “You are also the Tang Sect person, told me, in these days, side Yuhao that I left what happened.”

Left Shrek City, the feeling that some Huo Yuhao instead whole bodies relax, this feeling many years did not have, feel relaxed, perhaps with this word explained that his present feeling is best. Is Huo Yuhao joyful? He does not know, but. He at least feels relaxed. Threw finally temporarily actually all these, he cannot think really tube in society all, was only the protection side Tang Wutong.

If were not this Tang Wutong to lose consciousness. He is impossible to set firm resolve such to do. In his heart, are many, a lot to do. But now, is unimportant, compared with Tang Wutong, what these matters was considered as?

The ray from the sky glitters, the fog passed over gently and swiftly in the side. Huo Yuhao unknowingly has pushed to rise Absolute own speed. Within the body Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus with his mentality of this feeling relaxed, has as if agreed with, between both did not repel again, as if fuses from that Yin-Yang Supplement direction really mutually.

Whirlpool Soul Power produce in within the body. Surging. Through consumes again rapidly. This consumption, regarding Huo Yuhao. Is equal to radically not having.

Goes to Clear Sky Sect to be not near from Shrek Academy, but is not too far.

Clear Sky Sect in Sky Soul Empire, accurately said that now should be in Sun-Moon Empire.

The Huo Yuhao speed was too fast, without enough time catches his form to these upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device quickly, but, everything presents upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device in Huo Yuhao perception area, actually cannot escape his evil clutches.

Does not need to take any effort, since a throwing knife strikes has killed nine levels of Soul Engineer, Huo Yuhao to Tang Sect hidden weapon had new realizing from experience, looks like gives up affectation to be the same, that feeling is very wonderful. Therefore, even if widely separated by several kilometers, so long as is a scrap metal departs, destroys upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device Core Formation sufficiently. Thus its thorough destruction.

That feeling is very carefree, but present Huo Yuhao, pursue is this pleasant sensation. Therefore, his everywhere one visit, upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device had bad luck, does not know that many was destroyed by him.

Sun-Moon Empire army.

Ju Zi(orange) sitting silently in commander tent, her bearing the blame copy clerk just sent off, returns to Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City. This time, she lost. Loses is very miserable.

When the army retreats, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp and Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp vestiges also came back. Comes back, Evil Tyrant Commander Soul Engineer Corp must go all out with Evil Soul Master, two Soul Engineer Corp altogether surplus are less than 300 people, but actually shares a common hatred, enters the military compound, directly soars the Evil Soul Master base to go.

But this time Evil Soul Master, was actually a group of people without a leader, Zongli Wu disappears without a trace, moreover Evil Soul Master of Transcendent Douluo above level or was injured and either died in battle, the overall strength reduced greatly.

A big internecine strife erupted in the military compound directly.

After other Soul Engineer Corp hear the news, the goal of first catching up with put down a rebellion, but when they heard from Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp mouths that Holy Spirit Cult has sneak attacked them unexpectedly, making their these fellow soldier lose the serious time. Their eyes were also red.

Looked at Evil Soul Master pleasing to the eyes is not a day two days of matters. As the matter stands, in the entire military compound suddenly erupted the mutiny.

Such mutiny, even if in armed forces could not suppress by War-God Empress dignity of Ju Zi(orange).

The final result is, the Holy Spirit Cult powerhouses in military compound, the Titled Douluo above rank, almost ran away, but the Titled Douluo following rank, was all ripped the fragment by angry Soul Engineer.

Is this matter on the big strip, what Holy Spirit Cult? That is the national religion of Sun-Moon Empire! Even if they are Evil Soul Master clan/sect, but protects country god reputation also.

Numerous Commander Soul Engineer Corp, under the Evil Tyrant Commander Soul Engineer Corp leadership, kneels down in front of Ju Zi(orange), requested to punish.

But, at this time, can punish them really? First did not say, law does not punish numerous offenders, what is more important, these Soul Engineer Corp are the Ju Zi(orange) supporters!

Therefore, Ju Zi(orange) can only be is stationed the army in first temporarily belonging to Sky Soul Empire, then got up the bearing the blame copy clerk, waits for processing of emperor. Only has indicates the manner like this, is the best means that otherwise, was equal to revolting.

Yuhao, you really quite ruthless! Has said you to be tenderhearted, does your this give me to come hard look?

Others do not know that was who sneak attacks two Hand of the National Protector Soul Engineer Corp, Ju Zi(orange) has been able not to know? The Ice Attribute ability, undead summon ability, this Huo Yuhao has. Moreover, is Huo Yuhao that she told personally, Sun-Moon Empire must sneak attack Dou Ling Empire.

Yuhao Yuhao, you were really too intelligent, you can actually guess correctly what I must launch was the Decapitation Strike. The evening of although going, you can also maintain sober unexpectedly, lets my army civil strife with the way of this stratagem of sowing discord.

Yes, you prevailed. This, Sun-Moon Empire army civil strife, in addition the morale of troops is scattered in disorder, in a short time, did not have the means to get rid to attack again, let off the golden opportunity in vain. That side Dou Ling Empire also spreads the news, said that had the emperor's clan to be remaining, has used the shortest time, has reorganized the Dou Ling Empire capital, has not imagined the serious civil strife appearance.

If these matters and Huo Yuhao irrelevant, Ju Zi(orange) is will not believe in any event.

Yuhao, good Huo Yuhao! You imagine compared with me really also want fierce many. Did you also finally start in the war maturely?

Has you as the match, for me, does not know that is the good fortune or unfortunate. Yuhao, worthily is the man who I have a liking. Although you have brought such big trouble to me, why, am I unexpectedly very happy? Is because looks that my man did grow up?

Actually, I hope that you can become the king who rules in the future Continent, I certainly spare no effort will help if so you, our children, will be the future successors. That is I hopes to see to offend the perfect result, although I know, this result appears possibly approaches in zero infinitely.

Ju Zi(orange) detained all participated to attack the Holy Spirit Cult military officers, at least the face work must be done. But he has also comforted them, she is a armed forces head, had this problem, first responsibility for an offense in her, if your majesty blames, she can a strength undertake.

“Marshal, this matter and you have nothing to do, is we do. You are empire pillar, without you, we cannot destroy Sky Soul Empire, making entire Continent shiver. How can make you come for us to take punishment for somebody else?”Nine levels of Soul Engineer excited saying.

No one has thought that their this martial-looking female war-gods, actually will say a strength to undertake such words, she is an empress! Moreover is the marshal. She can definitely put the blame on all mistakes the interior mutinies. The army mutiny, is truly related with commander, is, the reason of this mutiny, made her get rid sufficiently punishes.

But she not only has not done, but also indicated that wants to shoulder the responsibility, this lets numerous Commander Soul Engineer Corp as well as consecrate, had the brand-new understanding to this empress. Dares to shoulder the responsibility commander, is any serviceman most is absolutely desired.

----------------------------------------------------

Why did not know, has thought recently specially tired, not only the body was tired, the heart was also tired. Sometimes, bewildered having a fit of temper. Loses temper with the wife, apologized to her. Perhaps, was the pressure is too big. 11 years unceasingly, full, in the future will create the duty that is used to give itself to arrange even to arrange for five and six years later. I stretch was too tight?

Recently in the brain also will have presented the new book the bridge section, had me to write very amusing thing, only then thinks these times, will feel that was stimulated and happy. Like the drug addict.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-586-part-1





Volume 12

#586 - Sacrificed For Her?


Ju Zi(orange) shaking the head of gently, said: “The responsibility of this matter originally in me. Is I issues the order, making Evil Tyrant and Emperor Dragon two Soul Engineer Corp attack Dou Ling Empire. Also only then from here, can obtain the accurate news. But the military action of this scale, I have no alternative but to report to Army Supervisor. Therefore, the responsibility in me, everybody was needless to say anything much. Since I said takes a strength to undertake, is a strength undertakes. Even if considered from the benefit, but punishes me, can preserve the mainstays of your empire finally.”

The Ju Zi(orange) sound is very tranquil, but listens in the numerous position Soul Engineer ear actually tranquil? Suddenly, numerous position Soul Engineer lowered the head.

They are very clear, this time matter will be what kind of responsibility. Person who the attack protects the country god arbitrarily, even if there is evidence and rational. This is also equal to at the rebellion! The rebellion big crime, this wants the extermination nine generations. Yes! Ju Zi(orange) undertakes all these for them, truly can fall to lowly the loss, Ju Zi(orange) is any status they knows.

Initially, this War-God Empress by the orphan who your majesty rescued, for this point, when Xu Tianran decided to marry Ju Zi(orange), but also received has criticized much. Does not have the empress of backstage, is Imperial Family does not permit.

If not Xu Tianran resists opposition, Ju Zi(orange) radically could not become the empress. But now this does not have the status and background actually became the best situation, because she is alone in the world, even if the responsibility for an offense is heavy, so long as she undertakes, is only crime one person.

But, she is an empress! Is War-God Empress. Although she appears that tranquil, but these can Soul Engineer be tranquil?

“Wish to undertake with the marshal together. Although dies not regrets.”A Commander Soul Engineer Corp the knees knees down, has done obeisance to empress. His pays respect to the courtesy of king, as Commander Soul Engineer Corp, besides the king, nobody can make his knees kneel down.

Had first to have second, in quick, entire commander tent has knelt a piece.

Ju Zi(orange) has also knelt, this time she. On the face the expression cannot maintain tranquil. Tears uncontrolled flowing under.

“Thank fellow soldier concentricity. However, this matter, Ju Zi(orange) must alone undertake as before, the empire cannot do without you. I here. One small request, invited to comply.”

Oldest nine levels of Soul Engineer gained ground, looks to Ju Zi(orange), the look is somewhat fierce, but has actually filled sincere.

“empress please say. So long as is we can achieve.”In this old Soul Engineer heart had a resolution, at this time, truly was undertakes by Ju Zi(orange) is the best situation, because she may be able to escape the responsibility for an offense very much, after all, she has that many merits. It is not necessarily able dead. But they. If takes punishment for somebody else, actually must die without doubt. Holy Spirit Cult will not let off them, military law will not let off them.

Ju Zi(orange) said: “Has trust, although I die not regret, but the crown prince is young. If I died. In the future will have another empress. I am only a mother's status plead now, please preserve the crown prince, lets his joyful growth, even if will be will not be the emperor in the future, nothing. So long as he safely good.”

This moment Ju Zi(orange), appears very timid, even filled feared and sad. But also this condition she. Most can touch the will of the people. Able to move unhindered invincible War-God Empress, so weak side will show before them holds the lofty one, such atmosphere, even if the blood and iron servicemen cannot bear.

Another nine levels of Soul Engineer stood up suddenly, goes forward to support by the arm Ju Zi(orange), “marshal. No matter, I will stand this side you. You will not die, everybody will not die. Our commander, but the entire empire surpasses two-thirds strengths. We......”

“Shut up.”The old Soul Engineer tian eye shouted angrily, “do you want to lose the lives of all people really?”

The words spoke of here. Did not have the means to continue again. Ju Zi(orange) returned to normal, has comforted all Jiang, making them go back to rest. How to process as for this matter, defers to original. However, she must obtain, obtained.

Sometimes, is more important than the morale of troops the heart. Thoughts of returning home, then the army decides. The army decides, then, the world decides!

Ju Zi(orange) for her future goal, took solid one step.

Regarding these, Huo Yuhao does not know the circumstances of the matter, in fact, he reached his trip of destinations of now.

, The snow white snowy mountain toward, is being the mist fills the air by far as before. Just, regarding Huo Yuhao, these mist cannot prevent him to lead the way now. Even if has formidable Soul Beast similarly not to be good in the mist.

Gentle Spiritual Power releases outward, all sensation gently everywhere, but Huo Yuhao, look like Specter is common, being quietly has climbed up the Clear Sky Mountain Peak peak.

On Clear Sky Mountain Peak, Clear Sky Castle as before palatial standing and waiting for a long time there, without any change.

This was Huo Yuhao fourth time comes Clear Sky Castle, each feeling was not same. The first time time, feeling is best. He here, obtained treatments of two sect master, but, is here, because the Snow Emperor embryo has brought terror Sorrow turns to Joy, nearly razes entire Clear Sky Castle.

Those who keep Huo Yuhao forever from putting behind, is here, own Teacher, Holy Necromancer, Slumbering Calamity and Elux, forever left themselves.

But the second time, Wang Dong'er to lose consciousness does not awake, oneself deliver her. That time, he wants grievedly, finally departs, but that time departs, again did not have Wang Dong'er.

News that third coming, he knows Dong'er leave.

This is the fourth time, as if every time arrived here, follows unlucky. But in order to makes Tang Wutong restore, he does not have other choice.

Before arriving at the Clear Sky Castle gate, Huo Yuhao has not knocked on a door, has not summoned, but was, directly has knelt in front of Clear Sky Castle, to fort gate.

The time is not long, Clear Sky Castle fort gate opens, Clear Sky Sect Second Sect Master Tai Tan walked from inside.

He has not spoken a few words to Huo Yuhao, arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, raises legs, a foot kicked to fly Huo Yuhao.

This foot, rudely, the body of Huo Yuhao is common just like the shell, was rumbled directly beside Clear Sky Mountain Peak.

Tai Tan has not kept the hand, but Huo Yuhao has not revolted. The fierce ache is nearly broken the second Soul Nucleus bang in his chest.

Blood in gulps, emits from the Huo Yuhao mouth, but, on his face, instead presented the color of feeling relaxed.

Falls returns to Clear Sky Mountain Peak, in front of Huo Yuhao arriving Tai Tan silently, kneels down once again. Was anything had not said as before, but lowered the head.

Tai Tan coldly visits him, naturally does not need to ask anything, this mixes the boy to arrive at Clear Sky Mountain Peak with this stance, the only explanation is, Wutong had an accident.

“Person?”The Tai Tan sinking sound asked.

Huo Yuhao recited the incantation, opened Gate of the Dead, has delivered Tang Wutong, delivered to front of Tai Tan.

Tai Tan is holding Tang Wutong, returns to Clear Sky Castle to go, the Clear Sky Castle front door, the serious closure, exudes the low and deep bellow.

Tai Tan this goes, in Clear Sky Castle again nobody walks. Huo Yuhao has not moved, that kneeling silently there. Static waiting.

Does not eat and drink, to this cultivating for the powerhouse is nothing, kneels for several months unable dead. Moreover, under the formidable function of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, his injury gradually is also restoring, has only used day of time, the medicine does not recover, all returned to normal.

Huo Yuhao kneels is very steadfast, he even felt better.

This time delivers Tang Wutong, he had not prepared to live going back. If Tang Wutong cannot cure, he commits suicide together in the name of love for her. If Tang Wutong has cured, then, even if dies, he must see her again. Therefore, kneels not only here to forgive, to wait for here, is waiting for the result. This time, regardless of there is any matter, will not make him leave Clear Sky Mountain Peak again, he has been waiting here, is good to Tang Wutong, or is not good.

In the Huo Yuhao heart was not sad, because he has regarded himself is Tang Wutong part, Tang Wutong is good, he is good, Tang Wutong is not good, he is not good. Originally is a body, what has to be quite sad?

This kneels, is seven days. Seven days seven nights, in the past.

The coldness of Clear Sky Mountain Peak, has left behind incorruptible on Huo Yuhao. But even if kneeling, Huo Yuhao own Soul Power silently is also revolving, according to Huo Yuhao own estimate, after previous an accumulation of war, in addition the aggression of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, own Soul Power estimate had almost 94 levels.

Regarding general Titled Douluo situation that 90 levels had been very difficult to practice the promotion, has not appeared on him, the foundation that Dual Soul Nucleus builds was good. Speed of promotion, simply is similar to the blowout is voluntarily ordinary. According to Old Xuan that at least has helped him promote to 98 levels, will again not have any bottleneck. Naturally, because of so, after he reaches 98 levels, wants to break through 99 levels again, perhaps is a life and death term examination.

However, these are not the matters that present Huo Yuhao needs to consider, he not wanted not to strive to his strength, in his present heart, is only thinking that person.

Seven days seven days. 14 days passed by, Huo Yuhao kneels there, on the face full is the beard, turned into ice sculpture. On the whole person has covered thick snow and ice.

When 15 th day just arrived, the Clear Sky Castle front door opened finally, walks, is Tai Tan.

The Tai Tan complexion is very gloomy, when he walks, originally was Huo Yuhao of ice sculpture responded immediately, subconscious gaining ground.

Snow and ice “ka ka”make noise, with gaining ground of Huo Yuhao, presents fissures.

A Tai Tan foot flew, but this time that he trampled, put one's foot down lightly, at least again has not made him be injured.

:

Every day shouted asks the monthly ticket, I was tired of me. But I am the Tang Sect lead horse, if I do not proceed to clash, Tang Sect what does come magnificently? But I also hope, in my behind each splendid steed, can, when I tired, tired, holds my regulation. Let I have relax points slightly time. Ok?

Asked the monthly ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-586-part-2





Volume 12

#586 - Sacrificed For Her? Next


Huo Yuhao that flies although somewhat is as before sloppy, Hu is very long. But was the body does not have the snow and ice finally.

“Comes.”The Tai Tan sinking sound said two characters, turned around to return to Clear Sky Castle.

Huo Yuhao hurries to follow, his heart, finally no longer tranquil, but is beating fiercely. Wutong actually how? He does not know, determines his destiny time.

Entered Clear Sky Castle, Tai Tan has brought hall it him. One sit down, has not made Huo Yuhao also sit down.

Hall it, Niu Tian also, sitting silently on the seat of honor, the complexion also wants the gloomy several points compared with Tai Tan.

“The Wutong situation is not very good. Do you such protect her?”Saying of Niu Tian coldly .

The Huo Yuhao heart sinks, has not said anything, has knelt.

“Get lost, we want your to knock the cephalont to be useful. Even if you kneel here for 10,000 years, turns into the turtle, can make Wutong good?”Tai Tan angry saying.

The Huo Yuhao forced smile said: “I, only then this body, the admitting mistakes words, I was not many say. So long as can revive Wutong, how lets me. If could not revive, I together go with her. To another world, I have protected her again well.”

The Niu Tian face muscle has affected, “if can choose, I should, when first time sees you on to get rid of you, avoid also our treasure by these many pain.”

Huo Yuhao also can only respond with has smiled bitterly, Niu Tian said also right, if Tang Wutong did not follow him, will not receive really that many are painful.

“Now, the means have one.”Niu Tian said suddenly.

“Ah?”Huo Yuhao pleasantly surprised looks to him, the eye had the vitality immediately.

Niu Tian light [say / way]: “But, needed you to make sacrifice. Do you want?”

“Wants.”Huo Yuhao had not asked what sacrifice is anything, immediately readily agreeing without hesitation. He assigns can Tang Wutong, but also there is any issue.

Niu Tian sinking sound track: “The Wutong body received the comprehensive corrosion of death aura, these death aura already with her whole person, even was spiritual sea merges into one organic whole. Then caused her not clear to wake. Now the only means are, making her compel these death aura by own strength, this can restore. However, she own strength is insufficient at present.”

[Say / Way] of Huo Yuhao doubts: “Should that be what to do good?”

Niu Tian said: “If I have not felt wrong, you already achievement Dual Soul Nucleus, moreover should Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, right?”

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao nods immediately. The heart also secretly is simultaneously startled, must know that Zongli Wu that powerhouse has not seen him is Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, this Clear Sky Sect Great Sect Master actually looked. At the Huo Yuhao eyesight. To the present could not completely understand that this Clear Sky Sect Great Sect Master real strength is formidable. This is existence of Limit Douluo level is also inadequate? Before him, sees one have Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, has Beast God Di Tian!

Niu Tian light [say / way]: “Wish made Wutong be able by own strength to compel the death aura, then, must let her also achievement Dual Soul Nucleus, with your same Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, had the opportunity. Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus will discharge that death aura voluntarily. This point, I and brothers cannot achieve. Our strengths. Different with Wutong. Moreover Martial Soul does not agree with. Only then you, have the gang her possibility.”

“Head-family has secret technique, can map the opposite party within the body own Soul Nucleus temporarily, thus helps opposite party revolution Soul Power. But itself Martial Soul and Soul Power must agree with are very good. Wutong sole Soul Nucleus now is light attribute. Also is her, Radiant Dragon Goddess Butterfly Soul Power. Then, now her second Soul Nucleus, only then a possibility is easiest to realize, is Spiritual Power. But your Spiritual Power is also formidable enough. Therefore, needs you own mind Soul Nucleus mapping in her spiritual sea, helping her also achievement second Soul Nucleus. Thus completes Yin-Yang Supplement. Understood?”

“Has the danger?”Huo Yuhao asked.

“Has. This secret technique principle altruistic damages oneself. The Wutong risk is not big, so long as you are firm enough, the chance of success is very big. However, you will therefore likely lose Soul Nucleus, even there is a possibility, because Soul Nucleus weakens, but injures and source. Because is mind Soul Nucleus, the most serious consequence, you will probably turn into the idiot. Even if not turn into the idiot, the strength greatly will also reduce, forever is not likely able again to become Titled Douluo.”The Niu Tian sinking sound said that “therefore, you must consider clearly. Once secret technique starts, will be very difficult to terminate, terminates definitely will make Wutong be killed violently instantaneously.”

Huo Yuhao stands up, free and easy shaking the head, “did not need to consider, started.”

Tai Tan said: “You may, to be clear, this is the irreversible damage. You practice Dual Soul Nucleus that becomes to have problems laboriously inevitably. As far as I know, you should be in human history first complete the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus person. Moreover after being possible, does not have the future.”

“Uncle Tai Tan, Uncle Niu Tian, we let us not lose the time. Delayed a while, the body of Wutong is corroded a point by the death aura. This starts. So long as can make Wutong good, wants my life to give. Let alone is reduces cultivates. However, I must request two uncle matters.”

Niu Tian said: “You said.”

The Huo Yuhao eye reveals color of the renouncing, “if I after secret technique carries on turned into the idiot, please two uncles immediately strike to kill me, then ruins my corpse, must do not make Wutong see. Told her I send her, abandons her not to attend, left voluntarily.”

Tai Tan said curiously: “Why is this?”

Huo Yuhao said: “By her temperament, if I turned into the idiot, she will certainly accompany my one generation, is impossible to be joyful and happy. Let her think me to leave, she will be very sad, but the time grew, would desalinating. But cannot make her know that I died. That will play the counter-effect. Therefore, please two uncles help.”

Listened to his these words, Niu Tian and Tai Tan look was gentle, Niu Tian nodded, said: “Good, I promise you.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Our starts. Where has the thing of eating, I must eat a thing first, rests, the condition adjusts best, must help Wutong restore perfectly.”

Tai Tan said: “I lead you to go.”

Wolfing down has eaten the thing, does not know completely is any flavor. It looks like in this time Huo Yuhao, these food are just an energy supplement.

Has eaten meal, he starts meditate, after a double-hour, he reappears in front of Tai Tan.

Great Sect Master Niu Tian does not know where, Tai Tan inquired whether again Huo Yuhao regretted. After getting the firm answer, he then brings Huo Yuhao to walk toward the Clear Sky Castle building, to most top layer, stops the footsteps.

The top layer only then a room, all around actually four windows, can clear seeing outside sea of clouds, the fog drift about, to person one type such as near fairyland feeling.

Tang Wutong on static lying down on the room Yang's bed. She appears very tranquil, like sleeping soundly. The complexion is as before pale, the body is also lingering light death air/Qi.

Dying of Grim Reaper Devil Puppet struck was too after all strong, Tang Wutong withstood that to strike to be able with own body to live, is the miracle.

Sees her, Huo Yuhao some facial expression convulsion.

For beforehand Dong'er or present Wutong, withstood too many misery, the Huo Yuhao present does not know how should face Wang Dong'er or is Tang Wutong, perhaps this way, he must first fall insanely.

As a man, not only cannot protect own woman, instead because of protecting oneself receives heavy wound by own woman, came to the verge of death. This pain bites the heart.

Huo Yuhao is withstanding this painful feeling. When he listened to Tai Tan and Niu Tian said when saved the Tang Wutong means that in fact, the heart of hearts had a feeling relaxed feeling. Looked like must extricate.

For Wutong, what sacrificed the strength to be considered as?

Huo Yuhao turns head to look to Tai Tan, “Uncle Tai Tan, how do we start?”

Tai Tan said: “You sit to the Wutong opposite, I hold her to get up with your four palms to balance, then you said according to me does.”

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao helps the Tai Tan same place, cautiously held Tang Wutong, suspends to sit cross-legged to sit the good type her.

The head of Tang Wutong is hanging down, the pink-blue color long hair hangs loose, sees this type her, the Huo Yuhao tears cannot bear “”one got down.

Four palms balance, his palm even somewhat shivers.

“Calms the mind to wash the worry, the heart does not have the nonego. Otherwise harmed you also to harm her.”The Tai Tan low and deep sound resounds in the Huo Yuhao ear.

Huo Yuhao alerts immediately, hurries with rapt attention reserved, making own mind stabilize.

Tai Tan said: “Pours into with your Soul Power to Wutong within the body slowly, carries on the entanglement with her Soul Power. After that type of death aura underwent our controls, was collected, although the offensive was stronger, but the chaotic degree was better. After your Soul Power integrates, these death aura will definitely follow your Soul Power also to enter your within the body. To complete secret technique with Wutong, then, first you must have this type of death aura.”

Huo Yuhao stimulates to movement Soul Power, fused with the death aura of Tang Wutong within the body slowly, the process of entire fusion was very slow, that death aura not was extremely overbearing, integrated to his within the body following Huo Yuhao Soul Power, but the effect was not quite good. Because Huo Yuhao own Yin-Yang Dual Soul Nucleus was too strong. His Soul Power is in itself swirl, the death aura entered his body, will immediately cast off.( To be continued...)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-586-part-3





Volume 12

#587 - Mapping! Fusion!


Present Huo Yuhao is not that little while selects ten later weak conditions the time. Even if present Grim Reaper Devil Puppet directly inserts a blade behind him, that death aura in a short time will directly also drive out leaving country by powerful Soul Power that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus will have.

In order to introduced these death aura, Huo Yuhao has to control own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus revolution is slow, making Soul Power quite temperate, that death aura was similar to the maggot of tarsal bone is then common, the spread entered his within the body slowly, tried to corrode his body.

Tai Tan has been observing their sound in side, after the Huo Yuhao skin surface also started to reappear a light death aura. He once more sinking sound track: “Your Soul Power enters Wutong within the body, starts to attempt to communicate with her Soul Power. Your Soul Nucleus Soul Power and she is different, but before you after all, can Martial Soul Fusion, agreeing with be very high, at least she will not repel you. You want the heart to divide two to use, attempts to contact with her Soul Power, while careful enters her spiritual sea own Spiritual Power. Releases Spiritual Power with your Eye of Destiny, the entrance in the Wutong forehead similar position.”

Huo Yuhao has not spoken, Eye of Destiny on forehead actually quietly opened, golden-rose color sun mark disperses on the forehead outward, gentle Spiritual Power immediately to rush forth.

Takes cultivating of Tai Tan as, when pure Spiritual Power that in feeling Huo Yuhao sends out, on the face revealed the surprised color. The strength promotion of this boy was really too quick. He arrives at Tang Wutong behind, helping up her forehead.

Huo Yuhao controls Spiritual Power to search cautiously to the Tang Wutong between the eyebrows position, his very clear there has anything, in which place, the trace of golden trident, but this trace will usually not appear. Only then moved to be Wutong seal, or is she stimulates to movement desirably will appear. Uncle Tai Tan was punctured ī by oneself, should be there.

In gentle Spiritual Power punctures under ī, the Tang Wutong between the eyebrows place spreads the light mind fluctuation gradually, although the fluctuation is not strong, but actually very much somewhat resists person and the feeling outside thousand li(500 km).

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong are so familiar, he can also feel that seal clearly to his repel.

Appraises from Spiritual Power purely, but Huo Yuhao now the standard of close Limit Douluo, this repel is also not enough to affect him, he continues punctures ī Tang Wutong that position with Spiritual Power.

, The forehead of Tang Wutong has lifted gradually voluntarily, does not need Tai Tan to support again. On her forehead, started to present the light golden trace.

At the beginning was only one, that golden trace transferred gradually gradually. The mind fluctuation also starts becomes is getting more and more powerful.

The Huo Yuhao surprised discovery, these mind fluctuations that sends out from the Tang Wutong forehead really has the feeling that planting makes him also probably lie prostrate in worship.

From the Spiritual Power intensity, has the enormous disparity with him, but this is unimportant. More importantly, the feeling of that keeping aloof, own Spiritual Power and her contact, look like are been ordinary by the bird's eye view.

This type felt that Huo Yuhao had, but also once let him and Tang Wutong has the misunderstanding. In Tang Wutong first time appears shortly after his front, he tries and Tang Wutong carries on Martial Soul Fusion time, at that time Tang Wutong Soul Power had this feeling.

Afterward with Huo Yuhao oneself cultivated for promotion, this feeling desalinated, is as for vanishes finally.

Now, this feeling appeared, that golden trident rune in Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power punctures under ī to be getting more and more clear, but the pressure that Huo Yuhao feels becomes is also getting bigger and bigger.

“Soul Power and Spiritual Power continually output, do not stop.”The Tai Tan sound resounds once more.

Huo Yuhao can only be continues maintains, Tai Tan has not taught him any secret technique, but makes him maintain this condition.

Huo Yuhao has Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, Soul Power restores Spiritual Power to restore, that speed can be said as present age one of the most powerhouses. Even if Limit Douluo, not necessarily compares favorably in this aspect he, he must be first cultivates the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus person unexpectedly!

In this case, Huo Yuhao throughout is maintaining the present condition, the interior restores to be quicker than own output, for him, naturally is not the burden.

But integrates with his Soul Power unceasingly, the death aura of Tang Wutong within the body as if had been sent by completely ī, permeates Huo Yuhao within the body are getting more and more. In order to did not affect to the treatment of Tang Wutong, Huo Yuhao outward does not even discharge these death aura, but whatever they occupied in their within the body.

However, this time he, body is strong just like the copper pouring, within the body meridians and internal organs are sending out the light golden color, vitality under formidable Soul Power and existence, these external forces is not enough to have any influence to him, all that the death aura made were the futile efforts.

Outside ray gradually faded out, because Huo Yuhao has been opening Eye of Destiny, therefore he knows that daytime time passed by.

After daytime, is the dark night, after the dark night, is daytime.

In an instant, a one day night passes by. Huo Yuhao throughout is maintaining posture originally.

His Soul Power currently had enters Tang Wutong within the body, pesters in Tang Wutong Soul Power together, does not attack. Although Tang Wutong Soul Power does not fuse with him, but does not repel.

But in mind level, the golden trident on Tang Wutong forehead, in his Spiritual Power punctures under ī unceasingly, burst out dazzling golden light completely. Under that intense golden light blooms, glistening that the entire room shines, but pressure that on Tang Wutong that gold trident releases, even makes Huo Yuhao feel that was somewhat strenuous.

At this moment, Huo Yuhao within the body suddenly resounds buzz the cry, a cool feeling spreads to Eye of Destiny instantaneously, golden-rose color Eye of Destiny had covered an ice blue gloss quietly.

This ice blue color emergence, the pressure that transmits from the golden trident place, immediately is nothing left. Without a trace of disappearance.

This is......

Huo Yuhao has discovered existence of this cool feeling pleasantly surprised. Isn't that coming from the Morning Dew Knife aura?

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath, Morning Dew Knife. Comes from the inheritance of God of Emotion Rong Nianbing. Exterior receives punctures ī, its naturally has passed to Huo Yuhao own aura.

The aura of Wutong that gold trident, is the god? Otherwise, why needs is the aura of god melts similarly?

The pressure of golden trident could not feel, but, this doubts actually deep Indian in the Huo Yuhao heart.

The Spiritual Power output starts to increase quietly, that golden trident seems simply is at this time common just like the material object, sent out golden light not to say all over the body that has been full of the sense of reality.

“Yuhao, stimulates to movement comprehensively your mind Soul Nucleus, then through the mind relation that you establish now, pours into your mind Soul Nucleus to Wutong spiritual sea in gradually. Is that golden trident.”

Huo Yuhao hesitated. He does not have first to do according to the view of Tai Tan.

To move own Soul Nucleus, this is not an easy matter, Soul Nucleus is the Soul Master basis . Moreover, most needs to stabilize. Once Soul Nucleus has the problem, then, under the large explosion, by the Huo Yuhao Soul Nucleus strength, entire Clear Sky Castle will certainly change into the powder powder instantaneously!

This is not Huo Yuhao most was also worried that because he believes that his controlling force, has to move the Soul Nucleus possibility, what is important, can Wutong unable to withstand? Her can spiritual sea withstand own Soul Nucleus? But own can Soul Nucleus, rely on the present mind relation shift really in the past?

“You do not need to be worried that I must start to start secret technique. You according to doing that I said are. Will I also deceive you to be inadequate?”Tai Tan as if saw the Huo Yuhao regard, immediately the sinking sound said.

Huo Yuhao did not have other choice at this time, he can only believe Tai Tan. The tooth fastens to nip, he started to control his mind Soul Nucleus to move.

Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus is a golden vortex, in the whirlpool deep place, has a golden crystal to exist indistinctly. At this time, under his thought control, mind Soul Nucleus starts the slight migration.

This mind Soul Nucleus source in Eye of Destiny, or is Eye of Destiny each other is actually interlinked. His touches mind Soul Nucleus, immediately has mapped in Eye of Destiny.

The Eye of Destiny pupil deep place, the bright golden color mind Soul Nucleus whirlpool is revolving fiercely, but is very stable, moreover gradually becomes there clear.

golden-rose color sun mark vanished gradually, what replaces it is radiated golden traces, Eye of Destiny on Huo Yuhao forehead is also golden light greatly puts, the ray intensity is not weak on the Tang Wutong forehead the golden trident. In the entire room, floods the formidable incomparable mind aura to fluctuate immediately. Clear Sky Castle, because Huo Yuhao started to stimulate to movement mind Soul Nucleus to cover light golden light.

Outside Clear Sky Castle, white clouds, some nearest clouds, looked like by the sunlight are shone generally, have sent out golden light gradually. These golden light spread toward the distant place gradually. Mountain peak that this, Clear Sky Castle is, was more like the place of deity.

Tai Tan has sat cross-legged to sit behind Tang Wutong at this time, feels the formidable mind aura that Huo Yuhao that mind Soul Nucleus is lending, on his face reveals a joyful color.

Low and deep incantation sound resounds in his mouth, his both hands also lift, pressed quietly on the shoulder of Tang Wutong.

Strange halo circulation, because there is a Tang Wutong mask, what Huo Yuhao cannot see, in Tang Wutong back Tai Tan, the personal appearance reduced several points gradually, gentle light shadow appears before the Tai Tan body, sits cross-legged to sit there, is one has the man of blue long hair impressively.

He lifts the hand, a direction in the Tang Wutong cerebellum place.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-587-part-1





Volume 12

#587 - Mapping! Fusion!


Immediately, the golden trident ray on Tang Wutong forehead restrains suddenly, the ray that scattered in all directions collects instantaneously, directly soars the Eye of Destiny place electricity on Huo Yuhao forehead to shoot.

The golden light sparkle, hit Eye of Destiny, Huo Yuhao only thinks whole body big change, he felt a powerful suction unexpectedly, was attracting pulls own mind Soul Nucleus to move outward.

The mind Soul Nucleus stable revolution was destroyed immediately, revolving becomes crueler, making the Huo Yuhao entire forehead turn into the golden color.

Outside Clear Sky Castle, in hundred li (0.5km) range, all fog turned into the similar gloss.

Huo Yuhao fixes the eyes on to look that immediately saw, that golden light transmits from the golden trident of Tang Wutong forehead place, this suction, likely is a bridge, builds between him and Tang Wutong.

Without any does not abandon, Huo Yuhao collects own mind Soul Nucleus to bloom with own Spiritual Power whole-heartedly outward.

Must know that his Soul Nucleus is Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, once the mind Soul Nucleus thorough exsomatize, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus of his within the body will possibly erupt the major problem.

Regarding this, Huo Yuhao thought was very clear, he believes that Tai Tan does not know own this Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus characteristics, therefore before will have, judgment that said. But in fact, judging from the present situation, after mind Soul Nucleus complete exsomatize, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus of oneself within the body will immediately perhaps erupt. At that time, oneself body will possibly produce the large explosion.

After having this judgment, Huo Yuhao has thought the countermeasure. Gives Wutong own mind Soul Nucleus, can revive her. This was enough. As for oneself.

Huo Yuhao is very full to own confidence, he has the confidence at least short time internal control to trig within the body Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus. So long as recited the time of incantation to him, was enough.

At that time, he will open Gate of the Dead, escaped into to go to undead Demi-plane voluntarily. Closes the front door. In there from exploding.

In undead Demi-plane from exploding, in a big way possibly ruins entire Demi-plane, or ruins part. So long as does not injure arrived here person, was enough.

This is the idea of Huo Yuhao, his thought is very direct. Therefore, when he chooses to listen to the Tai Tan opinion dutifully, treats and cures Tang Wutong time, has been holding the thought of being unafraid of death.

If two people can only live, he will certainly choose Wutong.

The light ray glitters in the air, the golden ray that the Huo Yuhao body sends out is getting more and more powerful, was migrated gradually with mind Soul Nucleus, the chain link of his within the body Dual Soul Nucleus communication gradually was also elongated, the Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus operating speed also starts the unceasing enhancement, that powerful, as if becomes very cruel.

The Huo Yuhao mind controlling force showed perfectly at this time. Is suppressing own two Soul Nucleus actually, wild degree control in certain range.

Eye of Destiny turned into the golden vortex at this time completely, could not see including the eye pupil, but golden light that the opposite golden trident, sends out is becomes more and more powerful.

“Mapping!”The gentle sound suddenly resounds. Huo Yuhao can judge is only, this sound should not belong to Tai Tan, does not belong to Niu Tian.

Huo Yuhao thought that a gentle ray fell on oneself, this ray was somewhat warm, but was flooding a pressure beyond description. Before received the pressure of golden trident to appear once again, moreover compared with former more powerful many.

What is this?

In Huo Yuhao heart one startled, but also not waits for him to respond the time, he felt that Soul Power and Spiritual Power of own within the body almost simultaneously drop. In his Eye of Destiny, soon exsomatize, but mind Soul Nucleus trembles suddenly. Huo Yuhao only thought that strength of the strong revolving passes the body, the weak feeling spreads to spiritual sea instantaneously.

A golden vortex, appears in airborne his body previous foot away. Not is just the mind Soul Nucleus appearance?

However, what making Huo Yuhao surprised was, mind Soul Nucleus in oneself Eye of Destiny therefore has not vanished, but also exists as before, but the mind aura of implication compared with wanted small and weakly many many. Most also only then original about 1/10.

Limit Douluo Spiritual Power 1/10, there are about close 90 levels of Titled Douluo standards. But from loses 90% Spiritual Power extremely formidable suddenly, that weak feeling is extremely obvious.

This feeling is very painful, what at least Huo Yuhao now feels is. But Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus of his within the body also instantaneously becomes the powerful, the communication chain link central location each other collided to produce the whirlpool place, but now is actually the rapid upward movement, direct throat, enters to stabilize to the spiritual sea surrounding.

Two big Soul Nucleus some are not balanced, whirlpool Soul Power that produces what are more is having the Absolute Ice chill in the air, but was the Spiritual Power mind aura clearly to weaken.

What situation is this? Why own can Soul Nucleus actually be separated part? Separates 90%?

Mapping? That sound a moment ago what said is the mapping, the mapping what's the matter? This belongs to Clear Sky Sect secret technique? Really is quite mysterious!

Although Huo Yuhao is weak, but can clear seeing, that float follow golden light that the golden trident sends out to fly slowly in the Tang Wutong direction in the airborne golden whirlpool.

The speed of flight is not fast, but is very stable, that as if completely has broken away from the control of Huo Yuhao, that some Spiritual Power Huo Yuhao somewhat could not even feel. But his own mind Soul Nucleus operating speed also compared with reduced many and many. Just as such that Tai Tan said that his mind Soul Nucleus now is becoming extremely weak.

“With rapt attention. Waits a minute Wutong, when absorbs your mind Soul Nucleus, will also touch you to enter her ** Soul Power, will simultaneously cause your own mind Soul Nucleus resonating. You are careful, if you cannot control own Soul Power and Spiritual Power, then, will turn into the idiot, understood?”The Tai Tan sound resounds once again, yes, this time is Tai Tan, Huo Yuhao affirmed.

At this time, naturally had no way to say anything, Huo Yuhao hurried to restrain the mind, was suppressing that intense weak feeling, is felt the change of own Soul Power and Spiritual Power that oneself can try hard.

The golden vortex arrives in front of Tang Wutong slowly, to the position of that golden trident, then the golden Soul Nucleus whirlpool stagnated there.

The Tang Wutong whole person was shone upon the golden color, Huo Yuhao can feel obviously that the Soul Power fluctuation of Tang Wutong within the body starts instantaneously becomes intense, he integrated Soul Power of Tang Wutong within the body also to follow this intense Soul Power fluctuation to operate, Soul Power of his within the body also starts massively suction by Tang Wutong.

If there is changed others, likely can be startled thinks that this is Tang Wutong is absorbing own strength to strengthen oneself. At least this secret technique, looks like the Evil Soul Master ability.

But Huo Yuhao actually does not believe that even if gives Tang Wutong his all, he also has no complain and regret.

Therefore, he simply does not have the least bit to revolt, the body relaxes completely, whatever Tang Wutong is absorbing own Soul Power. But meridians of Tang Wutong, became with Soul Power unceasing increase more and more bright, internal death aura as if felt not to be wonderful, Zuo Chongyou who gone all out suddenly. But facing Soul Power that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong collaborate, they do not have the means to destroy.

The golden trident front golden color whirlpool gradually changed small, or was inhaled Tang Wutong within the body by that golden trident gradually.

But Huo Yuhao immediately felt that Soul Nucleus in Tang Wutong dantian surges instantaneously, strong Soul Power flushes away toward the forehead of Tang Wutong.

This type felt that he is familiar, initially cultivated Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus time, hasn't he faced such aspect? In six big spirits add on under the help of Old Mu, barely escapes, finally achievement humanity in history first Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus.

Feels the crisis that Tang Wutong faces, Huo Yuhao gets rid immediately, pestered in together Soul Power to move with Tang Wutong rapidly, the goal had one, that was the sluggish Tang Wutong Soul Power revolution.

to lose consciousness these many days, Tang Wutong own Soul Power has been at the dormant state, in this case, her own function has dropped.

The Huo Yuhao Soul Power total quantity be more than her, before absorbed that many, moreover was whirlpool Soul Power, at this time Huo Yuhao one moved, the Soul Nucleus running rate in Tang Wutong dantian was slow immediately, even was lived temporarily sluggishly.

But in Tang Wutong spiritual sea, a golden vortex is taking shape slowly.

She when condenses this second Soul Nucleus, be easier than initial Huo Yuhao, mind Soul Nucleus ready-made, directly absorbs Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, but in own dantian original first Soul Nucleus was limited forcefully by Huo Yuhao. As the matter stands, Tang Wutong own practice speed initially Huo Yuhao quick are too more than and are too many.

Huo Yuhao quite therefore drew support from Tang Wutong own Soul Power not to repel his superiority, has achieved this point. Naturally, more importantly, that came from Clear Sky Sect secret technique, does not have this secret technique, Tang Wutong is how regardless of being unable to absorb Huo Yuhao Soul Nucleus, this as if radically is not the ability that Soul Master can have.

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals the color of feeling relaxed, he saw the successful dawn. On the Tang Wutong forehead, golden light is as before powerful, but mind Soul Nucleus soon had been absorbed by her.

Huo Yuhao has not done to person married the determination of clothes, instead has filled joyfully, can give Tang Wutong own thing, for him, is the happiest matter.

The Soul Nucleus rebellion in Tang Wutong dantian was getting more and more fierce, moreover unceasing to rush forth, but Soul Power start has made Huo Yuhao Soul Power somewhat unable to limit.

--

Does obeisance to ask the monthly ticket!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-587-part-2





Volume 12

#587 - Mapping! Fusion!


Huo Yuhao without hesitation breaks in many Soul Power the Tang Wutong body on own initiative, is limiting this Soul Nucleus as before. Meanwhile, relaxes little, reveals some Soul Power and that side Tang Wutong mind Soul Nucleus attacks.

Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus wants to complete, mutual impact and adaptation are inevitable. This point, nobody had the experience compared with Huo Yuhao.

Naturally, Beast God Di Tian is also experienced, but stated differently, it is Soul Beast, is not humanity! Huo Yuhao is first has forms humanity of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus experience completely. In this point, nobody can compare.

The smile on Huo Yuhao face became more and more rich, how long he did not know, but felt that oneself was getting more and more weak. Within the body already, not only Spiritual Power has consumed 90%, Soul Power is also so.

But as the matter stands, the feeling was instead more comfortable, Dual Soul Nucleus of oneself within the body has formed the state of equilibrium. Stated differently, Soul Power consumption, but can also restore through the practice, but that side mind Soul Nucleus, likely was the source is actually made 90%, for a long time, a point restored the sign not to have.

Regarding this, Huo Yuhao does not care slightly, this is anything, so long as Wutong can live well. He hopes now, when all finished, oneself will not turn into the idiot. He believes that Wutong will certainly not shut out own.

But in fact, he even can affirm, even if turns into the idiot, Wutong will not shut out itself similarly, reason that wanted that guarantee with Niu Tian and Tai Tan, because, if turns into the idiot, he will shut out himself, he is not willing to become implication of Wutong!

The golden halo on golden trident finally started to restrain, Tang Wutong as if completely has absorbed Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, but her Spiritual Power collided with own Soul Power mutually, started to present not too stable small eddy currents. Although is unstable, but actually continues to appear, in other words, two Soul Nucleus were starting each other to adapt.

This is good, this is good!

In sight shortly successfully, Huo Yuhao great happiness. He is very clear, this is the sign that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus will soon complete.

Wutong now is 90 multistage Soul Power, so long as this Dual Soul Nucleus completes, then, almost can affirm that she at least can also attack the Transcendent Douluo level. As for own cultivating to drop many, Huo Yuhao does not know, does not have the time to ponder these.

Light ray twinkle, the Soul Power fluctuation in air became more and more powerful. Huo Yuhao closes eyes, Eye of Destiny also has closed. The intense weak feeling, making his complexion appear somewhat pale, but on the face is having the light smile throughout.

The form stands up from Tang Wutong together slowly, the figure is slim, sends to hang loose blue after the brain, the handsome face could not find a slight defect.

Look somewhat complex looks at Huo Yuhao, after long time, he sighed gently, lifts the hand, has pressed on the Tang Wutong forehead gently. Immediately, on that golden trident ray dodges, as if has any thing to pour into, had any thing to vanish likely.

Tang Wutong behind, two groups of rays shine gradually, one group, is golden Sun, another group, is the Purple gold color moon. [Gold/Metal] and purple, blends mutually, looks like particularly moving.

Sends on the male face to reveal a satisfactory smile blue, nod of gently, both hands wield, a gentle ray simultaneously covered on Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

Two big Soul Nucleus of Tang Wutong within the body simultaneously shivered, within the body Soul Power is similar to the blowout erupts immediately generally.

Huo Yuhao was limiting her Soul Power immediately in this erupts is involved, seems like whirled away by the tornado, but in the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus chain link of Tang Wutong within the body also along with it completion.

golden light projects from the golden trident trace on Tang Wutong forehead together suddenly, fell on the Huo Yuhao between the eyebrows position directly, Eye of Destiny unexpectedly under the powerful of this external strength poured into is opened voluntarily.

Huo Yuhao felt that in own spiritual sea survives many Spiritual Power to be found time instantaneously, the brook drop does not remain.

The Soul Nucleus surrounding whirlpool vanished, surplus, be only not a big golden crystal, this flickers, Huo Yuhao only thought that at present one black, all consciousness vanish to disappear.

Can turn into the idiot eventually? This is the Huo Yuhao last thought. If he can also ponder that one second, then, he definitely can only hope Niu Tian and Tai Tan can keep their promises, who will turn into the idiot carry off, forever vanishes in front of Tang Wutong.

Instantaneously found time, not only Spiritual Power, Soul Power in Huo Yuhao dantian, pure Soul Power suction, but on Tang Wutong, bursts out the unequalled strong ray.

This time, being one's turn was Tang Wutong adsorbs the body of Huo Yuhao to sit there, the head of Huo Yuhao, dangled slowly.

In this is, light shadow together is quietly shines behind Huo Yuhao. That is one is having the man of golden long hair.

“Sufficed?”Golden hair man sinking sound track.

Sends male nod of gently blue, said: “Looked, in he is willing to be Wutong sacrificed in all shares, he inherits your Gods matter such to consider as finished. However, wants to marry my daughter, he must diligently be again good.”

At the same time was saying, sends male both hands to advance blue, immediately, the Tang Wutong back Sun-Moon ray puts instantaneously greatly, but that golden hair man also makes the movement that empty presses toward Huo Yuhao on. Behind Huo Yuhao, presented gold sun blue moon immediately. Just, compared with Tang Wutong back gold sun purple moon, the ray wanted gloomy many.

The golden ray just like the bridge, two gold sun each other shines, intense golden light is mutually supplementary, the gentle halo them links.

Huo Yuhao back gold sun, behind Tang Wutong under shining of gold sun unexpectedly gradually becomes bright. What stranger is, the powerful mind fluctuation also appeared on Huo Yuhao.

Moreover, Huo Yuhao back blue moon also similarly releases a ray, blends with Tang Wutong back purple moon in the same place.

Sun-Moon blends, each other Soul Power and Spiritual Power, starts to communicate.

Two big Soul Nucleus of Huo Yuhao within the body revolve, whirlpool Soul Power blooms outward.

Faint trace black air/Qi starts from Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong dissipates, sends out in the air. Vanishes gradually does not see.

The golden hair man ill-humored [say / way] of: “You did not think that this is cheating? We cannot interfere world of mortals all matters.”

Sends the male light [say / way] blue: “Cheats? I do not have! I inspired on my daughter to be my aura. This is my daughter, has my bloodlines, this who can say what? As for Huo Yuhao, he to save my daughter, receives the feedback of my daughter strength, will have such situation. This is not I does, is they do. I have used Clear Sky Sect secret technique.”

[Say / Way] that the golden hair man disdains: “That secret technique clearly is you creates.”

“Right? That is. Good, I must walk, can't you walk?”

“Walks walks. Tang San, I suddenly especially want to punch your, why doesn't know? Moreover, how I thought more and more that I have not profited actually.”

“Hasn't profited? Good! We trade, makes your Gods, I divide the minute to handle him, making him inherit my Gods, has Wutong, I do not believe him to dare to reject me.”

“Beauty that you think!”

“I walked. Being disinclined manages you.”Sends the man one step to step forward blue, during the body integrated was void, vanished instantaneously does not see.

Golden hair man look somewhat complex looked at Huo Yuhao, lifts the hand to press in his top of the head lightly, satisfied nod.

“To snatch the successor with me, daydreams.”Same one step steps forward void, the golden youth also dissipates in the air.

Tai Tan does not know where from drilled, hey said with a smile: “Is this deity fights?”

Niu Tian opened the door to walk, “any deity fought, the deity fought, can only in the space, but not in underground. Anything do not say that all defer to him to tell does. This time, these two kids, finally were after the bitter comes the sweet.”

When Huo Yuhao sobers gradually, he first feels is warm, warm, comfortable that the whole body could not say.

Am I also living? Did I arrive at another world? Originally, will have felt to another world warm?

The consciousness restores gradually.

“You are also certainly living, moreover lived cannot be good.”Sounds of some humorous interests resound, Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, he felt an incomparably familiar aura. Subconscious thought fine motion. He saw his spiritual sea.

spiritual sea turned into a stretch of land, familiar forms present before him.

A handsome man is holding appreciatively his golden long hair, visits him with smile on the face. On a Bai Se (White Color) long gown, the fine dust does not dye.

“Brother Daydream.”Huo Yuhao excited calling out.

Not only human form Daydream Ice Silkworm, in his line of sight, several other. For example, Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass.

Octagonal also turned into the human form now, is an appearance of simple and honest youth, stands side Daydream Ice Silkworm. Another side, two big beautiful woman vision chilly looks at Huo Yuhao, although the vision is chilly, the happy expression of but on the elegant face actually completely not being able to conceal.

Stature obese gigantic Ice Bear King, in smiling looks at Huo Yuhao, stretched out the arms to clash, gave him a big bear to hug.

Beautiful moving Mermaid Princess Li Ya be with smile on the face looks at Huo Yuhao, the interesting to listen to music sends out from her mouth, sounds together just like hundred birds.

“Did you and you awake? Did I converge with you in another world?”Huo Yuhao by the Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) hug nearly must not gasp for breath, his sound passes on to be fuzzy, but each spirit can clear understanding to his meaning.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-587-part-3





Volume 12

#588 - Double Rises Super To Fight Luo!


“Our where has is so easy dead! Brother lived for 1 million years, the life is very hard. However, we do not know that what's the matter, but thought that had very huge energy to emerge, helping us accelerate to repair the source, therefore successively woke. We must ask you what's the matter, because we cannot feel outside situation. Your present Spiritual Power was too formidable, only if you permit, we do not have the means to realize outside all.”

“Hasn't died? Huge energy?”Huo Yuhao has also somewhat tarried, turns head to have a look at Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor they, they are approaching themselves to nod.

The Huo Yuhao thoughts are detachable immediately, I did not turn into the idiot at that time, said that the present all are the dreamlands? No, is not right, I as if can control the surrounding all, such being the case, then, oneself should also live is really being right.

Thinks of here, in Huo Yuhao ton vision heart nice and warm, the whole body has not being able to say strength.

“I have a look first.”Then, his thought moves, returned. Simultaneously in regards own physical state.

This in does not regard importantly, Huo Yuhao saw one of the shock immediately.

First he sees, is two eddy currents, is the Soul Nucleus whirlpool. Each whirlpool, increased close one time compared with before, originally partly visible crystal in the Soul Nucleus whirlpool, now became extremely obvious.

Two big whirlpools, one is the golden color, one is the blue color, each other is releasing Soul Power of surge, mutual fusion, entanglement. But the [gold/metal] blue ray, is surging to pace back and forth.

That whirlpool Soul Power, full looks like pearls is ordinary, if carefully did not look, even thinks that they are wholes.

This type felt that Huo Yuhao first time has. Simply was too wonderful. That powerful feeling, making his entire body enter another boundary.

The meridians, in the internal organs, as if vanished, he only thought in own body looks like piece of Continent, but two Soul Nucleus, separately were this piece of Continent date and moon/month, was shining all.

gold sun blue moon. That practical feeling, making him present a clear(ly) to become aware gradually. Soul Nucleus, as if, not only treats as the energy fountainhead to use.

However, the change of body is also not Huo Yuhao most shocks, what is more important, why will have this situation? If are all right, that Wutong? Wutong how?

The consciousness returns completely, Huo Yuhao opens eyes slowly. When his opening eyes pupil, immediately discovered that oneself also in that room of Clear Sky Sect top layer, but, in the room, did not have Tai Tan and Tang Wutong form, entire room only then he.

Wutong?

Huo Yuhao one startled, but the thought moves, his whole person fluttered, falls in the ground.

Huo Yuhao subconscious looks to the surroundings that Spiritual Detection also instantaneously blooms.

When he displays Spiritual Detection, oneself had a scare. Simply has not stimulated to movement Spiritual Power, is almost only the thought moves, the entire Clear Sky Castle stereoscopic view appeared in his mind, all living thing and details, even if were the slightest place, clear incomparable presented.

, Has not had Tang Wutong. He knew that has Niu Tian and Tai Tan that two groups of incomparably powerful vitalities.

Moreover, this time he confirmed completely, Clear Sky Sect Great Sect Master Niu Tian, certainly is existence of Limit Douluo level, but Tai Tan also at least is Transcendent Douluo. In two human bodies, has the terror explosive strength. Releases in the surface, already so formidable, but their sources, as if have any more terrorist strength.

Wutong? Huo Yuhao now in brain, only then this thought that the wind general running out room, direct Teleportation, appeared in front of Tai Tan and Niu Tian.

Niu Tian and Tai Tan they, in a spacious room, the respective end one cup dark red such as the wine of blood are tasting.

Huo Yuhao suddenly appears, making them be also startled. Sees is he, on the face revealed a light smile.

“Uncle Niu Tian and Uncle Tai Tan. Wutong? Wutong how? Can the death aura of her within the body once all discharge? Her person where? What has not good place?”Huo Yuhao is similar to Soul Guidance Cannon, Niu Tian and Tai Tan that one string of interrogative sentences, listen to one.

“Boy, you are calm first.”Tai Tan he he said with a smile.

Huo Yuhao one cuts irritable, present he, how possibly calm getting down!

Niu Tian has referred to out of the window, said: “Oneself look.”

Before a Huo Yuhao arrow step rushes to window, looks to out of the window. Saw picture that he will not forget his entire life.

The pure white fog from the sky drifts about, the fog is fluctuating unceasingly various shapes, from time to time is similar to the mighty waves is turbulent, from time to time transforms various modeling. Just like sculpture, instantaneous avalanche.

In these thousand strange Baibian fog, a beautiful pink-blue color form is dancing lightly. She treadons the fog, the whole body is sending out the light golden halo, looks like fairy maiden that in that fog walks.

The beautiful graceful dancer's posture, the pink-blue color long hair of big wave moves, the tender body sends out is letting the charm that the person is unable to resist.

Above her top of the head, gold sun purple moon shines in airborne, has increased several points of deity aura to her.

The strong Soul Power fluctuation is fluctuating in the air unceasingly. Let the surrounding cloud also unceasingly transform the color.

A Huo Yuhao tip of the toe place, the person leapt up, flies toward that fog . The gentle Soul Power fluctuation sends out from him, no, not only Soul Power, cordiality.

Pure sentiment and being in love, is the best mood! Huo Yuhao behind, belonged to God of Emotion Rong Nianbing light shadow to sparkle quietly, the next quarter, the surrounding cloud turned into the golden color completely.

Huo Yuhao stretches out the arms, flew in the Tang Wutong direction, in his eyes, at this time only then the inverted image of that beautiful form.

Tang Wutong naturally also saw him, on the elegant face reveals a smile, beautiful pupil midwave light circulation. The personal appearance dodges gently, has avoided the hug of Huo Yuhao, chuckle, escapes into the fog.

Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, hurries to throw toward that fog, but actually came up empty-handed. Subconscious when displays Spiritual Detection, the discovery, in the surrounding fog has actually covered entirely Tang Wutong Soul Power, his Spiritual Detection is unable to search her form unexpectedly.

Yes! She should have Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, in this case, her Spiritual Power and Soul Power perfectly are also unifying, the strength that releases simultaneously have the spiritual attribute nature, oneself are not certainly able to compare broken.

In the Huo Yuhao heart is somewhat anxious, he is really good to fear that the present all are the illusions, he only thinks that now moving of short distance arrives at her, determined that all these are real.

Blue moon/month being quietly raises behind Huo Yuhao, a Huo Yuhao light palm pressed above the fog.

In an instant, he only thought blue Soul Nucleus of own chest place moved, the blue whirlpool of that surge as if instantaneously appeared in the palm.

Immediately, outside Clear Sky Castle, the fog was covered immediately extremely coldly.

All water elements all instantaneously congeal, is almost only instantaneous, the surrounding area all fog within several hundred li (0.5km), change into the shaved ice to fall to the ground.

The Tang Wutong form appears in Huo Yuhao once again at present, she somewhat surprisedly visits him, the beautiful pupil deep place, is revealing the color of several points of rebuking, seems blaming him to destroy the present beautiful scene.

Huo Yuhao may, no matter these, he is not willing to be suffered by the present separation, Teleportation, arrived in front of her, stretches out the arms, hugs to her.

Tang Wutong displayed Teleportation similarly, but actually retroceded one foot, both hands lifted, simultaneously has gripped both hands of Huo Yuhao.

Four palm readings grasp, when Huo Yuhao feels that familiar pleasant warmth, the heart of whole person as if must dissolve.

He just about to says anything, actually felt that emerges two Soul Power from Tang Wutong within the body suddenly, he stares slightly, had not responded with enough time that he discovered that his Soul Power with the Soul Power fusion of Tang Wutong in one, their bodies almost simultaneously has shone unexpectedly directly.

Above Tang Wutong top of the head gold sun purple moon flutters instantaneously to the Huo Yuhao top of the head, but behind Huo Yuhao, raised gold sun blue moon.

gold sun overlaps, the thorough upper air, blue moon and purple moon overlapped, turned into the royal purple full moon, complemented each other fresh splendor with gold sun.

The body of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong simultaneously became somewhat illusory, the ray that their bodies sent out was similar to the essence is common.

The ray first was reserved, erupted suddenly outward. In an instant, Huo Yuhao only thought that a brain blank, the surrounding space, as if becomes in their Soul Power ejection process irrelevant to shatter.

The fusion, I and Wutong Martial Soul can fuse!

Yes, they can fuse. Also had Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus with Tang Wutong, their Martial Soul Fusion, completed.

Hao Dong Power, as before is Hao Dong Power. But, before had the earth-shaking change.

Soul Nucleus in two human body, almost simultaneously increased over one-third, do not despise these three points of it, the diameter increases one-third, volume amplification may be much more! The overall strength almost turns time once more. Moreover, is the strengths of two people simultaneously turns time.

This is the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus might.

At this time, each of them has pair of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, their themselves likely is two Soul Nucleus, the male is positive, female for cloudy, similarly is also Yin-Yang Supplement. This amplification, is absolutely unprecedented.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong merge into one organic whole instantaneously, together radiant golden light toward distant place sky suddenly to launch.

This golden light diameter width has hundred meters fully, length cannot look at the edition.

When this was initially their first Martial Soul Fusion Martial Soul Fusion technique that shows.

Fading in Radiance, Golden Road.

This is Golden Road of ultimate version! To endless horizon.

After they almost instantaneously change into that huge vertical eye, returned to normal. Huo Yuhao to own cherishes area, already tight supports into Tang Wutong the bosom, is holding her pleasantly warm fragrance tender body, this had several points of third dimension.

The promotion of strength, is in his opinion unimportant. So long as she in side, so long as all her are good, that is best.

“You are quite silly, why can keep off that blade for me?”The Huo Yuhao sound filled shivered and sobbed.

Tang Wutong pū smiles, “you are silly. Has changed you, won't do? You are my lover, only allows you to protect me, doesn't allow me to protect you? Equality of the sexes.”

Huo Yuhao closely grasps her, “you may know, if you walked, I as you like will certainly go. You where, I where.”

“I know certainly. Therefore I do not hate to leave your this fool!”Tang Wutong winning smile sweet saying, but under the dimple, the tears actually quietly has flowed.

Before Clear Sky Castle window, Niu Tian and Tai Tan stand there, looks two who airborne closely supports, on the face revealed the genial smile.

“These two kids arrived at the same place finally. Was really happy for them. Like initially looks that Wutong her mother and that fellow are resembling together. Yuhao this boy was willing is Wutong gives up oneself cultivating to touch that fellow finally, was relying on Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Martial Soul Fusion, this time, two kids were also turn misfortune into a blessing, double rose Transcendent Douluo. So young Transcendent Douluo, must catch up really for ten thousand years ago that generation of!”Saying of Tai Tan sigh.

Niu Tian coughs, said: “Has resulted, how I remember when you initially also had liked human form Xiao Wu?”

“! Big brother, your dot sound. You do not know that fellow does like being jealous? You looked that his sons-in-law so are been miserable, this that he suffers if love rival, perhaps the sediment not remaining.”A Tai Tan face appearance cautiously, is slightly incompatible with his straightforward semblance.

Niu Tian laughs.

Huo Yuhao tight is holding Tang Wutong, wishes one could to rub into own body her. Long time, his state of mind sobered gradually several points, in the heart actually suddenly had a question.

I hug very tight! How to have that type to respond? The seal has not revolted against my Ah?

At the same time is thinking, he is subconscious, hugs tightened a point.

Had not responded.

“Light.”Tang Wutong some sounds of rebuking resound.

Huo Yuhao hurries to relax the arm, looks down to her, “how to have responded?”

Tang Wutong elegant face one red, “father has come, looked that you are willing to pay all appearances for me,......”

In the Huo Yuhao eye reveals the wild with joy color gradually, if were not clear to this time, he was really a fool.

“Father-in-law long live!”

Lowered the head, his vision immediately becomes fiery, looks at that close at hand the powder delicate pink lip, slowly bent down.

Tang Wutong elegant face bashful red, but has not actually fended, lifts the both arms, encircled his neck.

……

4000 character big chapters, asked monthly ticket and recommendation ticket!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-588





Volume 12

#589 - The Sleepiness Of Xu Three Stone


The fog that diverges assails gradually from the distant place, covered the color visionally to this sky.

Sits in the fog, he is hugging her, she is walking arm in arm he.

“I think really another time must lose you, Wutong, do you know? That feeling nearly made me go crazy. From now henceforth, I must give you my soul, together with my good and my badness, my weakness, all problems. It is very repugnant, but only, loves you.”

“Fool.”

If not the Tai Tan summon sound, perhaps they really will sit well in that cloud in ancient times.

Must return to reality world eventually, returns in Clear Sky Castle. In the Huo Yuhao eye, all become seem to be different. Clear Sky Castle unlucky as if also in three stops at matter. This completely is the feeling of Sorrow turns to Joy.

Looks at Niu Tian and Tai Tan faint smile vision, Tang Wutong blushes the face to draw Huo Yuhao to run.

The food in Clear Sky Castle is somewhat monotonous, but in the honey in mixed with oil general two population, that is the delicacy delicacy. Fine food, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong before the love surges to recall matter that has.

“Our Martial Soul can fuse probably, Hao Dong Power can use. What's the matter? At that time I clearly felt itself by your suck dry! How not only to cultivate for has not fallen, instead promoted. Feels that I should enter the Transcendent Douluo level now, you are also similar. Moreover, we were also Dual Soul Nucleus.”

Huo Yuhao somewhat curious asked to Tang Wutong in bosom.

Tang Wutong shook the head, said: “I do not know that what happened, after waking, the discovery turned into this. Uncle Tai Tan said that is you cures me through secret technique. Probably said that after I achieve Dual Soul Nucleus, our Martial Soul and Soul Power level was consistent. Then forms Soul Power to return nurturing to parents, injects into your within the body, collected Hao Dong Power to practice voluntarily. So has circulated for nine days. We became now this.”

“Nine days? Have we cultivated unexpectedly together for nine days?”Huo Yuhao surprised saying.

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “Uncle Tai Tan said that you lead me to come back already almost quick one month. You anxiously going back? Words that you worry, our walks.”

Huo Yuhao embraces tightly her. “No, I do not worry. Before this time comes out, I have thought that also told everybody, I will again not possibly go back. I helped the student draw back the Sun-Moon Empire army. The Xiaotao elder sister has also cured, at least in a short time, Academy should not need me again.”

He will bury in the Tang Wutong shoulder, he enjoys present's feeling really very much, Wutong was good, he looks like again the world manner. Even is willing to forget that beforehand all sorts, best is forever settles down in this Clear Sky Castle with her is good, does not go to the tube outside all chaotic.

Feels his hair, the Tang Wutong be with smile on the face [say / way]: “Wants us in the same place, any matter. Can joyful faces! You do not have the means tranquilly really forever here. In our hearts, worries. Person this for a lifetime, cannot only live for oneself. Although you have been living for other people, is, without you, how many people some will be worried for you that was worried for us? We must return to belong to our world eventually. At least. Before all settle down, cannot evade, cannot the recession.”

“Present we, are no one can injure, we had gradually changed this world ability, such being the case. We had no reason to withdraw. Academy and Tang Sect, this is we must protect. Let alone, you have also had the wish not!”

The Huo Yuhao body shakes, looks up to Tang Wutong, four items of relative. He knows certainly the wish that Tang Wutong said that has not been anything.

Although Huo Yuhao has told itself. Was put down by oneself, but, can put down really completely? That is impossible. Now is at least impossible. Not only he requires the time, more importantly, must go to face.

takes a deep breath, Huo Yuhao nod of gently, “you said right. Since cannot evade, then, makes us change. Passed through these many, my present heart perhaps really can tranquil faces. However, I do not walk today, must make us treat again well for day. Anything does not think that such is accompanying you. Accompanies you to watch the sunset and sunrise. Accompanies you to look at that Yun Piao fog has lifted.”

“Good.”

They support are sitting on the Tang Wutong bed, Huo Yuhao anything has not done, they mutually are walking arm in arm, even little spoke, but looks at the beautiful scene of out of the window, was listening respectfully to each other heartbeat, was breathing each other aura. That sitting silently. At this moment, in their hearts lingers, only then happy.

When approaches in the morning once more, morning dew strong morning.

The warm hot soup drinks, eats some simple food again, the happy heart fills the air as in the hearts. This time, was reborn, not only the body, is the mind.

For a long time exhausted, pain and responsibility, as if thoroughly clean of wash within this month. The double pupil of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, became compares was clearer before, was brighter.

“Uncle Niu Tian and Uncle Tai Tan, we walked.”Huo Yuhao stands in front of two Clear Sky Sect sect master, deeply has done obeisance to them.

Although does not know how one and Tang Wutong restores, how oneself strength grows, but wants to come certainly unable to separate with these two plane cold-hearted hot sect master.

Niu Tian gives a calm smile, said: “Goes. You currently had able to move unhindered the Continent ability, so long as you are not separated, on this world can defeat your people to have, but, can destroy your people, actually almost did not exist. Looks after Wutong well. Otherwise, but also punches your boy.”

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao respectful is complying.

Tai Tan curled the lip, said: “Your this boy is unamusing, walks, walks. The Wutong young little darling, turns head time, comes back to see the uncle.”

Tang Wutong walks to go forward, has given Tai Tan and a Niu Tian big hug separately, the eye socket is red, soars with Huo Yuhao, hand in hand, goes toward the distant place flight.

Gazes after them to leave, on the Niu Tian face reveals color of the feeling relaxed, “our duties basically were accomplished finally. Can go back.”

Tai Tan also nodded, “! Should go back.”

The flight in the midair, the soldier who the air as if obeys the direction, is promoting Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong body shoots to go toward the distant place electricity.

Tang Wutong said: “Yuhao, first where do we go?”

Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, “I have not thought......”

Tang Wutong “pū”smiles. Said: “This not like you. You usually always do not provide for a rainy day, is the wisdom idea full of?”

Huo Yuhao thinks that said: “That first goes to Dou Ling Empire, that side Spirit Dou City. Also does not know Third Senior Brother that side situation processing how. What is more important is. The Sun-Moon Empire aspect does not know whether resorts to arms to Spirit Dou City. That I set the foreshadowing for before, should make the Sun-Moon Empire army have certain confusion. Does not know that will develop any degree.”

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “Right, goes to Spirit Dou City. Ju Zi(orange) lost to you, Academy and Tang Sect will not have the issue temporarily. Most dangerous is Dou Ling Empire. Third Senior Brother they not necessarily can block!”

Spirit Dou City.

Armed forces reported the unceasing load imperial palace main shrine.

In the main shrine throne, sits above high, is stature big and tall Eternal Defense Xu Sanshi.

The Spirit Dou City imperial palace suffered the ruinous attack before, in a short time, was only the simple reconstruction this main shrine, but also in the position of original imperial palace. But actually appears alone, surroundings is a stretch of open area.

The ministers had to propose that must change a position, said that is this place is unlucky. However, Xu Sanshi actually resists opposition. Where tumbles, where must stand.

Therefore. The Dou Ling Empire imperial palace, established in place originally. But actually all simplify.

One month, Xu Sanshi actually seems before had many changes, the lazy smiling face in those days in always revealing vanished, what replaces it is dignified. But is also this short one month passes, he seemed actually wants old several points. Obviously big of mental effort consumption.

“Report. Prince regent your highness, Dancing Cloud City was captured. The defense officers fight to the final soldier, in the city the people can evacuate safely.”

Also is a sad news.

Although the Xu Sanshi surface is tranquil, but complexion is actually a paleness, grips the both hands of sovereign place, turns into piece of azure Bai Se (White Color) because of overstrain.

Jiang Nannan stands side him, lifts the hand. Places on his shoulder gently, is comforting his mood slightly.

Since this month, Dou Ling Empire had a lot.

The imperial palace destroyed news, is unable to block eventually completely, spreads over the nation quickly. Land, has the different sounds immediately.

Although Dou Ling Empire enfeoffs aspect to control regarding the emperor's clan territory very strictly, but in long ago, some emperor's clan branches separate. And has the small number of people to have the real power.

The imperial palace was destroyed, almost all Imperial Family directly-related family members pass away completely, after this ruinous news spreads, heart movement will not have. The empire, is suddenly flustered. Had the ambition fellow to have the trend of being ready to make trouble quickly.

In this case, Xu Sanshi under Minister Spirit Dou City and officers' support, has controlled some peripheral cities the domination of centered on Spirit Dou City rapidly, and drawing in army as far as possible. Highly centralization.

And, the most important part of armies, are go to support the Shrek City elite army, only then has this elite army's support, the empire interior can stabilize, can suppress these careerists not to dare to act rashly.

--

Today is three! Continues to plead the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support! 20 : 00 pm, reach agreement with everybody: Outside, outside, 4095, carry on the pair of 11 big drawing events, the third child has accompanied everybody from 20 points to 0 points, simultaneously opens us to dazzle the second of world Tang Sect shop to kill the activity. We, outside move outside, will have the massive prizes to send out, signature book, Tang Sect card sign and playbill. Before purchased the book friend who we have limited the quantity the card, will also have the exclusive inquiry time. The third child also will sing simultaneously to everybody listens, singer standard!( I have thought! arrogant and pampered shape......)

Therefore, in the evening must come.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-589-part-1





Volume 12

#589 - The Sleepiness Of Xu Three Stone


But this series armed forces book of easier said than done Ah? that elite army is Emperor Dou Ling ** Fang Zhongjiang, after obtaining accurate news, the first round trip catches up, but directly has not actually returned to Spirit Dou City, but after entering Dou Ling Empire within the boundaries, is stationed temporarily in southern big city. Gives the euphemistic name, does not participate in the struggle of Imperial Family. Only accepts the most outstanding emperor's clan to control.

This clearly sits the appearance that mountain Guanhu fights. If this general is not body does not have the Imperial Family bloodlines, perhaps the situation will be more awful.

In this case, Xu Sanshi seems like put up roasts, the aspect of facing simply in the fire is quite difficult.

Respectively led the army to initiate the rebellion in the northern two emperor's clans with the name of Emperor Qin, Dou Ling Empire was void, the armies of these two emperor's clans, immediately set out toward Spirit Dou City. And an army stops at no evil, kills and burns to plunder all the way, unceasing and slaughters to expand itself through plundering.

Although the army quantity of Xu Sanshi here control are many, because before Spirit Dou City elite, was reassigned by that elite army, therefore surplus is the ordinary army, the battle efficiency can only be equal to of strengths that two emperor's clan rebellion armies. These two armies also come, the pressure can be imagined.

Regarding emperor position, Xu Sanshi is not attached, but, he cannot handing over easily. If trusts the wrong person, then regarding entire Dou Ling Empire, is the ruinous disaster.

Luckily, in this month since, the Sun-Moon Empire aspect has not launched the war to Dou Ling Empire, otherwise, the situation can only be more awful.

In the hand controls the strength to be limited, in this case, simply does not have the good means to deal.

Xu Sanshi when had just controlled Spirit Dou City, showed the enormous ability, controlled the aspect rapidly. But, must say that control entire empire, is really the prestige is insufficient, how regardless to say. He not with emperor's clan same surname. It is not genuine emperor's clan inheritance.

The Xu Sanshi family has not come to help him, this point is Xu Sanshi has not expected, comes, only then his mother. Also is the Dou Ling Empire princess.

But the Xu Sanshi father actually refuses to come to rescue, because he does not favor Dou Ling Empire under this situation, cannot bet the destiny of entire Xu, as the head of household, he must consider the interests of entire family.

Beset with difficulties both at home and abroad, can Xu Sanshi not be anxious? What can he make now? Divides forces to resist that two emperor's clans to march, the final outcome, can only be annihilated it by the minute. He can do now, only then issues the order, lets suffer to torment that side Urban People to evacuate. Meanwhile. Is the central defense line arranges in Spirit Dou City fast. Only then blocks the attack of that two emperor's clan rebel armies, he may the and Dou Ling Empire elite army to negotiate.

Although that elite army looks on with folded arms, but actually not official military commanders many attacking a fortified position by empire. Standing by has the reason, Imperial Family is on the wane, only saves some final bloodlines. Moreover not direct line.

From the bloodlines, the Xu Sanshi bloodlines are also purest, but he is surnamed Xu, but is not the snow of emperor's clan surname. This became the biggest problem. Then, in this case, who is most outstanding, who had to inherit the authority of Datong. Present Dou Ling Empire. Most needs is an outstanding king.

commander of that elite army, is testing Xu Sanshi and that two rebel armies? In their battles, who can achieve the final success, means who can be capable of inheriting Datong.

Meanwhile, that elite army position, is the strategic point. And arranges rapidly, is stopped up above border area, prepares to greet the attack from Sun-Moon Empire army at any time. Therefore, they do not listen to Xu Sanshi here order to dispatch, actually as before nobody can blame that series armed forces heavily. It looks like in many official military commanders. He has not made the mistake.

Xu Sanshi has thought must leave to go, but, can leave really? The rebel army of that two Imperial Family branches, is not the good successor. But on him, is flowing the Imperial Family blood eventually! He does not hope to see really that future Dou Ling Empire was destroyed by Sun-Moon Empire.

Therefore, after mother discussed that Xu Sanshi decides to insist. Even if must leave in the future, must make the entire empire stabilize to say first again.

Processed various official business finally, took cultivating of Xu Sanshi Soul Douluo rank as, had an exhausted feeling unexpectedly. The civil and military hundred officers retreat in abundance, in the imperial palace main hall, immediately becomes empty.

“Side that two fellows should not have what powerhouse, was inferior that we also carry on a Decapitation Strike, their to get rid of, all issues was easily solved.”Nan Qiuqiu grips the fist to say to the Xu Sanshi suggestion.

For serveral days she also thought very aggrieved, just started all were smooth, but since the empire elite army is not willing to turn back in order to help friendly forces the imperial capital, whatever the tripartite struggle position started, Xu Sanshi has been in the inferior position, the civil and military hundred officers in Spirit Dou City, the manner started becomes ** got up.

Xu Sanshi shook the head, said: “The Dou Ling Imperial Family bloodlines were already on the wane, cannot continue to bleed again. I do not prolong contact actually this position, but I do not think they can do is better than me. The empire dangerous situation, they dispatched troops into battle for the authority at this time unexpectedly, shortsighted, definitely Non- clear(ly).”

Nan Qiuqiu ill-humored [say / way]: “That what to do? Has waited for their attacking army has reached the city? to get rid of they, in the war, have not known that must die many innocent person. Haven't you heard? Urban several thousand garrison troops were slaughtered a moment ago unexpectedly, did this person keep him to do?”

Xu Sanshi looked at Nan Qiuqiu, said: “Decapitation Strike is not that easy, these two fellows dare to dispatch troops into battle, side at least over Titled Douluo support, otherwise, you think why they do compete for the throne? The elite army and Dou Ling Empire powerhouse all does not manage that side the border now. If we move rashly, once is defeated, will be more disadvantageous.”

Ye Guyi muttered the tunnel: “If Yuhao because of were good, has not thought really that he now so was unexpectedly formidable, by strength of the to Sun-Moon Empire proposed that selects ten wars, only used seven to force the Sun-Moon Empire army to admit defeat to retreat. Academy gives him to confer a title upon personally, Eye of Asura, Ice Spirit Douluo. Wutong is also labeled as Dragon-Butterfly Douluo.”

Xu Sanshi sighed, the pressure that “Yuhao shouldered was too big, First Senior Brother spread the news saying that Wutong to save him was seriously injured, Little Junior Brother brought Wutong to seek to treat, did not know the trace. At this time, we can depend upon only then oneself. Waits again, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp already on road, so long as they can rush promptly, the issue that we face can be easily solved.”

“Sanshi, you were too weak.”In this time, a gentle sound is resounding. A stature tall Tiao middle-aged female walked from behind.

She wears a magnificent and expensive long skirt, although the age was not small, but as before is actually old yet still graceful, in the Xu Sanshi look, at least six and seven points resemble with her.

Right, this is the Xu Sanshi mother, is the Dou Ling Empire princess, Xue Lingxun.

“Mother, did you come out? Your was healthy to select?”Xue Lingxun arrives at Spirit Dou City time, saw that the Dou Ling Empire imperial palace changes into stretch of ruins, own family members skeleton not saves, at that time sadly excessively to lose consciousness past. Until the recent several days, mind slightly restored.

Xu Sanshi wants to invite mother chancellor, but this situation, he also can only go against now in front.

“Son, the struggle of throne, is forever brutal. At this time, did not pay great attention to the issue of bloodlines. That two fellow who makes use to rebel, the itself Imperial Family bloodlines were very already light, but they can such quickly react, explained that it early lives the protruding bones in the occipital region. In this case, you need to do, in most in a short time, disappears all issues in initially. This miss said a moment ago right, your weakness, will cause the deaths of more person. If, uses the potential of Myriad Great Thunder to go to his head, draws in his soldier. In controls the domestic situation most in a short time, this can make our Dou Ling Empire have a vitality.”

“I had seen prime minister Sir before. You are not willing to change the surname, this also by you. But for Dou Ling, for mother, mother pleaded you and Nannan, your future first son, adopts to our Xue Clan, inherited the Sun-Moon Empire throne, how? So long as you agreed that at least the official military commanders in imperial capital, fully will support you, resists that two rebels.”

“This......”the Xue Lingxun sudden suggestion makes Xu Sanshi somewhat dumbfounded, Jiang Nannan is the bashful elegant face is redder.

Regarding Jiang Nannan this future daughter-in-law, Xue Lingxun extremely likes, but after all Xu Sanshi and Jiang Nannan have not gotten married officially, this type directly involves the issue of having a child, how can not make her shy.

Xu Sanshi subconscious looks to Jiang Nannan, Xue Lingxun also turns around facing Jiang Nannan, her eye socket was instantaneously red, unexpectedly is the knees one soft, has knelt to Jiang Nannan.

Jiang Nannan cultivates is, that is also the powerhouse of Soul Douluo rank! Discovers right, first does not respond that stretches the body forward forward, one has supported Xue Lingxun, the pliable but hard to break waist catches up slightly, held Xue Lingxun.

“Aunt, is your this does do?”On the Jiang Nannan forehead the perspiration came out.

Xue Lingxun was sobbing the [say / way]: “Child, this does obeisance you to receive, I count the ten million people for Dou Ling Empire, for the entire Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family future. I as Princess Dou Ling Empire, request you now.”

“Aunt, I and I promise you, do not cry.”Jiang Nannan is good-hearted, facing this situation, how she possibly to reject.

Xue Lingxun great happiness, tight grips the hand of Jiang Nannan, “good child and good child, thank you.”

---

Second, sought the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support. This month besides yesterday, was over three chapters renewals, the third child has been trying hard!

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-589-part-2





Volume 12

#589 - The Sleepiness Of Xu Three Stone


Xu Sanshi in the side somewhat depressed [say / way]: “You have not asked my opinion! My son also has my half!”

“At the same time!”Xue Lingxun ill-humored white his eyes. Jiang Nannan, in high spirits walks toward behind, which also a little sad meaning.

Nan Qiuqiu dumbfounded looks to transfer sad Weixi Xue Lingxun, [say / way] that muttered: “Third Senior Brother, was the aunt before an actor?”

“The Imperial Family person, where has one simply. Does not know how really my father initially was deceived my mother. Now I am somewhat clear, why my father is not willing to come. If perhaps, he came, my mother will entangle him to make me change surname.”

“Be careful!”Has stood Ji Juechen that has not opened the mouth to give a loud shout suddenly.

Xu Sanshi is also the earliest possible time responds that the body ray dodges, has changed a position with Nan Qiuqiu instantaneously.

Black Tortoise Shield appears before the body suddenly.

“Bites!”Resounds crisply, the sharp aura scatters in all directions to flutter about, is air of separate “”makes noise unexpectedly. A shadow also reappeared from the air along with it.

In this shadow hand has a handle short dagger, presents for the dull purple all over the body, is sending out the quiet cold ray.

Cannot hit, his body in a flash, has avoided slightly the Black Tortoise Shield frontage instantaneously, to Xu Sanshi body side, is a sword punctures. The rapidness of speed, is similar to electric light flint is ordinary.

Although Xu Sanshi has been blocking his first attack in a hurry, but, his shocking feeling, by the Black Tortoise Shield defensive power, cannot download the opposite party striking power unexpectedly completely, part of sharp aura extend the arm meridians to drill into within the body, made his arm colic. If not his own Soul Power is tyrannical enough, these will let his heavy wound.

Good strength big striking power, agility-attack system Battle Soul Master. No, said accurately that should be agility-attack system, seals! Number! Fight! Romania!

By Xu Sanshi present defensive power, agility-attack system Battle Soul Master that even if most is good at attacking impossible to make his Black Tortoise Shield unable to defend under a simple direct attack. Can achieve this point, the opposite party certainly is the strength of Titled Douluo rank.

A pale golden halo was almost outward has sent out from Xu Sanshi instantaneously, dispersing at the same time, golden instantaneous tarnish. Was ordinary just like the dark golden liquid, has covered the surrounding big piece space.

Sixth Soul Ability, Black Tortoise Domain.

The fight experience of Xu Sanshi is how rich, discovered right, does not use own domain ability immediately.

Under the function of Black Tortoise Domain, the speed of assassin definitely extremely will be limited.

Him starts at the same time, other three people also responded.

Sword of Trial appears in Ji Juechen both hands, but, he stands there has not moved, is only dense Sword Intent. Locks directly to that assassin.

Takes they four people of cultivating as, even if facing Titled Douluo rank powerhouse, but also did not fear.

“In the name of sacred.”The chilly sound resounds from the Ye Guyi mouth, golden light shot up to the sky together instantaneously, has covered the entire main hall. Under golden light shines, forms have also appeared. Behind Ye Guyi, three pairs of pure white wings open quietly. Six wing angels!

Right, now in their four people, cultivate to high is not Ji Juechen and Xu Sanshi, they are away from Titled Douluo, has the one pace. The true strength is most formidable, is actually Ye Guyi.

Relied on previous time was purifying massive Wraith Soul, after Ye Guyi closed up, finally successfully breaks through, became Tang Sect another Titled Douluo.

At this time, sacred light opening. All covert abilities, all does not have to hide.

Xu Sanshi treadons Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, the speed, although cannot compare the enemy, but is relying on wonderful of Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, has flashed through the opposite party following strikes. Meanwhile. Black Tortoise Shield changed into the innumerable shield shades, protects oneself. Keep the attack of that assassin from starting.

The fight experience of assassin also is very obviously rich, lost the opportunity shortly, feels crazy Sword Intent that on Ji Juechen is transmitting, he has chosen the retreat immediately. Converges with other people.

At this time, in imperial palace main hall is a peace, the opposite under the sacred light shines, appears really has twenty people. They disperse rapidly, by the potential of half surrounding, has surrounded toward the Xu Sanshi four people.

The eye-catching Soul Ring ray is that striking, in more than 20 people, unexpectedly four is the Titled Douluo rank powerhouses, surplus is also cultivating of Soul Douluo rank is. Two people seem cultivate to be weak, the middle-aged person who a year makes the forty years of age, cultivates for in the Soul Saint boundary. A complexion cloudy and cold youth, seems about 30 -year-old appearances, is six rings Soul Emperor.

The Xu Sanshi face muscle twitched slightly, looked at side not far away Nan Qiuqiu, “Decapitation Strike.”

The back room, two forms also rapidly return, is not just Jiang Nannan and Xue Lingxun? From behind, emerges several people similarly, Titled Douluo leads, other is also Soul Douluo and powerhouse of Soul Saint rank. They were surrounded.

The youth of that face darken sneers, “does not need to try to run away or seek the reinforcements, that possibly does not have any. Except that in this alone imperial palace main shrine you did not have the live person, all bodyguards were solved, outside has us to tie from eight levels of Soul Guidance Device isolation of Sun-Moon Empire purchase, even if here has overturned the day, will not spread a sound to go.”

Xu Sanshi coldly looks at the present youth, the sinking sound track: “Are you Xue Leng or Xue Kui?”

The youth laugh, breathing one's last of that arrogant happy expression extremes reveals, “this duke Xue Leng. This, is marquis Xue Kui, has not thought. We will arrive at the same place.”

At the same time was saying, he has referred to that 40-year-old middle-aged person.

“Xue Leng and Xue Kui. It seems like that you bail out to plan from the beginning well?”At the same time was saying, the Xu Sanshi vision fell on that named Xue Kui middle-aged person.

The Xue Kui look is ordinary, is that type absolutely not striking the type in the crowd, seems somewhat is even simple-hearted, who can think that is such a middle-aged person, in fact is actually a hormicidal mania demon?

That kills, will meet any city cleanly, will be he who the garrison troops will slaughter. secure province feudal lord Xue Kui.

But Xue Leng, is day and the province feudal lord.

On the title, the Xue Leng title is higher, his ancestor was Dou Ling Empire had performed the distinguished service. In the past, Heaven Dou Empire split Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire time, his ancestor once helped Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family escape chasing down of Sky Soul Empire Imperial Family successfully, finally founded a nation successfully. Therefore obtained the title of hereditary duke. In Dou Ling Empire, is platoon the merit of on position is expensive.

But Xue Kui must miss, although is also a feudal lord in province, but the title is actually a marquis.

They bring the army of territory to dispatch troops into battle with the name of Emperor Qin separately, directly soar Spirit Dou City to come, all the way, Xue Leng restrains, match who so long as does not meet the active threat, his not under cruel methods. But Xue Kui exactly opposite, meets any city, launches the attack by the potential of Myriad Great Thunder.

Dou Ling Empire originally void, a military strength of his province is the elite force, naturally sweeps away all obstacles.

However, who can think that this Xue Leng and Xue Kui bright Bright Capital City competes for the throne, actually walked in one, moreover seemed, among them was very familiar, even a little resembled including the look.

Xue Kui sinking sound track: “Xu Sanshi, your mistake lies in this turbid water. If no you, Xue Leng already sat the throne. Today, is your times of death.”

Xu Sanshi coldly visits him, said: “I am not clear, you are willing to ruin your reputation, for what? Don't you covet the throne?”

Xue Kui sneers, said: “You immediately were a deceased person, told you nothing. Xue Leng, is actually my son. In the past, I when the day and province travelled for pleasure, incautiously, knew a woman, was on the wife of a day and duke. Surplus, did not need me to say. Why must kill and burn to plunder as for me, that nothing but to serve as contrast my son. Must have the green leaf to match, safflower can be brighter, not?”

The words spoke of here, does not need to continue again, the Xue Lingxun been mad elegant face was red, angry could not speak.

“You already deliberate?”The Xu Sanshi sinking sound said.

Gives a calm smile, Xue Kui said: “Sun-Moon Empire War-God Empress promised us, so long as we have attained the dominant position, only will need to submit to Sun-Moon Empire in the future, becomes the vassal state, our Dou Ling can escape by luck. This without doubt was the present this time best choice. Resisting stubbornly does not have any significance, Sun-Moon Empire was too formidable, is not we can contend. We such do, is good for the empire.”

Xue Lingxun said fierce: “Is Soul Engineer Corp of that two sneak attack capitals, you puts?”

Xue Kui desolate [say / way]: “This type of sewage do not sprinkle on us, we will not acknowledge. That is only Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp is formidable. Or original Imperial Family small and weak result. Now, all these must finish. Xue Lingxun, you came also well, Imperial Family direct line, remaining your mother and child, so long as today you die here, then, again nobody can prevent my son to meet the position.”

Xue Leng coldly snorted, said: “What also rubbish with them? On. So long as I die.”At the same time was saying, he actually backward retreats, seems over 40 years old, in fact the age approached 60-year-old Xue Kui also similarly to retrocede.

They arranged this bureau already long time, now, arrives at yielded the achievement finally the time finally.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-589-part-3





Volume 12

#590 - Hopeless Situation


Xu Sanshi does not need to guess, can want to obtain at present these powerhouses, certainly has to be existence of Sun-Moon Empire. Otherwise, by the abilities of two province feudal lords, but also is insufficient net so numerous powerhouses, that is five Titled Douluo, massive Soul Douluo and Soul Saint rank powerhouse!

But Xu Sanshi them, altogether has six people. True Titled Douluo has Ye Guyi one.

At present this aspect, without doubt became a dead end, wants to find a way out, only then breaks through.

Xu Sanshi retroceded quietly one step, kept off before mother body. Although Xue Lingxun is a princess, but her own ability is not strong. Is relying on the emperor's clan bloodlines and numerous resources, cultivated Soul Emperor to cultivate is, was in the people weakest one.

Xu Sanshi squatting down body, “mother, you lies to me slightly carries to come up. Today the mother and child, live and die together.”

Xue Lingxun gets angry: “Anything lives and dies together. You do not need to manage me, quickly breaks through, this palace does not need you to protect.”

“Walks quickly. Sanshi, you break through.”

In the free time who they spoke, the masters who Xue Kui and Xue Leng fathers and sons brought have opened up the offensive.

Five Titled Douluo almost also separate, has sealed up five positions separately, other Soul Douluo and Soul Saint also in abundance surround, just like iron bucket general.

In Ye Guyi eye golden light sparkle, back six wings gently is flapping, the strong sacred aura blooms outward, nine Soul Ring are similar to the wave is glittering generally the ray.

From the overall strength, the Xue Kui fathers and sons got the absolute winning side, but they actually do not dare to be negligent. Because Xu Sanshi they come from Shrek Academy. So long as there is a person to run away, then, for them, can definitely be the total destruction. Therefore, today must all keep here to be good them.

Assassin Titled Douluo that before that began first quietly was hidden in the air, obviously has used any stealth ability. Other four Titled Douluo separately occupied the east, south, west and north, releases own Martial Soul respectively.

Positive Titled Douluo Martial Soul is the lion, is sending out the intense flame all over the body, should be flame Wild Lion and so on. attack system Battle Soul Master.

The left and right two Titled Douluo looks are almost exactly the same, is a twin, in the hand is grasping a handle long stick unexpectedly, this obviously was their Martial Soul.

Rear Soul Master, seems somewhat strange, the personal appearance is quite huge, the body of whole person at least wants on big one time compared with the normal person. The height exceeds about three meters, the muscle sticks out all over the body, simply likely is not humanity. This is in he has not stimulated to movement under oneself Martial Soul premise.

By the experience of Xu Sanshi, sees, this should be strength defense system Battle Soul Master, his function is mainly cuts off the people the escape route, does not make them have the opportunity of running away.

Although does not have most fearful control system in these Titled Douluo, but coped with them also to be as if enough.

Positive Wild Lion Douluo face upwards to roar, a long hair turned into the flame color completely. Just likes the long neck hair of lion inflates generally. The strong fire element fluctuation bursts out instantaneously, dreadful Lie Yan, directly soars the main hall central six people to attack, but.

Meanwhile, both sides two Titled Douluo also moved. In their hands the long stick instantaneously rises suddenly, flings high, changes into two great columns, maliciously from airborne pounds to fall under.

If Yuhao because of were good. In Tang Sect people heart. At the same time almost raised similar thought. If there is Huo Yuhao, even if he does not participate in the fight, has his direction. This fight enemy are many, they will not have the heart of least bit fear.

What a pity, here does not have Huo Yuhao, they can rely on, only then own strength.

Xu Sanshi lowers roars, personal appearance rises suddenly, golden light dodges, Black Tortoise Shield turned into the bright golden color, Golden Hawksbill Turtle has taken possession.

Ye Guyi that gets rid of first, her tip of the toe in ground, person already float, the back six wings open, even can see with the naked eye, some innumerable golden luminous spots toward her direction gathering in the past, emerged crazily.

Handle golden color Sacred Sword appears during Ye Guyi grasps, this time she, seems looks like the appearance that the deity arrives at really very much.

Before Sacred Sword cuts, the radiant golden ray, launches front Lie Yan together from out of the blue suddenly, the sharp sword glow, directly soars the dead ahead Wild Lion Douluo to go. Great column that pounds as for the both sides, she like has not seen.

Crystal pink ray also quietly glistened at this time, has not participated directly in the attack, but integrated in that Sacred Angel from the rear area quietly. The pink color dodges, quietly vanished.

In the Xu Sanshi hand Black Tortoise Shield suddenly to upcasting, Black Tortoise Shield changes into shield immediately, protects completely the people sky over.

Strong and viscous Black Tortoise Domain blooms instantaneously. Covers in which all people. Some Black Tortoise Domain, that assassin of hideaway in hidden place go into action to be affected, in the meantime, the attacks of all enemies, will be weakened and slowed down the speed.

Although facing so numerous powerful enemies, but is coming up, the forms of combat of Tang Sect people actually do not appear disorderly, instead is very orderly.

Wild Lion Douluo lowers roars, the double fist rumbles suddenly, second, third, fourth, third Soul Ring almost simultaneously shine. Also has the powerhouse of Titled Douluo rank, simultaneously uses three Soul Ability to be able such having at one's command.

His flame turned into blue color instantaneously, at the same time that the fist rumbles, sky-blue lion light shadow has run out suddenly, collides with the Sacred Sword sword glow together.

Instance that both collide, that lion suddenly strange from the sky has stagnated, blue color originally actually does not have the omen turned into the pink color, then changed into the class to vanish all at once, after the air current, the Sacred Sword sword glow almost arrived in front of Wild Lion Douluo instant.

“Well?”Wild Lion Douluo calls out in alarm one, personal appearance retrocedes rapidly several points, very big and tall body of inflation contracts suddenly simultaneously, exudes one to roar to the front.

Immediately, the forehead of his main body turned into the lion, the sixth Soul Ring ray puts greatly, one group of whirlpool air current to rush forth, block the Sacred Sword sword glow, and at an exceptional pace is wearing down it.

It seems, the attack of Sacred Sword had been blocked, but Wild Lion Douluo suddenly has the sense of fear emergence beyond description. This feeling came from innermost soul.

It is not good!

Together jet black such as sword glow of black ink, appeared at this time. Position that this sword glow presents is very covert, because the Sacred Sword ray is extremely bright, this black sword glow appears a commonplace, when the roar blocks the Sacred Sword sword glow, this black sword glow arrived.

What is that? Unequalled sharpness!

The roar bitter experience to this black sword glow, was almost the flash is cut. The strength that in the roar roared crazily truly affects this sword glow, but he, although was weakened, but actually as before used its sharply, destroyed this sixth Soul Ability thoroughly, showed to combine and complement one another unexpectedly the common effect just like the double sword with the Sacred Sword sword glow. Black and white bi-color sword glow, the flash once more arrived in front of Wild Lion Douluo.

Cold sweat “”one got down.

All these came quickly. Although that Wild Lion Douluo is responsible for the frontage, but he is also only the deceptive attack. Their people are many, everyone displays Soul Ability, sufficiently made internal Tang Sect people have too many problems to tackle. This fights they to plan to be primarily is steady, must kill off inside these people at the minimum price. Moreover, because superiority in the overall strength, they to oneself are also very confident.

But regardless of, how they cannot think that Tang Sect these people erupt so to be unexpectedly quick, altogether has six people, three people collaborated the direct attack unexpectedly the frontage.

Wild Lion Douluo wanted to display own Martial Soul avatar at this time already without enough time. Only can be roars lowly, inspires own eighth Soul Ability with the quickest speed, tries to resist with oneself powerful Soul Ability.

But also at this time, the Ye Guyi back six wings simultaneously opened the maximum degree, a clear and bright long and loud cry sound got up.

In the sky, does not have the omen suddenly splits a slit, the Saint light drops from the clouds together, suddenly bombardment on Wild Lion Douluo.

This does not have the attack that the means fend, Wild Lion Douluo only thought that whole body one tight, within the body Soul Power starts to burn crazily. What is more fearful, the eighth Soul Ability flash of his displayed was broken unexpectedly.

Sacred Light Illuminate!

This is Ye Guyi entering step Soul Ability, even there is a certain self-created nature. Is she through comprehends unceasingly diligently. Originally was first Soul Ability Sacred Light Illuminate makes her comprehend the interruption effect unexpectedly voluntarily. Once were hit, Soul Ability that will be broken display.

Sacred Angel Martial Soul as Martial Soul of world most top, is in itself not now inferior in Huo Yuhao Absolute Martial Soul, since Ye Guyi cultivates to break through Titled Douluo, in fact from individual battle efficiency, she is next to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, is the Tang Sect true third person.

Even if Ji Juechen and Xu Sanshi and she compares has certain disparity.

Ye Guyi is very clear, today such aspect, needs under the pain the killer, everybody has the opportunity of going on living, therefore, she comes up not to have any to keep the meaning of hand.

The Wild Lion Douluo biggest mistake, despised her. Ji Juechen and Nan Qiuqiu have truly gotten rid, helping Ye Guyi attack, unifies three people of strength.

This made Wild Lion Douluo have certain misunderstanding, thinks that these three person single strengths of were not too strong. Especially Ye Guyi this Titled Douluo, was really too young! Moreover, what he cannot even recognize Ye Guyi Martial Soul is, wing are many, what is this?

It is not each Soul Master has Shrek Academy Soul Master that insight.

Therefore, when Ye Guyi true eruption, Wild Lion Douluo has paid the price for own general idea.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. Today the pair 11, welcome everybody to arrive at us to dazzle the world Tang Sect shop to select and purchase the Tang Sect signature book and peripheral product, some massive preferential activities send out. Naughty, treasure, shop, search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find us!( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-590-part-1





Volume 12

#590 - Hopeless Situation


golden light is almost triggering -type instantaneous lightening. On this Wild Lion Douluo has Paragon Protecting Cover impressively.

However, to the contest of Titled Douluo this level, the function of Paragon Protecting Cover is not that obvious, black and white bi-color sword light arrival, almost instantaneously the Paragon Protecting Cover smashing. Remaining sword glow falls on Soul Ability broken Wild Lion Douluo.

Wild Lion Douluo stuffy snort|hum, front were many a trace, has Paragon Protecting Cover and his own tyrannical Soul Power luckily, this truly has not received the too big injury.

However, at this moment, Angel Douluo Ye Guyi erupted, radiant golden light bursts out from her suddenly outward, intense golden light is centered on her body bursts out outward.

It seems, that looks like huge golden light barrier outward, in process that before fought, other Soul Master that Xue Kui and Xue Leng brought also respectively started long-distance has attacked Soul Ability.

These Soul Ability sole, might is not too powerful, but wins in the person are many! These many people attack together, striking power is very fearful.

In this case, Ye Guyi started.

The surrounding all long-distance attacks fall above golden light that in she releases, was opened by the instantaneous ball, golden light to shatter time, all attacks either were refracted one side, either was resisted directly. Two great columns that airborne drops both were blocked a hindrance, falls above the Xu Sanshi shield wall.

“Bang”a dull thumping sound, the shield wall thunders fiercely, Xu Sanshi stuffy snort|hum, but actually stiffly blocked this has struck.

Is relying on collaboration of Xu Sanshi and Ye Guyi, they such resisted first round besieging of so numerous powerhouse unexpectedly.

But the Ye Guyi offensive then just started, she displayed a moment ago, is own Soul Ability Holy Light Spirit Formation. The body of her whole person turned into the radiant golden color suddenly. The power of golden light, making her seem looks like carves with the gold becomes.

The back six pieces of wings also turned into the similar color. Seventh Soul Ability, angel avatar.

Sacred Angel just like arrives at the common, formidable sacred aura from God Realm releases suddenly outward. Make all hostile her person instantaneously to feel the huge oppression strength.

Arranges the eighth Soul Ring ray on her puts greatly. Together golden form instantaneous separation, but moves sideways, appeared behind Wild Lion Douluo.

Wild Lion Douluo was just broken Soul Ability, just wanted to display Soul Ability, releases own seventh Soul Ability Martial Soul avatar. But appears in that golden angel form in his back flash, the body of his whole person stagnated.

Wild Lion Douluo only thought own soul as if instantaneously had been deadlocked, he goes all out to revolt, how regardless of is actually unable to work loose. That golden light shadow. Integration that unexpectedly is quietly to Wild Lion Douluo within the body.

The Wild Lion Douluo whole person turned into the golden color, with the breath, the golden air current overflows from the seven orifices outward.

Such strange, making Wild Lion Douluo people have a scare. Also at this moment, the jet black sword glow flashes through together instantaneously. The surrounding space as if stagnated flash. Soul Master of Soul Douluo rank called out pitifully, the body had been cut both sides.

In the battlefield, the striking power is most formidable, forever is having terror Sword Intent Sword Mad!

The terrifying attack erupts instantaneously, the person of first dying in battle appeared.

Xue Kui and Xue Leng drew back, but actually as before cannot bear some discolorations at this time very much. In situation that in these many powerhouses besiege, came up unexpectedly these to kill one, really worthily was the powerhouse who Shrek Academy came out!

Hears that Xu Sanshi. One of this generation of Shrek Seven Devils.

Strikes to go well, in the Ji Juechen hand Sword of Trial another sword crosswise cuts, although this time cannot kill people once more, but the positive massive enemies will also compel to draw back.

The powerful fight launches completely, at this time, Wild Lion Douluo suddenly shouted wildly one, whole body golden light erupted instantaneously outward. His whole person as if soul was stripped, the eye pupil turned into Bai Se (White Color) completely fiercely, the body is shivering. Massive fire attribute Soul Power gush out from the pore, follows has the blood to appear.

Actually this and are this what Soul Ability?

A Titled Douluo rank powerhouse. This Soul Ability, has linked unexpectedly as if an ability of resisting not to have. This simply was too inconceivable.

All Soul Master on the scene see this, was completely shocking. They could see that this is eighth Soul Ability that Ye Guyi has.

Eighth Soul Ability, considers Death Angel!

After the golden color spurts is thin, burns, changes into a giant light beam to shoot up to the sky, Wild Lion Douluo crazily was calling out pitifully in this light beam, how regardless of is actually unable to run out from this light beam outward.

Also is golden light barrier bursts out together outward, as before is Holy Light Spirit Formation, melted the majority of attacks for everybody once more.

Ye Guyi whole body golden light rises suddenly once more, based on Martial Soul avatar, a golden wing launches in pairs successively, but on her ninth Soul Ring has also shone.

This, Xue Leng and Xue Kui felt the fear. This woman was too fearful, seems the 20-year-old age, why has the so fearful strength? The outcome that she displays was what kind of ability Ah? a moment ago eighth Soul Ability, has made a Titled Douluo rank the powerhouse life and death not know that then, what then she must display was ninth Soul Ability! Also will have what kind of situation?

Six pairs of angel wings doubled directly, from six wings originally, increased to 12 wings. In this flash, the Ye Guyi aura continues to select for promotion, arrived at the extremely terrifying region, as before is Holy Light Spirit Formation, but this time, these seven rings and eight rings Soul Master attack collectively, is actually not able to reconstruct any to destroy.

The so terrifying strength, has surpassed these Dou Ling Empire Soul Master cognition completely.

Xue Kui and Xue Leng before today's pursuer Decapitation Strike, after the close investigation, have certain research regarding the strength of Xu Sanshi side people.

However, they completely have not actually thought that these seem very young, biggest is also 30 -year-old over youth men and women, actually has such powerful strength.

Especially Ye Guyi, before then, they have not taken seriously her! Nobody knows that she unexpectedly is the Titled Douluo rank powerhouse, moreover is so formidable Titled Douluo.

12 wings, what 12 wings represent is what? The big angel is long. That was not humanity worried, but is the god!

Therefore, Ye Guyi ninth Soul Ability, is the big angel long arrives, is called, Angel God!

Terrifying golden light spreads from her, displays Angel God, she can only continue for ten seconds. But within these ten seconds, she can have close Limit Douluo boundary strength temporarily. If she is Transcendent Douluo cultivates now is, this time will lengthen to 30 seconds.

Ten seconds, could not handle too many matters, but killed several people, were.

Sacred Sword of golden light sparkle appears in the big angel long hand, the wrist|skill shakes, Sacred Sword changed into Saint light to sway outward.

Both sides that two hold the Titled Douluo powerhouse of stick all additionally to be looked, when the Saint light cuts next, they can only go all out stimulates to movement oneself Martial Soul avatar, integrates in oneself that long stick completely, going all out resists the Sacred Sword prestige energy.

When the Saint light finished completely, their long sticks cut off close half, moreover cut off some disappears directly.

Moreover, positive Soul Master, at least over six people, purify in the Saint light. Back that defense system Titled Douluo similarly was also divided to fly by a sword.

An eruption of person, unexpectedly intrepidly in this way.

“To!”Xu Sanshi explodes drinks one. golden light dodges, he has changed the position. When he appears again, arrived at side Xue Kui, but beforehand Xue Leng, then to originally the Xu Sanshi position.

Jiang Nannan already waited there, Waist Bow, locks in the opposite party instantaneously, Xue Leng by pounding maliciously in the ground.

Black Tortoise Shield hits hard Xue Kui. Although Xue Kui stimulates to movement Soul Power promptly, but was patted to fly, and was affected by Mystic Deep Tremor, the whole body is lacking in vigilance.

Xu Sanshi explodes to drink one, the Golden Hawksbill Turtle prestige can show comprehensively, in the hand the Black Tortoise Shield numerous bombardments in the ground, in the fierce bellow, the big piece black wave expand beyond the Black Tortoise Domain introversion, the frontage surplus numerous Soul Master shakes the footsteps in Black Tortoise Domain staggers.

In the Ji Juechen hand the Sword of Trial black and white bi-color almost also sparkles, is three people falls from the sky under his sword cuts, pushes to the front, runs out forward.

Huge soft muscle python from Jiang Nannan within the body separation, in the direct winding that Xue Leng, has held up him high, sweeps toward the rear area. Forces following Soul Master not to dare to come up actually.

The eighth Soul Ring sparkle, Nan Qiuqiu elegant face piece of ice-cold, shines huge Rouge Dragon light shadow, that Rouge Dragon dragon mouth big, emits outward bunch of glittering and translucent carving pink bright sphere, bright sphere in airborne explodes in abundance, behind all regions will block completely.

Rouge Dragon Annihilation Martial Soul formidable eighth Soul Ability, Annihilation Storm.

Terrifying Annihilation Power, making all Soul Ability that behind attacks be cut off completely outside, too quick Soul Saint that flushing bangs into that Annihilation Storm, instantaneously disappeared to vanish, has not stayed behind including a trace.

Xue Lingxun is also a smart person, how this opportunity will let off, hurries to follow in Ji Juechen behind outward runs out.

In the Ye Guyi hand in sky Sacred Sword crosswise sweeps once more, Holy Light Spirit Formation is fully outward one.

Angel God Soul Ability finished, but this final Holy Light Spirit Formation expands outward, actually collision stiffly flew in all people including several Titled Douluo.

--

Newest cartoon everybody who we stand looked, later will also continue to issue that the entity books of all cartoons, our shop had, everybody can go: Dazzles world Tang Sect, selects and purchases. ( to be continued )

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-590-part-2





Volume 12

#590 - Hopeless Situation


Nan Qiuqiu appears side Ye Guyi at the right moment, Ye Guyi floating falls, the back 12 pieces of wings also take back, vanish. She was also face whiten bending down behind Nan Qiuqiu.

She just became shortly after Titled Douluo, the ability was unstable. But Angel God arrives, consumes Soul Power extremely, in the back of strong capability, is huge overdrawing.

After having displayed this Soul Ability, in a short time, she did not have the battle efficiency. But is relying on her eruption, gave everybody to strive for means of livelihood eventually.

Nan Qiuqiu just carried on the back Ye Guyi, at this time. The black form does not have reappearing of omen together behind Ye Guyi. The sharp deep purple short dagger, directly soars the Ye Guyi back of the body insertion.

It looks like in all people, the threat is biggest, is this is having the mysterious Angel Martial Soul powerhouse, because of her existence, lets all these time follow the powerhouses who Xue Kui and Xue Leng come to fall on leeward.

Therefore, must first to get rid of she.

This assassin Titled Douluo bore patiently was very long, at this time, could not bear get rid finally.

However, in the flash that he gets rid, the form suddenly appeared in Ye Guyi together behind, intense golden light eruption. Has blocked stiffly this time.

Blocks this to strike for Ye Guyi, is Jiang Nannan, fourth Soul Ability, Paragon Golden Body.

That black clothed Titled Douluo has gawked, a pink big hand appeared before him, Hand of Annihilation. Nan Qiuqiu contains ones anger to erupt.

Jiang Nannan soft muscle python also followed, Soul Ability that Jiang Nannan has, it can use, this is it most formidable place.

Must say in the people, the spirit is most practical, in fact was Jiang Nannan.

The soft muscle python giant body crosswise moves, compels to draw back that black clothed assassin. Although Hand of Annihilation was melted by his later attack, but also gave the people to win the time.

Here must be the Dou Ling Empire capital, the Spirit Dou City imperial palace is at unexpectedly.

Although outside had been sealed up sound by Soul Guidance Device, so long as can clash from this main hall. Then had the hope. So long as has alarmed the surrounding garrison troops, although these enemies are formidable, actually also insufficient dreads.

Shield hit of Xu Sanshi maliciously on wall, loudly in bang. This just constructed soon imperial palace main shrine to be broken a big piece of wall by him, Xu Sanshi has not let off the meaning of that Xue Kui. Takes his cultivating as, Xue Kui before him radically is not anything.

Soul Saint that ordinary Soul Master cultivates, before the Shrek Academy Soul Douluo rank powerhouse, absolutely does not have the possibility of least bit revolt, let alone, Xu Sanshi itself approaches existence in Titled Douluo level.

The Eternal Defense name is not Bai Jiao.

The big hand lifts, toward Xue Kui direction one move. This is the Black Tortoise Replacement variation ability, golden Golden Hawksbill Turtle behind the ray dodges in him, giant gold appeared on Xue Kui. Stiffly entrains backward his.

However, at this time, on Xue Kui and Xue Leng unexpectedly shone the similar ray, two silver light dodged, they simultaneously disappeared unexpectedly.

Teleportation? Did they actually grasp this Soul Ability?

No. It is not right, that as if likely is not Soul Ability, but likely is the Soul Guidance Device ability.

Xu Sanshi is startled. However, at this time, he could not attend to other, first flushed to say again. In the hand holds up Black Tortoise Shield, he directly flushed to outside. Tries to rush to outside, so long as outside, has been able to summon the garrison troops.

However, he just ran out one step, next quarter, his body on flying upside down. Returned in the main hall.

The low and deep bellow, red-orange ray, almost also blooms.

“Nine levels of Soul Engineer, outside has nine levels of Soul Engineer.”Xu Sanshi angry was roaring.

At this time, under the leadership of Ji Juechen. Other partners arrived at side him, happen to saw that he was shelled.

Hears Xu Sanshi to mention nine levels of Soul Engineer these characters, the complexion of people instantaneously all becomes ugly.

If one-to-one, Xu Sanshi had not feared that really nine levels of Soul Engineer, are relying on his own formidable defense capability, even if could not defeat the opposite party, socialized or does not have the issue, once gave him the opportunity, nine levels of Soul Engineer will possibly fold in his hands.

But, the present situation is different, these many Soul Master in! Although Wild Lion Douluo at this time in considering the Death Angel Saint light withered away thoroughly, but in this main hall, four Titled Douluo. Two by Ye Guyi heavy wound, but battle efficiency also, but was weakened. May also assassin Titled Douluo and defends Titled Douluo.

Has in the situation that nine levels of Soul Engineer eye covetously outside, they want to run away became the almost impossible matters.

What to do? Actually can what to do?

A series of eruptions, had consumed up Ye Guyi Soul Power a moment ago, cultivating of other people, although also, but, they want to show that round eruption not to be impossible again a moment ago.

Ye Guyi lost the battle efficiency now, cultivates for weak Xue Lingxun must protect. At this time, as if truly fell into the dead end.

The Xue Leng gloomy sound passed from outside, “died, you died. If not my Teacher Teleportation pouch, perhaps you also really can go well, what a pity, this all already during our computations. Therefore, you died, cannot go on living. Has killed them, they the quick strength have used up.”

At this time, in main hall, but also surplus more than 20 Soul Master, that assassin Titled Douluo has also appeared the personal appearance, four Titled Douluo bring numerous position Soul Master to surround from the different directions.

The desperate color, appears gradually above the face of Tang Sect people, Nan Qiuqiu clenches the teeth, puts back Ye Guyi. On rapid clothing own Extreme Ice Battle God Armor.

Although this Extreme Ice Battle God Armor is inferior to Huo Yuhao that but also sufficiently makes her have the strength of close Titled Douluo rank temporarily.

Although Xue Lingxun actual combat experience is not rich, but the basic fight accomplishment, her is still very clear, oneself this cultivating is, can only add to the chaos to the people, therefore withdraws very much on own initiative, protects side Ye Guyi.

Ye Guyi sits cross-legged to sit, in both hands is grasping a milk bottle respectively, does not pay attention to the outside completely all, starts to restore Soul Power fully. Can restore some are, at present this aspect, wanted to break through directly was not too possible, they can do, was as far as possible spells with these enemies.

Outside nine levels of Soul Engineer have not planned to come in obviously, the outside broad space most favors him displaying, but this quite unenlightened space in the main hall facing top Soul Master, the wise is not. Let alone, all people believe that inside Soul Master dealt with the surplus people enough.

The Xu Sanshi facial features are solemn, the hand grasps Black Tortoise Shield, has arrived at the Nan Qiuqiu front in big strides, Ji Juechen and Nan Qiuqiu respectively by his body, Jiang Nannan in his rear area, four people arranges the simple battlefield.

Opposite party four Titled Douluo forward gradually, but eagerly has not actually attacked. Before the round eruption of Tang Sect people, had made the extremely profound impression on them.

Time that several times breathe, on to get rid of Titled Douluo! Although they also because of this eruption, causing Titled Douluo to lose the battle efficiency temporarily, but this and directly by to get rid of but different.

Moreover, that formidable Titled Douluo is trying to restore Soul Power, this is not the good phenomenon. But they do not dare to be too anxious similarly, no one is willing to make the person who takes the lead. The life only then one time, a risk, will possibly lose the life, in the situation of overwhelming superiority, they will not make such piffle.

Four Titled Douluo behind Soul Douluo and Soul Saint, released their Martial Soul avatar. Only then under the Martial Soul avatar condition, they can show the most formidable strength.

This is the matter that they must handle now, Martial Soul avatar, formidable Martial Soul avatar. Terrifying battle efficiency, soon will launch in this moment.

The tyrannical aura fills the air in the air, four Titled Douluo have not displayed Martial Soul avatar, because this is more flexible. They only need to block Xu Sanshi and the others the eruptions, surplus that twenty Soul Saint and powerhouse all-out attack of Soul Douluo rank, sufficiently submerged them. This strategy, is nothing less than sinister, but Tang Sect people, even cannot retrocede.

Dissimilar in shape and form Martial Soul avatar have shown slowly, the air as if became dignified, Xu Sanshi ray twinkle, in the hand the Black Tortoise Shield golden light senior branch, was releasing the radiant halo, so long as the opposite party began, he will display his Black Tortoise avatar immediately, by the Black Tortoise avatar condition, he had the confidence to defend these match some time attacks. Eternal Defense is not Bai Jiao.

As for these days, the partners can strike to kill many enemies, that can only meet one's fate with resignation, since cannot get away, that striking as far as possible kills the match.

In both sides at daggers drawn, the war is ready to be set off, suddenly, outside transmits a short pitiful yell.

“Um?”Hears this pitiful yell, Xu Sanshi opposite four Titled Douluo are the complexion changes. Outside simply does not have Xu Sanshi their people, will send out the pitiful yell, and passes on, only then their people are right, in other words, very possible was the Xu Sanshi reinforcements comes.

In this case, which their also dares to have retention of half minute, four Titled Douluo simultaneously explode drinks one, has attacked toward the people. In their behind Soul Saint and Soul Douluo, whole-heartedly is releasing their Soul Ability, suddenly, various Soul Ability just like blotting out the sky general, from all directions to rush forth, but, the goal refers, is positive Xu Sanshi.

So long as has routed Xu Sanshi, although the battle efficiencies of other people are strong, but the defensive power is actually absolutely insufficient, in a short time, they can strike clean that kills these people.

--

Double 11 next day, opening! The preferential benefit continues, altogether three days of preferential activities. Everybody is washing, treasure, shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find us.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-590-part-3





Volume 12

#591 - Spirit Cirque Luo Arrives


However, at this time, these four Titled Douluo saw, Xu Sanshi not only does not have the least bit to be startled, on the face instead revealed the strange smiling face. Right, is strange smiling face.

He has turned around suddenly, even with the back to this these people, in the hand Black Tortoise Shield toward void wields at present, fourth Soul Ring, the ray puts greatly.

This is Eternal Defense Xu Sanshi formidable divine skill, Black Tortoise Replacement.

The ray dodges, Xu Sanshi lost the trace.

All followed Soul Master that Xue Kui and Xue Leng came to be shocked, did he such walk? Although does not know how he leaves. But, he walks, the following Tang Sect people, as well as his mother must face this all attacks, will die. At this time, did he run unexpectedly?

Rapidness that this thought that presents, but finished similarly also quick. The ray dodges, the next flash that Xu Sanshi vanishes, the form has replaced in addition his formerly position together.

From this form, bloomed the unequalled radiant gloss.

The air suddenly becomes extremely cold, the temperature in entire main hall instantaneous falls crazily, the innumerable ice thorns, are common just like the ice flower that opens instantaneously, take the body of that person as the beginning, spreads toward audiences Xue Kui and Xue Leng subordinates.

That ice punctures has three meters high fully, flies that the Soul Ability complete puncture and interception that outrageously shoots to come. Four Titled Douluo also can only attack these ice thorns with respective Soul Ability, in order to avoid own body was pierced.

Wears the man of Bai Se (White Color) long gown, appears before the position that Xu Sanshi was, unexpectedly is only Soul Ability, is only one! Completely has prevented the attacks of all people.

That three meters ice thorns, that hard, is containing energy, is Soul Saint and Soul Douluo rank powerhouse is unable to shake completely. Even if four Titled Douluo, can only be shot to fly away.

“Soul Shaking Burst.”The low and deep sound resounds from that white clothing youth mouth, the air became illusory.

Soul Master headed by four Titled Douluo, only think the forehead such as the great hammer to be ordinary, in body fierce shivering, stuffy snort|hum backlash, Soul Ability that wants to continue to display, was all broken. These Soul Saint cultivate for the Soul Master situation is most miserable, relieves directly from the Martial Soul avatar condition, falls draws back at the same time backward, the seven orifices bleed, received heavy wound.

“Group Weakening.”A Bai Se (White Color) halo spreads, has covered all people once more. The intense weak feeling, is destroying their physical strength rapidly.

Why that white clothing youth as if must all tell them oneself, his sound resounds once again, “Chaotic Mind.”

Four whirlpools, appear, appears on four Titled Douluo respectively, making them all fall into short vacant.

The white clothing youth right hand lifts, the dark blue ray appears together during he grasps, that is a handle slender dark blue long sword.

The long sword cuts instantaneously, four Titled Douluo, all change into the ice sculpture, falls to fly to go backward.

Strikes frozen four Douluo. Is this what kind prestige energy?

However, more terrorist also in behind.

“Blows, Snowstorm.”Innumerable snowflakes, that float appearance in void, manic Snowstorm, swarms to go toward that crowd of Soul Master just like the blowout generally.

The temperature in the flash, dropped two hundred degree celsius below zero below, but that white clothing youth behind, was actually as warm as in spring.

The whole body blood has as if frozen, in addition Group Weakening and Soul Shaking Burst effect. In these ordinary days very formidable Soul Saint and Soul Douluo, can only roll up the body, going all out stimulation of movement Soul Power and Soul Ability, defends oneself.

What a pity, all these as if are futile efforts, in front of that manic Snowstorm, the terrifying ultra-low temperature they are only because cultivates for the height is different, the time of resisting has a difference. After ten seconds, one side of the entire main hall, completely is world of ice sculpture.

From appearing finished to the fight, the entire process is just dozens seconds. All, were peaceful.

Outside the main hall, two body shadow bands two forms were walking.

In the Xu Sanshi hand grabs Xue Kui, another has the female of pink-blue color long hair, in the hand grabs Xue Leng mail-armor and helmet, this snow fathers and sons complexion schungite, all lowers the head, keeps silent.

The white clothing youth has turned around, looks to people, unfolds the face to smile, “hello, did you think me?”

The Nan Qiuqiu working as chest gratefully is a fist, “how do you come now?”

The white clothing youth says with a smile painstakingly: “You cannot gentle.”

Nan Qiuqiu snort|hum, “wanted gently, looks for your family Wutong to go? Wutong, you have been all right, was really good.”

Right, is this white clothing youth not just Huo Yuhao? That and Xu Sanshi walks together, naturally was Tang Wutong.

Reason that on the Xu Sanshi beforehand face will reappear the strange smiling face, because he felt oneself most familiar Spiritual Detection and Sharing once again! Huo Yuhao told him, must trade with him, thereupon, Black Tortoise Replacement has delivered to Huo Yuhao the main hall.

The following process, was simple.

Let other people already the somewhat desperate powerhouse, in front of Huo Yuhao, unexpectedly is similar to easily accomplished general, such solved.

Ye Guyi also no longer meditate, stands up, has same extending with Ji Juechen, they look at present Huo Yuhao, seems like looking at monster.

A [say / way] of Huo Yuhao face forced smile: “You leave think so me to be good, I will be shy.”

A Ji Juechen arrow step arrived in front of Huo Yuhao, maliciously is looking steadily at him, “said that you do achieve? Even if you broke through Transcendent Douluo, should not Ah? basic on useless any formidable Soul Ability, such has solved these many powerhouses, this was really too inconceivable.”

This Sword Mad was usually few to speak these many words, said these words, even some stammeringly.

Huo Yuhao smiles, said: “I and Wutong Martial Soul Fusion restored, a moment ago we continuously in the same place . Moreover, now our Martial Soul Fusion effect, under desirably control, even if our two separate, can maintain for about ten seconds. But in these ten seconds, you saw that approaches in the Limit Douluo standard infinitely, and has Absolute Martial Soul Huo Yuhao! These mixed fish, was considered as anything.”

One month ago, before he did not have achievement Transcendent Douluo, relies on strength of the to make the Sun-Moon Empire army repulse the enemy, say nothing of now. Does not need to put on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, he can make these cultivate to high 92 levels of Titled Douluo at present be annihilated.

However, under the freeze of Absolute Ice, these people have not died, but was frozen all, life symptom also, but, their present lives, all grasp in the Huo Yuhao hand.

Xu Sanshi throws Xue Kui on the ground, looked that does not look at his one eyes. Regarding this Xue Kui and Xue Leng, he already has the thick murderous intention.

Xue Lingxun also arrives at side Xu Sanshi, a face curious looks at Xu Sanshi to ask: “Sanshi, this is? Is the senior in your Shrek Academy? It seems so young, the senior, how do you maintain?”

Xu Sanshi face muscle tics, oneself maid anything is good, sometimes is a little off-line, naturally, if because of this point, initially the father were not necessarily able walking that the maid kidnaps, generally speaking, is off-line good.

“Mother, you comedy. This is not the senior, is my brother, said accurately that is my Junior Brother, Huo Yuhao. Some time ago spread the news, by strength of the, wins streak seven, routed five Titled Douluo to add two nine levels of Soul Engineer Eye of Asura, Ice Spirit Douluo Huo Yuhao. This is Dragon-Butterfly Douluo Tang Wutong.”

Xue Lingxun stared in a big way the eye, had a look at Huo Yuhao, had a look at Xu Sanshi again.

Huo Yuhao hurries to draw Tang Wutong to go forward to salute, said: “Aunt, hello.”

Xue Lingxun has swallowed saliva, suddenly, a palm of the hand arranges on the Xu Sanshi arm, “brat, you simply is a waste! You have a look at others, is younger than you.”

[Say / Way] that Xu Sanshi does not know whether to laugh or cry immediately: “Mother, can the normal person compared with monster? But my this Little Junior Brother the monster in monster. Your son was good, being content Chang Le!”

“.”Nearby Jiang Nannan coughs two, said: “Sanshi, Aunt, are we present matter will process first?”

Xu Sanshi complexion one cold, immediately nodded. Then looks up to Huo Yuhao, in look reveals the color of inquiry.

Huo Yuhao shook the head to him, said: “I begin by all means that here, I am Third Senior Brother your goon, you make me do, do I do, but the idea wants you to take. These people have not died, naturally, they also momentarily can die. You look at the office.”

The Xu Sanshi look has stagnated, looks again to mother.

Xue Lingxun has also replied at this time normally, complexion ugly [say / way]: “Should kill.”

Xu Sanshi silent, actually shook the head, said: “You stay here, I exit to call the person. It seems like that something must talk clearly are good.”

Before outside knot by Huo Yuhao, has relieved, after the quarter, the news all spread. After half double-hour, in imperial palace main hall, has stood the Dou Ling Empire official military commander.

All in main hall, Xu Sanshi has not made the people move, including Xue Kui and Xue Leng fathers and sons.

The father and son at this time are the surface like dying embers, in front of audiences so formidable Soul Master, they simply does not have the possibility of least bit revolt.

As for formerly outside that nine levels of Soul Engineer, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong came the time, they collaborated to give him Celestial Emperor Hammer. Fully examines them to collaborate to show the Martial Soul Fusion technique now the might. Does not know on any case that nine levels of Soul Engineer has any Defensive Soul Guidance Device, has anything to be useless, died directly.

---

On that day outside outside moved, read beyond our Douluo and new book Little Duan to everybody, does not know that everybody felt what kind, at present looked that the echo was good, later we will also hold similar activities, I gave back to everybody to study to listen.

Today is we dazzles the world Tang Sect pair of 11 second day. The massive preferential activities, ten million do not miss.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-591-part-1





Volume 12

#591 - Spirit Cirque Luo Arrives


Huo Yuhao even also somewhat loves dearly, nine levels of Soul Engineer, that may be the motion treasure houses! The body good thing to have numerous number, what a pity, with enough time has not grabbed, the fellow * fell.

Xu Sanshi sits above the throne high, the side sits Xue Lingxun, Huo Yuhao and the others, stands in both sides.

The situation in main hall was very obvious, until now, the temperature in entire main hall is very low, after each official military commander comes, because of cold, but somewhat shivers.

Repair to high fortunately, is not Soul Master these, but was miserable. Freezes the complexion to be pale.

Xue Kui and Xue Leng fathers and sons tied up by Huo Yuhao, throws in the main hall central ground, they lower the head, do not say a word. But other these were frozen become Soul Master of ice sculpture, at this time also ice sculpture. Each stands erect there, maintains was attacking the time the appearance.

“What this and this had?”In each official military commander heart, had almost the similar thought. In them, some many people can recognize Xue Kui and Xue Leng fathers and sons appearance.

And some people, the complexion also became specially ugly.

“Prince regent your highness, what this and this had? Xue Kui and can the Xue Leng two people, why here? These ice sculptures, what's the matter?”The prime minister could not bear finally, walked, on one knee knelt down, asked to Xu Sanshi. It is not the emperor, but also receives not to the knees big ritual.

The Xu Sanshi surface sinks like the water, said: “These two captives, prime minister recognizable?”

The prime minister said: “Feudal official knew that this is day and the province feudal lord, Duke Xue Leng, this is secure province feudal lord, Duke Xue Kui. How they can......”

Xu Sanshi said indifferently: “Won't their here you be why clear? That thirty ice sculptures, are the people who they bring. And five Titled Douluo, in ground this burned black, was stayed behind by one person that we struck to kill a moment ago. But outside, making the bodyguard look carefully, a nine levels of Soul Engineer corpse.”

Such remarks, the audience is all startled. Nine levels of Soul Engineer mean anything, they were too clear. Especially a moment ago on these faces the look unnatural person, at this time was the complexion big change.

On Continent, has such 1-2 nine levels of Soul Engineer besides Shrek Academy, other nine levels of Soul Engineer, all in Sun-Moon Empire.

The Shrek Academy person, is naturally impossible to obey Xue Kui and Xue Leng to dispatch, the answer was then self-evident. The Dou Ling Empire imperial palace, may just thoroughly be ruined by Sun-Moon Empire, all Imperial Family were killed cleanly! This is the intense and deep-seated hatred.

“You talked nonsense! Where has any nine levels of Soul Engineer, even if has, is your people. Why otherwise did you use the strength of this person to defeat our that many Titled Douluo?”Xue Leng have a strong sense of righteousness is roaring. He is very clear, if no longer spelled at this time, again did not have the opportunity.

Xu Sanshi stands up, from the stair, “Xue Leng, you were clear my origin?”

Xue Leng do not go excessively, does not visit him.

Xu Sanshi said: “I come from Shrek Academy, attains contemporary Shrek Seven Devils by luck. Sun-Moon Empire army, before soon, outside our Academy city. Why as to defeat your ineffective and worthless troops, I only needed saying that a name, everybody understood.”

At the same time was saying, he arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, sinking sound track: “This is my Junior Brother, believes that on the scene has many people to see him, then, I emphasized his name. He called Huo Yuhao. Believes that this name everybody does not feel strange.”

“Huo Yuhao?”The prime minister muttered talked over one, but was quick, he gained ground, on the face full is the color of shock, “your highness, what you said before was soon, in the Shrek City extroversion Sun-Moon Empire army proposed that to select ten, won streak seven, forcing Sun-Moon Empire War-God Empress to admit defeat, that Eye of Asura and Ice Spirit Douluo that Huo Yuhao the army withdrew?”

Xu Sanshi nodded, “good, is he. Moreover, I must tell everybody again a matter, after the confirmation of Yuhao, the sneak attack has attacked our Dou Ling Empire imperial palace, causes Ferocious Beasts that Imperial Family nearly exterminates, is Sun-Moon Empire two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp and Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp. Yuhao and Wutong two people pursue continuously, by own ability, these two Soul Engineer Corp destruction half, was strikes to kill Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp, was reported part of enmity for our Dou Ling Empire.”

“Laughable!”Xue Kui screamed one, “Sun-Moon Empire Beast King Level was Soul Engineer Corp what kind of existence? That is becomes Hand of the National Protector, the Sun-Moon Empire strongest strength, two Soul Engineer Corp both can ruin our imperial palaces, but can they cope? That two Soul Engineer Corp linkage is Soul Guidance Device decorates? Xu Sanshi, this words can you also say?”He spoke of the final time, can emphasize the Xu Sanshi surname.

Xu Sanshi has smiled, laughs, in very carefree, entire main hall that smiles is reverberating his laughter.

“Know-nothing party is dauntless. You may know, what level my this brothers' strengths are? You had not seen a moment ago, your under these ineffective and worthless troops, including four Titled Douluo, in front of my Junior Brother, but is the range chicken earthenware dog, is only Soul Ability, they turned into this appearance. I told you, my Junior Brother, was Limit Douluo. Yes? 20-year-old, Limit Douluo.”

Xu Sanshi such remarks, the audience is all startled, the screams almost resound continuously, the vision of people simultaneously coagulated on Huo Yuhao.

What is Limit Douluo? Is the legend. Only then in the legend exists! In entire Dou Ling Empire, most formidable cultivated to reach as high as 97 levels of Heavenly Sun Douluo. However, that is all. Including 98 levels does not have, say nothing is Limit Douluo exists.

But at present this only then over 20 years old, was actually called Limit Douluo by Xu Sanshi, in their hearts besides does not dare to believe that does not dare to believe. This, in the prime minister eyes, revealed not the color of believing. How possible? 20-year-old Limit Douluo, in entire Douluo Continent historical, as if also only then ten thousand years ago, has presented one time?

Let alone they, Huo Yuhao, were at a loss, his there was any Limit Douluo! Just broke through the Transcendent Douluo level. Third Senior Brother this cow blows a little greatly!

Xu Sanshi gives a calm smile, said: “I know that you do not believe. However, you think not to have, the news that the Shrek Academy aspect spreads means anything, selects ten, Lien Chan seven, seven fight seven victories, strikes to kill Evil Soul Master, strikes to kill nine levels of Soul Engineer, even if Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master Zongli Wu, defeats in my Junior Brother subordinate, thus the name of achievement Ice Spirit Douluo. Zongli Wu, is 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo Evil Soul Master, this point, undergoes the Academy confirmation, believes that everybody understands this means anything. Evil Soul Master of same rank, be more formidable than Soul Master, is, in front of my Junior Brother, he has defeated, besides my Junior Brother is Limit Douluo, what good explanation but also there is? Damage as for Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp more than half, Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp * fell this matter, can look up greatly, this is not difficult to look up.”

Xu Sanshi was saying at the same time, the eye color of disdaining is also more and more powerful several points, spoke of finally, has the flavor that the people present were less than and seek greatly.

Xu Sanshi elaborated was the facts, before both armies, selected ten magnificent feats to be indelible, at that time some that many people look. Yes! Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master Zongli Wu defeats in his hands, what does this mean? Moreover, in civil official military commander also has Soul Master, they know certainly, when fight must consume Soul Power, at that time selected in ten processes, first five Huo Yuhao face is the powerhouse of Transcendent Douluo level, even if Ma Xiaotao cultivates for does not arrive at Transcendent Douluo, but Absolute Fire Martial Soul makes her have is not inferior in the Transcendent Douluo strength.

In this case, the Huo Yuhao succession of victories, the middle does not have any recuperation, yeah, one wants to come, said that he was Limit Douluo is also the most reasonable situation.

Limit Douluo, behind Xu Sanshi is standing unexpectedly Limit Douluo.

Must know, before nine levels of Soul Engineer appear, Limit Douluo was on this world the biggest deterrent. Before Sun-Moon Empire these years rose recently, had never heard besides Shrek Academy, where have Limit Douluo to exist.

What strength is Limit Douluo? In the legend can the moving mountains to fill the seas, easily a destruction city. But Limit Douluo exists, supports Imperial Family, that means that any they touched again lightly.

Even if now the Soul Engineer status is getting higher and higher, even there are to surpass the Soul Master trend, may spread along with the view of Shrek Academy, everybody understands gradually, in the future true formidable Soul Engineer, inevitably if first formidable Soul Master.

Sun-Moon Empire why so expansion war hurriedly, must in unify Continent most in a short time, this is an important reason.

Once lets belong to the Soul Guidance Device levels of Douluo Continent three countries' develops, is relying on accumulations of three-country Soul Master, they can certainly surpass Sun-Moon Empire in the future, how long as for this time is, that nobody can be clear.

Only then also has the overwhelming superiority while present Soul Guidance Device, unifies Continent thoroughly, Sun-Moon Empire can not have the extra worries, but, without a doubt, has developed Soul Guidance Device also to that time Sun-Moon Empire with the Soul Master union, Sun-Moon Empire must acknowledge that the theory of Shrek Academy is correct.

Therefore, Limit Douluo, as before is on this world existence of most peak, only then ten levels of Soul Engineer in legend, may and Limit Douluo to compare favorably.

But, never have also presented one ten levels of Soul Engineer to the present, Limit Douluo, is the peak!

Our shop pair of 11 last day, everybody in Taobao, shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find our shops. Right, forgot to tell everybody, the Magic Chef of Ice and Fire complete set books got online, bought the complete set, the first volume was the signature version. Moreover the price is very cheap, everybody has a look, for these days bought, but also delivered the double card signs.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-591-part-2





Volume 12

#591 - Spirit Cirque Luo Arrives


Therefore, when the civil and military ministers on the scene start to believe Huo Yuhao is Limit Douluo, they looked again the Xu Sanshi vision becomes is different. But Xue Kui and Xue Leng father and son's complexion actually becomes even more ugly.

They do not know that will have such situation, does not know that Huo Yuhao is Limit Douluo this matter. Today they are leading under the powerhouse, in addition Sun-Moon Empire that nine levels of Soul Engineer come, must accomplish the whole task at one stroke, after all, Xu Sanshi came from Shrek Academy, no one knows that Shrek Academy will have what kind of support to him, the Shrek Academy strength, is not their fathers and sons can contend, only then before Xu Sanshi control aspect, falls the homicide, the control imperial palace, when the time comes, their fathers and sons are the final emperor's clans, in addition the military force of control, the control empire, was logical.

What a pity, they were defeated, regarding the loser, is always cruel.

Xu Sanshi arrives at Xue Kui and in front of the Xue Leng fathers and sons gradually. Light [say / way]: “The Imperial Family bloodlines are on the wane, you, actually lack consideration for the whole for the one's own selfish interests, when the Sun-Moon Empire army threatens launches the rebellion, and dares to come the imperial palace to kill the prince regent secretly, crime in not amnesty.”

“Your highness does not want......”to realize that not the good prime minister said makes noise, what a pity, already late.

Xu Sanshi both hands also lift, presses separately on Xue Kui and Xue Leng.

At this time, in military commander group ran out of several people rapidly, tried to prevent Xu Sanshi. However, before them, presented a Bai Se (White Color) form.

In the entire imperial palace thermal shock, is almost only the flash, the military commander who that several clash changed into the ice sculpture, even nobody looks how Huo Yuhao gets rid.

Military commander on the scene, many seven rings and eight rings powerhouse. When they feel the Boundless Soul Power fluctuation that on Huo Yuhao sends out, immediately keeps silent, does not dare the move slightest.

“Pū and pū!”Two, Xue Kui and Xue Leng father and son seven orifices hemorrhage, falls dead in the place.

Xu Sanshi fishes out a handkerchief from the bosom, scratched as if not to contaminate on bloodstain both hands.

“Xue Kui and Xue Leng, plotting a rebellion fact all, imposes the capital punishment, read his ancestor once to make the contribution for the empire, the Imperial Family bloodlines were on the wane, exempt it to extinguish the crime of nine generations, eliminated the title, the clansman reduced to the common people. The ministers believe that the trial of this king can be fair and just?”

The people died, before the body, is standing a powerhouse of Limit Douluo level, at this time, if who also dares to revolt, that was really a fool.

Xu Sanshi light [say / way]: “I know that presents some person and Xue Kui, Xue Leng is some connections, at present the empire is the personnel, these matters, I can treat as have not occurred. To retain the vitality to the empire, hopes that you are self-possessed. Prime minister, was decided by you that whom sending to accept Xue Kui and Xue Leng two people of armies.”

“Yes, Your highness.”The prime minister the face was saying painstakingly.

Xu Sanshi discards the handkerchief, happen to covered above the Xue Kui face of dying with injustice unredressed.

“Empire civil strife eliminated, foreign aggression also. But marches to go to war, is not, I who I excel the believers position good that likes the minister being able to process. This civil strife, is creates by the throne, looks like in Xue Kui and Xue Leng two people, my hating to leave the stable authority, wants to win the Xue Clan landscape by Xu, when this is also they start rebel the most important reason. Laughable, is really is laughable, my this live Xiaoyao is comfortable, throne for me, really important? Today, I told.”

At the same time was saying, Xu Sanshi lifts both hands, has picked head Purple gold crown, turns back on the first place slowly, lays aside the Purple gold crown above the throne.

“Empire civil strife, except that is also at present metastable. Who should make inherit the throne, the numerous positions discussed voluntarily are, my mother will stay in the empire, who sat the throne, must pass through her to agree. The position of this prince regent, gives back, from now henceforth, my Xu Sanshi and Dou Ling Empire do not have any relations again, the bloodlines blood relationship sentiment, I.”

Spoke these words, Xu Sanshi arrives at side, pulls up Jiang Nannan, with long hurried strides walks toward outside.

This, let present all civil official military commanders to be shocked.

What situation is this? Doesn't do? Others do not do, does not want this prince regent, even might fall the throne in his hand.

At present in entire Dou Ling Empire, the adult male of Imperial Family bloodlines, in fact had a Xu Sanshi person! As for Xue Kui and Xue Leng two people, their descendants, because this rebels determines the nature, is in any event impossible becomes the successor.

Xu Sanshi this walks, empire what to do? Throne what to do? Always the calm prime minister, at this time also had a big shock, hurrying knocks down, “your highness, you cannot walk!”

The civil and military hundred officers also kneel down, shout loudly: “Your highness please do not bother to see me off.”

Xu Sanshi is holding the hand of Jiang Nannan, stops the footsteps, “I am one in Shrek Academy, is one in Tang Sect. Usually, I always little think, joyfully, but, since arrives at Dou Ling Empire, I again had not smiled, every day is bearing the huge pressure, you with my disunity, never are also willing to strive for me truly. I understand you, my name is Xu, but is not surnamed the snow, this is the root is. I have never studied the technique of king, does not want to study, regarding the Dou Ling Empire throne, I do not have the least bit thoughts. My intent has decided that you have no need to stop me, you should know that this does not have any function for me, has my Junior Brother, I want to walk, living that anybody cannot detain. If you also thought of the Xue Clan former friendship, temporarily attended to state affairs by my mother. She is also surnamed the snow, you will accept to be much easier. The first boy who later I and my wife give birth, will make him be surnamed the snow, if when the time comes nobody opposes, delivers him, has empire's education. All has been said that bye.”

Then, Xu Sanshi draws Jiang Nannan simultaneously to jump, among the moment, put from the crack of imperial palace, fly to go toward outside.

Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong, Ye Guyi, Nan Qiuqiu and Ji Juechen follow, seven hominizations are seven light shadow, vanishes in a flash does not see.

Xue Lingxun sits goes to the first place slightly, corners of the mouth also is twitching, before then, she does not know that Xu Sanshi must such do, this brat, even has not discussed with her.

Such walked? Too bastard. Had to inherit possible person to get rid of others, oneself patted the buttocks to walk away, this was his retaliation, the interior stabilized basically, this was real, but, a group of people without a leader Ah? do not look that Xu Sanshi such walked, has left behind itself, but before him, why, when introduced Huo Yuhao is? Is tells official military commanders on the scene, behind Xue Clan, a support of Limit Douluo, even also has the support of Shrek Academy and Tang Sect. They want to shake the Xue Clan rule, wants to think over and think over.

Removes firewood from under the pot, is nothing less than ruthless, what lets the Xue Lingxun secret sigh is, oneself this son is putting Mr. of extremely easy to obtain country, unexpectedly such has surrendered something submissively, is really and is really, the rotten wood cannot carve!

Breaks in the upper air, Xu Sanshi starts to laugh, what smiles is that frank, vanished the long time smiling face, finally reappeared on his face.

Jiang Nannan is also looks to smile, since recently, Xu three bore the how huge pressure she is clearest, now, these pressures can relieve finally, can she not be happy?

“Sanshi, we such do, really?”Jiang Nannan said in a low voice.

Xu Sanshi receives the laughter, said: “What has not to be good? Our showed extreme tolerance. A broken throne, snatches the broken head. Thinks really father does cherish? On this world, besides Nannan that the parental family member and I most loves, does not have anything to make father care. Can that big authority do? Where has to bring your enjoying the beauties of nature joyful Xiaoyao. Finally got rid of this group of fellows, you had not seen that these person of complexion pale appearances were amusing a moment ago, look like have eaten excrement. Little Junior Brother, did these person of you process?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Has processed, these Soul Master take orders in Xue Kui and Xue Leng, I have interrogated them successively, they expressed willingness to redeem oneself through good works, gives loyalty to Imperial Family. I have left behind the ban on them, and will control the method of ban to give the aunt, if they are not loyal, will die quickly.”

Is inheritance of Undead Magic master, this small skill is very simple. Has the support of these Titled Douluo, Soul Douluo and Soul Saint, Xue Lingxun had enough protection strength, this is also the important reason why Xu Sanshi can feel relieved.

“Has extricated finally, to continue to stay again in that place, I feared that I will be insane.”Xu Sanshi was sighing said.

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless [say / way]: “Third Senior Brother, you may betray me. When I was Limit Douluo. The words that you speak today, will quickly perhaps spread over entire Continent. Original Holy Spirit Cult and Sun-Moon Empire must cope with me, what to do your this lets my Ah?”

Xu Sanshi smiles, said: “Does a bit less this set. Although you now are also not Limit Douluo, how many Limit Douluo but can you be worse than? Although I have not arrived at the Titled Douluo level, but the eyesight has. You coped with the aura that these fellow times lend a moment ago, could not miss to be too more than it Limit Douluo. Graces freezes that many powerhouses, does your battle efficiency compare Limit Douluo also energy balance how many? Let alone, you also told me, you and Wutong Martial Soul Fusion has been OK, what this means that came does not know from Shrek Academy us? Therefore, do not install, you add, now is equal to Limit Douluo without question. Later our Tang Sect, depended on you. I looked, after this time goes back, Academy will not let off your, Sea God Pavilion Pavilion Master position, after it is estimated that soon, is your. This called capable work more.”

Requested earnestly everybody to cast some monthly tickets and recommendation tickets supports us, for these days, will also have the eruption.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-591-part-3





Volume 12

#592 - Direction


Huo Yuhao the face was saying painstakingly: “Third Senior Brother, you know that pressure big pain, amn't I painful? Let your such saying, I a little do not dare to return to Academy.”

Xu Sanshi sighed spookily, changes topic, said: “Our Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp came, assumes personal command in Spirit Dou City, sees my mother to tidy up these official military commanders. You do not know, my mother person, although sometimes somewhat off-line, but is very intelligent, I have inherited her intelligence. She controls the empire, compared with me, at least she since childhood is the imperial palace grows up, under is influenced by what one sees and hears, technique of many king. What can I? I by running around in circles that these official military commanders play, the surface seems I am a prince regent, order that may in fact, I issue could not realize, they can always find various reasons to dodge me, now was good, I flung to wave the arms about to leave, was our Tang Sect is comfortable! As for your issue, you solve, you must really not be willing to shoulder the responsibility, will not go also good, I help you have words to everybody, said that you and Wutong is well are good.”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, said: “Are you good for me? On this world, the matter that hobbled were too many, can it be that said that put down can put down. Right, Third Senior Brother, do I have these days that Wutong treats, how Sun-Moon Empire that side situation? Did the Sun-Moon Empire army have the trend?”

Xu Sanshi shook the head, said: “It is not clear. You also know, Sun-Moon Empire most excels blocks off the flow of news, when they are determined to block, nobody knows that they have made anything. The Sun-Moon Empire army disappeared in any case, should in Sky Soul Empire, actually be clear as for where nobody. Who knows when they will appear? The goal of attack nothing but two, Dou Ling Empire, or is Star Lou Empire. Then, Academy probably was recently natural. Not only made Dou Ling Empire elite come back, but also is willing to dispatch Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp to assist, why Ah?”

Huo Yuhao smiles. Said: “In your hand, if several nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, you also steadfast.”

“Ah?”Xu Sanshi cries out strangely. “Yuhao, do not tell me, you have robbed Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace Ah? do that many nine levels where, otherwise comes install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely? That gadget may be strategic commodity, even if Sun-Moon Empire, little uses extremely.”

Huo Yuhao will rob the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp matter saying that listening to his narration, Xu Sanshi to raise up the thumb, returned to Soul Engineer Corp of Spirit Dou City imperial palace to that two. He wishes one could to be all good it to get rid of.

“Yuhao, that this going back, what do you have to plan? Keeps our Tang Sect recuperation, is what kind of?”

Huo Yuhao thinks that said: “Now the aspect is somewhat complex, I must have the firsthand information, can decide then to make anything. I did not go back with you, after you go back, saw Old Xuan, told Old Xuan me and Wutong is well, we went to Sun-Moon Empire to inquire some news. Had information truly to pass on. Moreover, we will also take an action, protracted Sun-Moon Empire army the aggressive war of as far as possible.”

“Snort. Knows that your boy must run. Good, you go your, but, but must pay attention to the security! Yeah, I have groundless fears, by you and Wutong present strength, in addition the ability of that concealment, who must cope with you, is very difficult. Limit Douluo is inadequate.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head. Said: “It is not that optimistic, on this world. Did not have any impossible matter. Not only Sun-Moon Empire that side Holy Spirit Cult must cope with me. I estimated that Beast God is also staring at me, perhaps when will appear. You believe that by our present abilities, can contend with Beast God Di Tian?”

The Xu Sanshi body trembled the following, “Little Junior Brother, do not frighten me, if in this case, we as early as possible separate. You can also run. Do we run? The people have been short well.”

Huo Yuhao looks at his attire the fear appearance, cannot bear laugh, nearby Ye Guyi flies suddenly, [say / way] that some are not convinced: “How his Limit Douluo. Huo Yuhao, has skill our single Tiao.”

Huo Yuhao look at her, heartfelt tunnel: “Guyi, this time thank you, if not you, everybody is not necessarily able to insist that we dare to come.”

Ye Guyi is actually the complexion one cold, said: “You have not been regarded as a person on one's own side me.”

“Ah? what this word?”Huo Yuhao visits her surprisedly.

Ye Guyi cold sound track: “I am also a Tang Sect member, we protect oneself, I to protect the partner, this should do, does the countenance why you use keeping aloof thank me? I challenge to you. single Tiao!”

Huo Yuhao look somewhat complex visits her, sighed, said: “Good. Where?”

“Here.”Ye Guyi has referred to the sky, back six wing rackets, tender body already Ba empty/sky.

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless shaking the head, also flew.

Jiang Nannan brow tight wrinkle, Xu Sanshi is the dumbfounded [say / way]: “Which type of Ah? this was must make then just to come out, how must hit. Yuhao also is really, why can promise her?”

Tang Wutong is with smile on the face in side, old god in [say / way]: “Others liked him being so long, vented with him, should be.”

A Nan Qiuqiu face curious [say / way]: “Do you know?”

The Tang Wutong attractive pink-blue color big eye reveals a helplessness, said: “I am not the blind person, Ye Guyi look that Yuhao look I can't see? Actually she most wants to challenge should be I, but feared one receive does not stop, this must vent anger with Yuhao. All right, so long as the will of the people here, making her vent anger does not matter, for our Tang Sect peace.”

Xu Sanshi is very admiring gave the thumbs-up to Tang Wutong, “atmosphere! Has to make the style of big woman, you make Yuhao receive several to be young again, I believe that so long as he is willing to open the mouth, our Tang Sect certainly strong quick, perhaps, Sun-Moon Empire that War-God Empress will arrive at our Tang Sect to come, finally rules Continent, perhaps was our Shrek Academy, ha, well, Wutong, why you used this look to visit me, I was not a little comfortable.”

Tang Wutong [say / way] maliciously: “I thought that you are looking for trouble, come, I also challenge to you. Since promoting to the Transcendent Douluo level, I did not have truely has fought well, happen to tries the hand with you, helps you give to break through Titled Douluo while convenient to build the foundation. The Nannan elder sister, won't you be blocking me?”

Jiang Nannan the expression also returned to at this time normal, “some people mouths are inexpensive, is owes to punch, Wutong, do not give me the face.”

Their the free time of here speech, in sky have hit. Facing Huo Yuhao, Ye Guyi that has not kept the meaning of hand. Comes up, the whole body is golden light four shoots, angel avatar has released.

Huo Yuhao painstakingly the face, is only defense constantly, whatever the Ye Guyi big move of frequency leaves, unceasing bombardment on him.

However, these attacks, were not revealed the melting of mountain and non- dew by Huo Yuhao.

Has saying that the Angel Martial Soul striking power is extremely tyrannical, this point links Huo Yuhao also to praise without cease. When this war ended, on him a white clothing had many breakages, many places turned into the burnt black. Has to change clothes to walk again.

But that side Ye Guyi, actually once again escaped the strength. She to consuming own last Soul Power, this had ended the continuous attack.

What Huo Yuhao pays is only a price of clothes, finished this has spelled to fight, the Ye Guyi complexion has as if felt relaxed several points. But in the return trip, throughout remains silent.

After half double-hour, the people separate from each other, Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, goes in the Sky Soul Empire direction.

Xu Sanshi waves to say goodbye with them, while rubs were being punched azure the cheek, the strength progress of Tang Wutong was too big, his Black Tortoise Shield is not enough to defend completely, but, Tang Wutong very much gives Jiang Nannan to save face, the pain has not played her. However, this dead girl, does not know that hits person of not a slap in the face? Xu Sanshi is twitching ill-humoredly reluctantly is roaring in the moral nature.

, The Sky Soul Empire border already was by far in sight, Huo Yuhao is drawing Tang Wutong, in the look actually full is the disconsolate color.

Sky Soul Empire did not have, thorough did not have, sweeps off from this world domain.

After Sun-Moon Empire has seized Sky Soul Empire throughout, now entire Continent had over 50% area during they control. Since there is Douluo Continent, but also the country has never controlled the so vast region.

Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire bind together, possibly is not the Sun-Moon Empire match. Individual battle efficiency, could decide outcome of war, but actually absolutely cannot change the entire Continent situation.

This point, Huo Yuhao is very clear.

The Sun-Moon Empire war is impossible to stop, with the constant development of Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, their strengths will have in a short time also a leap.

At present uses Humanoid Soul Guidance Device that from Sun-Moon Empire, is relatively crude and rough, only then nine levels has certain prestige energy. Does not know how these cultivate for low Soul Engineer control these Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, what can affirm, these Humanoid Soul Guidance Device might are quite considerable.

In this case, once after Sun-Moon Empire many Humanoid Soul Guidance Device will equip Soul Engineer Corp, the entire Soul Engineer Corp strength will again increase, does not use other, so long as these Humanoid Soul Guidance Device increase them to carry installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball and milk bottle surely, as well as increases the defensive power, sufficiently made their overall strength fly over.

Today three, to thank everybody's support.

Was right, in our prestige - platform, just renewed beyond Douluo Continent a following part, everybody can look. Joins our platforms, then under point that serializes exclusive, can find in.

Joins the platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number, searches Tang three few, has the authentication is our families. ( to be continued ) 861



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-592-part-1





Volume 12

#592 - Direction


But Humanoid Soul Guidance Device developed this degree, believed soon, merely relies on the milk bottle to stimulate to movement, once the ordinary soldier can also use simple Soul Guidance Device time, Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire final result has been doomed.

Thinks of these, Huo Yuhao thinks somewhat at a loss, he knows, since oneself such do is the futile effort, why can also probably such do? Future Continent, will certainly be Soul Guidance Device world, this is the inevitable situation of technological progress. A Continent series, perhaps is also not the misdemeanor. So long as Sun-Moon Empire restrains some slightly, the three-country good things will inherit, a unified big country, is not the misdemeanor.

Said that said that may think of these each time, he thought one are at heart suffocated, own motherland has the possibility destruction, this to anybody, is not the joyful matter.

Whatever, oneself whole-heartedly protects own country, regardless of the future how.

Even if Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent, cannot be when exist. Moreover, at present that side Academy, Soul Guidance Hall also in ten thousand li in a day is progressing. And spreads to Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire these Soul Guidance Technology, both countries accelerating development Soul Guidance Device. So long as Sun-Moon Empire unifies the Continent time to be delayed, perhaps, in the near future, will have the possibility completely to relieve this threat. To that time, Continent saw will enter partitioning. But uses the Soul Guidance Device superiority to develop gradually along with Soul Master, Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire not necessarily do not have the opportunity to counter-attack.

Naturally, these are the idealizations, after the destruction Sky Soul Empire, Sun-Moon Empire has reorganized Sky Soul Empire some Soul Master?

It is not each Soul Master such has the strength of spirit like Innate Body Sect sect master Du Busi, at least now looks like, is not. Will Sun-Moon Empire baseless also be why many how many Soul Engineer Corp to come? Where does Soul Engineer come? Hasn't that equipped Soul Guidance Device Soul Master? Uses Soul Guidance Device not to be difficult, Soul Master after simple training, can use some Soul Guidance Device. Does not need them to manufacture.

The Sun-Moon Empire overall strength, is formidable! Star Luo or Dou Ling, so long as makes them destroy completely a country again, all these are irreversible. Now can only be places hopes in Sun-Moon Empire to have the problem to be good. For example, proposition of previous Ju Zi(orange).

If can to get rid of Xu Tianran, Ju Zi(orange) give Star Luo and Dou Ling two countries ten years of cushion time. Ten years later, what situation can be, but also who said well? At least, in ten years within, oneself is can certainly reach 98 levels, attacks unprecedented three Soul Nucleus Limit Douluo.

If the success, actually to any degree, that have been possible is very difficult to say really at that time formidable, perhaps, Soul Guidance Device is unable to threaten itself again, in that case, all become are different. Let alone, after individual battle efficiency achieves Absolute, can't change the aspect really? For example, do oneself again seize Ju Zi(orange) and her son? The Sun-Moon Empire unceasing civil strife, then, threat also relieved.

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao was more painful, but, in his heart is actually starts somewhat to understand why initially by the pride of Innate Body Douluo Du Busi, must take that road, that was forced really! The country will perish, does not use that violent way, was unable to reverse anything.

Then, oneself really? No, definitely is incorrect, did not say other, in oneself heart that closes cannot pass.

Xu Yunhan, that kid does not know that now, to have thought how initially that kid and intimate appearance, in Huo Yuhao heart heavy relaxed several points finally, later and Wutong, must live several such kids, Wutong is so attractive, child who we have, will be very certainly attractive.

Gently is holding the hand of Wutong, the tender small hand has the sense of reality very much, the Huo Yuhao heart somewhat is fiery. The father-in-law Sir who own that has never met, has let off himself finally, the seal has relieved, matter that now as if can handle were many.

However, perhaps is because had the shadow at heart, or extremely in treasuring Wutong, at least until now, Huo Yuhao has not made any matter.

Enters in Sky Soul Empire, inevitable has bumped into that float in airborne superaltitude Surveying Soul Guidance Device, these Surveying Soul Guidance Device in airborne float, patrols unceasingly.

Every one time sees these superaltitude Surveying Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao will have the curiosity, because they underwent the improvement.

In the Soul Guidance Technology aspect, Sun-Moon Empire has not reduced the speed of research and development throughout, moreover continually is promoting, the pressure of war, let their profound comprehending to the technical leading enormous superiority.

However, these upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device progressive speeds, eventually and Huo Yuhao own progressive speed cannot compare. Regardless in any case, how they could not discover Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong trail.

Sky Soul Empire the piece of plain topography is very gentle. To seek for an army in a big country, is not an easy matter. Huo Yuhao does not worry, brings Tang Wutong to loaf in Sky Soul Empire. When a city, goes in the inquiry and inquiry news, tastes the local good food.

Naturally, this wanders or has goal, first extended Sky Soul Empire to shake in the Dou Ling Empire border, if the Sun-Moon Empire aspect must resort to arms to Dou Ling Empire, must be stationed in the, but was contrary to what expects, has not had this situation, in other words, Sun-Moon Empire will not attack Dou Ling Empire in a short time. It is not Dou Ling Empire, is Star Lou Empire?

This discovery, makes the Huo Yuhao heart somewhat feel uncomfortable immediately, because is just familiar with Ju Zi(orange), he is clearer, in is actually Star Lou Empire that in the Ju Zi(orange) heart most hates! Her family member, dies during the conflict of Star Lou Empire and Sun-Moon Empire, therefore, so long as there is a possibility, she will certainly take to Star Lou Empire the war. Before reason that did not cope with Star Lou Empire, was because Star Lou Empire was belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries most formidable one, once coped with him first, under the leadership of Star Lou Empire, the support of Shrek Academy, the loss of Sun-Moon Empire will increase, if has not hit, then, under was in inverse proportion, really has not said.

Duke White Tiger, is Star Lou Empire one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, this is everyone knows. At least Ju Zi(orange) also has regarded the most important match him.

At present Star Lou Empire relies on as before is threatening the Sun-Moon Empire native place to the control of Bright Struggle Mountain Range. Diverted Sun-Moon Empire part of military strength.

However, now at this time resorted to arms to Star Lou Empire, on being considered as is a good opportunity. Sky Soul Empire did not say that already destruction. The Dou Ling Empire civil strife, cannot take care of oneself, to support Star Lou Empire besides Shrek Academy, the Star Lou Empire foreign aid did not have anything, put together the hard strength, Star Lou Empire is inferior to Sun-Moon Empire eventually.

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao hurrying brings Tang Wutong to fly toward the Sky Soul Empire deep place, he must go to nearby Heaven Dou City to have a look first, then goes to that side the Star Lou Empire border. If Ju Zi(orange) resorts to arms to Star Lou Empire, then, he must intervene.

Had not thought including Huo Yuhao, with the lapse of time, he care to Duke White Tiger has surpassed the hatred now.

Before Heaven Dou City, seems does not have what difference, after having experienced the baptism of war, it once deteriorated after a period of time, but is quick, in Sun-Moon Empire under can construct, Heaven Dou City not only restores to the original condition, but also after joining of civil Soul Guidance Device, became more prosperous.

Enters in Heaven Dou City, Huo Yuhao has an misconception, as if this city has not experienced the baptism of war. On street bustling, the people cross as if is very happy, as if extinguishes the pain in country's, clean that extinguished.

The common people truly are the easiest satisfied people, so long as can eat to the full to put on warmly, has the place to live. Was enough regarding them, who as for the ruler is, for them, is really not that important.

Sighed, Huo Yuhao shaking the head of gently, bringing Tang Wutong to walk in the Heaven Dou City introverted imperial palace direction.

Initially, they had met formidable Darkness Sacred Dragon here, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao, nearly died here. But now, they have not actually feared to Long Xiaoyao. That side the Heaven Dou City original Sky Soul Empire imperial palace, is easiest to inquire the news.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection in unknowingly all-around has released, takes his present cultivating as, Spiritual Detection covers the most city sufficiently.

The garrison troops in city are not many, here must unexpectedly be the inland city, moreover no longer is the capital, is only a big city.

Sun-Moon Empire not too has been strict regarding the defense of internal city, as if Huo Yuhao initially took to Sun-Moon Empire owes greatly has not made them grow the memory.

After Huo Yuhao currently also has the idea goes back, again commander own three Soul Engineer Corp, enters in Sun-Moon Empire to disturb once more, wins the time to Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire. But looking back now, this idea some are not realistic.

Academy needs to defend, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp went to Dou Ling Empire, another two situations are unknown, by Sea God Pavilion that side to Academy own attaching great importance to of defense, will not be dispatched by oneself in a short time.

Matter of this destruction, it seems like can only be is done.

The imperial palace close at hand, the soldier also finally became a lot . Moreover, can feel through Spiritual Detection Huo Yuhao that in this imperial palace, has various Surveying Soul Guidance Device to scan outside. Some Surveying Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao has not seen.

“Do we go in? How?”Tang Wutong asked to Huo Yuhao in a low voice.

Second, behind also has. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-592-part-2





Volume 12

#592 - Direction


Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “No, first does not go, we observed to say again. Surveying Soul Guidance Device in this imperial palace has some me not to know. Is careful.”

Before arriving at Heaven Dou City, in Huo Yuhao actually heart some hopes, if the Sun-Moon Empire army needs well the recuperation, then, Heaven Dou City absolutely is most suitable. Here has the most abundant commodity.

What a pity, outside Heaven Dou City, does not have the trace of army, Huo Yuhao even has an misconception, as if the Sun-Moon Empire army disappeared. This feeling for him is very fearful.

Tang Wutong sinking sound track: “Catches individual to ask?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “About military secret, perhaps only then in this imperial palace the genuine director may know. We observe in the nearby first, then I find the person, had found, in the evening asked him to come out.”

At the same time was saying, his Spiritual Detection already completely centralized in the Heaven Dou City imperial palace, detailed examination.

Quick, Huo Yuhao had found a specially familiar form, even the previous time, he had also bumped into this.

Jing Hongchen, that Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy Dean.

Naturally, original Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy did not have, Bright Virtue Hall is withering away. Now does not know to have the reconstruction, from Jing Hongchen continuously this city, even if the reconstruction, should not have what relations with him.

A dynasty emperor royal courtier, Jing Hongchen, although intelligent support Xu Tianran, but after Xu Tianran true superior, throws this old official in the one side. Naturally, Heaven Dou City is also very important, can when here City Lord, said that is Xiaoyao is also comfortable.

Not only has discovered Jing Hongchen, Huo Yuhao had also discovered two very familiar people, on the competition stage, caused many troubles to them. Has not thought that they are also living.

“Wutong, you guess that whom I did discover?”Huo Yuhao mysterious asked to Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong curious [say / way]: “Whom has discovered? Looks at your appearance, should be we knows.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, “still remembers that had unrequited loved your miss? Others to you are really good.”Here, he could not bear smile first.

“Unrequited loves me?”Tang Wutong stares, she has thought that “you said should not be Meng Hongchen? I have thought that that large explosion she died.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “No, has not died, this little while in imperial palace, not only she, Xiao Hongchen also. This also is really the enemies often cross each other's path! Initially between we and them, what spelled on the competition stage was life and death. Xiao Hongchen heavy wound, has not thought that actually also lived. Moreover, their strengths now are not weak. Should have cultivating of Soul Douluo level, although is inferior to us, but in Sun-Moon Empire Soul Master was also the outstanding person. Then, these two people cannot be regarded are actually Soul Engineer, is more like Soul Master. The Xiao Hongchen talent is astonishing. How did not know now their actual combat capability.”

Tang Wutong complexion somewhat strange [say / way]: “Why does not know, we clearly should be hostile. But you mentioned them, I instead thought somewhat excitedly. Really was the old acquaintance, Yuhao, this time let off them, do not kill them to be good?”

Huo Yuhao nodded with a smile, said: “I some with your same feeling, do not kill them, I have not thought must kill them. We well greeted with them and that's the end. As for Jing Hongchen, so long as told us to know that also let off him is. Initially, must not have them to take to our pressure, we did not have rapidness that the means grew.”

They smile, after an ability of person has been the certain extent, the thing that before there are many, cares becomes does not need to continue to care. At least at present they are this feeling. Jing Hongchen, already cannot threaten their existence.

The night falls, Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, leisurely strolls walks in the Heaven Dou City imperial palace direction, their forms, integration of being quietly to the dim light of night.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection and Imitation Soul Ability perfect links Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain that in addition slightly controls changes their body temperature, Space Power is changing the path that they are having. Similarly has Dual Soul Nucleus them, has been able to achieve the degree of actual situation exchange on this world.

Fluctuation Soul Guidance Device and heat energy Surveying Soul Guidance Device or mind Surveying Soul Guidance Device, fall on them, will be sentenced by Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection ahead of time in advance, then makes the corresponding response.

Xu Sanshi said right, present Huo Yuhao truly had was certainly the ability of Limit Douluo level. These Surveying Soul Guidance Device for him, any have not affected.

Only if Sun-Moon Empire can develop blockade space Soul Guidance Device, otherwise, wants to discover him, is very difficultly and is very difficult.

Enters the imperial palace, looks like walks into oneself garden.

The Heaven Dou City imperial palace is time-honored, can pursue new moon to the Heaven Dou Empire time, in the imperial palace constructs does not calculate that is brand-new, but is quite plain. Palatial is having intense dignity. In the imperial palace, the establishments of some Soul Guidance Lantern, making this plain somewhat discount slightly.

Looks at the somewhat motley wall, Huo Yuhao knows that the Sun-Moon Empire aspect, has not thought must restore this imperial palace. What a pity, was a pity.

Huo Yuhao also clear remembering, this city regarding the Tang Sect significance, Tang Sect is the origin in Heaven Dou City! Here also has the area enormous courtyard to be Tang Sect. Later in any event, must strive to take carry back that courtyard, that is also the Little Ya Teacher wish.

Under the direction of Spiritual Detection, they entered the imperial palace quickly.

In the Heaven Dou City imperial palace, is stationed in 500 soldiers, in addition, 100 Soul Engineer, these Soul Engineer are responsible for Soul Guidance Array place, defends the entire imperial palace, in the coordination various Surveying Soul Guidance Device, regarding the average person, can describe with the impregnable four characters absolutely.

Naturally, regarding Huo Yuhao, these four characters does not have any significance.

On the face revealed a light smile, before Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong was arriving at a palace front door, to stop the footsteps. Spiritual Detection and Sharing appears in the Tang Wutong mind directly, in their consciousness, 3 D image clear presents.

In palace.

Jing Hongchen is carrying one glass of good wines, sip gently, on the old face has revealed the comfortable color. “Nice wine, is really the nice wine! This type of good wine in Sky Soul Empire is also the high-grade, even if Xu Tianran, is not necessarily able to drink such good bar.”

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals color of the surprise, Jing Hongchen the what kind hero was aggressive in the past, now reduces unexpectedly appreciates the good wine here, this completely is not his style!

Back then, Jing Hongchen governed Sun-Moon Empire Bright Virtue Hall and Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy, it may be said that was the power leans the government and people. Bright Virtue Hall is Sun-Moon Empire besides Consecrate Hall, studies the Soul Guidance Device highest organization. Played the huge role for the technological progress of Sun-Moon Empire.

But present he, only with initially differed in the aura is too big and is too big. His cultivating to have even regressed compared with it past years, it can be imagined, these years his mood had what kind of change.

“Grandfather, you little drink.”Meng Hongchen consoles to say in the one side.

Jing Hongchen doesn't coldly snorted, what “drink to do? In this Heaven Dou City, only if the peculiar circumstance absolutely does not have the place of need old man, so-called City Lord, but is sent to frontier service. Xu Tianran Xu Tianran, initially the old man helped your superior, actually ends up to turn out so is out. The Bright Virtue Hall reconstruction, you exclude, such being the case, me the old man unexpectedly besides here lead a befuddled life as if drunk or dreaming, what can also make?”

Xiao Hongchen anger sound track: “This Xu Tianran is extremely mean, in the past you have made that many contributions for him, when he chooses to support him unseconded. Now he actually like this to you, is not because he did grasp Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp? His elimination dissident wantonly, arranges on own person the key position, simply is mean and shameless. Only then these Consecrate Hall people he do not dare to move, I looked, if Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp is more formidable, Consecrate Hall, he also or paid attention. Grandfather, I am not clear, why you are not willing to go to Consecrate Hall Ah?”

Jing Hongchen sighed, said: “It is not I am not willing to go, but does not have the face! Bright Virtue Hall destroys in my hand, how making me see your grand preceptor grandfather? I do not have the face to see him, how can enter Consecrate Hall? You think why I will arrive at this Heaven Dou City to take office honestly? That Xu Tianran before being sent to frontier service me, if has not told your grand preceptor grandfather, he how dare so to me? But your grand preceptor grandfather has not opened the mouth, must punish me! What can I say? Only can come, this for a lifetime, it is estimated that was also withdraws here. However, do not study the grandfather, you have the extremely high talent, these years have also been progressing, I make you scoop up light raise dark, for soon future amazing the world with a single brilliant feat, after your achievement Titled Douluo, our Hongchen Clan can be on the Sun-Moon Empire stage inevitably. To that time, you have been able to look for your grand preceptor grandfather, I did not have the potential, but you have, when you entered Consecrate Hall that day, was the date of our Hongchen Clan again rising. When the time comes, in any event you must strive to grasp the Bright Virtue Hall strength, that is the core of our country!”

Is listening to the Jing Hongchen words, Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen in abundance nods. Xiao Hongchen gets hold of the double fist, “grandfather, you could rest assured that our certain effort. One day, we become present age most powerhouses!”

Three finished, asks the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-592-part-3





Volume 12

#593 - Bustling Place Family


Jing Hongchen looked at Xiao Hongchen one, said: “Child, you are really somewhat go through life without a good opportunity! If misses this time, you in any time, inevitably are eagerly anticipate the entire time one generation of supreme talent, what a pity, this time, Shrek Academy left were too many, too many talents, suppressed you not to have the means to come to the end actually. You even consumed massive potentials to promote oneself to cultivate are, thus had the repercussions, otherwise, by the inclines of our these many resources, you already had to attack the Titled Douluo strength.”

Initially, on second Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition that Xiao Hongchen in he participated, to promote to cultivate is, he has used secret technique ahead of time, stimulated own potential, soon became Soul Saint, was the preparation blossomed in radiant splendor on that great competition, who knows that finally actually as before was the disastrous defeat, even almost lost including the life. After that he recuperated five years, gradually recovers, although these years assiduously are also practicing, but in fact, his cultivating for also miss compared with younger sister Meng Hongchen, now just broke through the Soul Douluo boundary, but Meng Hongchen had 87 levels of Soul Power levels, soon, can launch the impact on the Titled Douluo level.

Xiao Hongchen arrives in front of Jing Hongchen, works on the Jing Hongchen beverage bottle, has filled two big mouths, eye some [say / way] of blushing: “Shrek, is Shrek these people. Killed my destiny. Some day, if I can enter Bright Virtue Hall, and controls it, in the future must ruin Shrek Academy thoroughly, lets the scene that Huo Yuhao they see with one's own eyes the Shrek Academy destruction.”

“Shut up!”Jing Hongchen has snatched the beverage bottle in his hand, gets angry the sound track: What nonsense that “spoke? Depending on you, can ruin Shrek Academy? You have remembered to me, after this thought that never appear, otherwise, not only you, will certainly be led into the abyss including our entire family, do you understand?”

Xiao Hongchen anti- sound track: “Grandfather, you are not taught since childhood I do want the ambition to be broad? Why can't I ruin Shrek Academy? Why?”

